CHAPTER I.
THE ANCIENT TENEMENT.
In
a narrow cross-way that leads from the Court House Square
northward losing itself in Old Cornhill, there stands, or did stand
at the period of our story, a low wooden edifice, without any thing
particuliar to draw the attention of the eyes of the passers-by save
its antiquity and dilapidated condition.
Two very stooping stories in height, very long in the direction of
the length of the alley, of a black weather-color, its roof patched
here and there with tough gray moss and its foundation sunken at
least eighteen inches below the pavement, it doubtless dated
anterior
to the revolution. The alley in which it stood was but a few
feet in breadth, and was so closely filled on both sides with
buildings
appropriate to occupations of various kinds, that it was quite
jammed up in the corner, as it were, and very much in the way of
modern innovations and improvements.
Nevertheless, worthless as this tenement was, it had various
occupants
.
The lower floor was tenanted by a little cobbler who with
his family rented two rooms, by an African boot-black and
second-hand
clothes' broker, who had also two rooms on the right hand of
the dark passage into which the sunken door admitted whomsoever
had the courage to risk his body beneath the tottering lintel. On
one side of the door-way was the cobbler's tin sign, reading
Kalee Kemp
Shoe-maker. and under the letters of the name
was the expressive and intelligible representation of a shoe done in
black paint upon a light blue ground. Opposite this sign on the
left of the door was
Handy Boot-Blak
and old Kloze to sel and
For to By
. Over the cobbler's sign hung a pair of patched boy's
boots as a specimen of Kaleb's skill, and around the sign of the
African broker were suspended upon a cross-stick secured by a
string to a nail, sundry well-cleansed trowsers, coat and waistcoats
looking far more shining than when they were new, proud
testimonials
of the sable operator's renovating talents. In the rear rooms
lodged together a wood-sawyer and a hardy-sturdy German Jew,
the latter being temporarily the boarder of the Knight of the cross
and file.
The entry had bare walls scored with dirt and charcoal markings,
with the plastering gone in many places. The floor was broken
and yawned into dangerous cavities looking into the black cellar,
and its surface was covered with myriads of gashes from the edges
of axes imprinted deeply therein by the occupants who had in
common
used the planks as a chopping floor for their fire-wood.
At about two thirds the length of the passage was a flight of
stairs that had lost the centre of gravity and were inclined to tip
off into the entry whosoever was so desperate as to ascend them.
This inclination had been, however, corrected by a strong prop of
timber placed beneath, so that the danger was in a great measure
diminished. The ascent however was perilous to the uninitiated
who could only achieve it by hugging the wall closely.
The middle of each step was deeply worn with the soles of those
who had gone up and down in the last eighty years, but as the
wood portion was only worn away and the iron nails still remained,
forming a sort of knot, the risk of stumbling up or down was very
much increased. Nevertheless up and down those stairs, one-sided,
and dark as they were, many feet traveled every day.
The stairs after descending the half of a circle around a central
upright, terminated on the second floor of the tenement in a sort of
closet, for entry it could not be called. It was unillumined by any
light save what found its way up the stair-way, which in its turn
was lighted only by four panes placed above the door, but which
were so incrusted with dirt that they were about as serviceable for
the purpose for which they were set there, as quares of brown paper.
It is true that when the outer door stood open there was a dim
radiance
pervading the enclosure at the top of the stair-way, at which
time it could be seen that there were four sides to it, one being the
stair-way and the other in the shape of three doors. One of these
doors was nailed up by a board placed securely across it, the other
two had latches, one being a little old-fashioned brass knob, the other
a catch made of iron.
The room on the door of which was the common iron-latch was
for the present tenanted by a poet. The door on the left hand
which was barred up so forbiddingly was closed for purposes to be
hereafter made known. The middle door is the one with which we
have to do just now, into which we will enter with the man who
has just mounted the stairs and stops before it. He gives a low rap,
for the occupant has a peculiar habit of bolting himself in, and the
door will, therefore, not yield itself open to the simple turning of
the knob with the hand.
The individual who has made his appearance at the door is well
wrapped in a rich cloak of blue cloth with velvet facings, and
wears a modish hat bright with newness. He wears his cloak
Spanish fashion over his left shoulder, though as his shoulder wants
manly breadth it slips off quite as often as he arranges it upon it;
but his persevering efforts to make it hang there are creditable to
him. Upon his hands are olive-tinted kid gloves, a very nice fit,
and his pantaloons are of the precise olive shade of his gloves, a
consideration worthy of remark. His boots were very fashionably
made, that is three inches longer and an inch and a half narrower
than the foot. The gentleman himself, for having described the
more important part of the man first, we now take the lesser, the
gentleman himself had a fair skin, a small blue eye, not very
expressive
,
light hair, not brown but olive, nearly the color of his
gloves as if his hair had been expressly bespoken to match the
gloves and pantaloons, a suggestion quite as reasonable as the
visa
versa
. He had a very strait prim nose, prim chin, thin prim lips,
and very erect ears; and altogether was a very prim jobber-looking
little man of five and thirty.
He rapped a second time a little louder than the first, and then
flung the fold of his cloak upon his shoulder again and setting his
elbow desperately akimbo to keep it in its place. While he is
waiting
for the second rap to receive attention we will precede him into
the room and see why the first was suffered to pass unheeded.
The apartment at the door of which he stands awaiting our
leisure as well as that of the occupant, was a large square
chamber
with a low ceiling, and pannelled walls.
It was at a glance a lawyer's office. On one side was ranged
upon broken shelves a skeleton of an old law library, and on
another
hung maps, smoke-browned, and cracked with age. Old candles,
boxes, and barrels stood about under the windows or in the corners
crammed with papers, old deeds and all the refuse of an ancient
law office the accumalations of years. In front of a huge,
open-mouthed
fire-place that occupied half of the side of the dark, dingy
room, stood a square pine table heaped confusedly with law papers,
law books, newspapers, cap paper, pens, bottles of ink, sand boxes,
wafers, a tobacco-pipe, and a paper of tobacco, a snuff-box upset
and the contents half spilled upon an open letter, a broad brimmed
greasy hat, an umbrella, a silver-headed cane, and a pair of
mittens
,
a copy of Tom Paine's Age of Reason well thumbed, with
a pair of spectacles laying upon the open pages, a Bible with a
cross pictured upon the cover for Roman Catholics to make oaths
upon, a package of writs and another of bail-warrants, an old long
expired Policy of Insurance for that very tenement, and a rat-trap
with the head and fore-shoulders of an enormous rat firmly secured
by the head and shoulders within it!
The fourth side of the room was occupied by a turn-up bedstead.
By the side of the fire-place was a cupboard containing sundry
culinary
ware, just sufficient for a bachelor's tenement, which this
room evidently was. At the back of the room were arranged boots
and shoes of a longer size and unfashionable shape, as if the
occupant
of the apartment was a man who despised the niceties of
wardrobery; and from their soiled appearance he evidently was
not a very profitable customer to Kaleb in the premises directly
beneath him.
The room altogether was a perfect chaos of odds and ends, every
thing to be found in it, and nothing in its place. Old hair trunks
were here and there gaping with being crammed to surfeiting with
old garments and smoky papers mixed together half and half as if
packed at a fire. The inmate of the room very plainly was
wonderfully
independent of Heaven's first law, order! If a book fell
from a table it seemed to lay till it was wanted if for months; and
if a pane of glass was broken the cavity was stoped securely up
with an old hat or waistcoat. The walls were smoked brown, the
ceiling was smoked, the books, the papers, were of a smoky hue,
and a dark murky atmosphere seemed to pervade the place.
There were three chairs in the room; one of them was large,
armed, had a high back and was covered with leather, well-glossed
from frequent wear. Plainly the owner loved his ease in an
arm-chair
.
He did not, however, take such good care of the ease of his
clients, or whosoever his visiters might be, as the chairs were
weak brothers, one having a leg gone, the other having a broken
back; so that he who sat in the former had to substitute one of his
own legs as a supporter of the equilibrium, while the other had to
humor the crippled vertebr with gingerly caution or sit bolt
upright
.
The remaining articles of furniture consisted of a wash-stand
containing a battered tin basin, a broken pail half full of water,
and a coffee-pot, tea-kettle and toasting fork, placedby the fire-place,
in which, under the influence of the breath of a tall, long man down
on his knees before them, glowed brightly the embers of a fire in
preparation for the evening meal.
The personage in question, after blowing at the coals, three in
number, for about two minutes, with his large lips within half an
inch of them, as glowing as the embers themselves, drew back and
taking a book that lay upon the hearth, tore a leaf from it, though
loose waste paper lay within his reach, and turning the leaf up into
a lighter laid it against the coals and once more applied his lips.
A flame rewarded his exertions and placing upon it a few splinters
he laid carefully over them a couple of sticks of wood about the
bigness of a carpenter's rule and anxiously watched, still on his
knees, the gradual progress of ignition. Having thus far
accomplished
his achievement, he arose from the ashes and hung upon a hook
above the fire a venerable-looking tea-kettle, which he had already
filled with water.
This done, he re-seated himself in his chair and resumed the
examination
of a volume in yellow-buff calf binding, lettered Criminal
Laws, which then lay open upon the table.
He could now be seen to better advantage than when upon the
hearth. He was a tall, angular-jointed man, with a large black head,
a low square forehead, much wrinkled and half whiskers which
were beginning to show gray. His features were strong, heavy but
shrewdly intelligent with a vicious or wicked cast to them. His
brows were thick and overtopped his deep set, black eyes something
as the low projecting roof of his old tenement overtopped the
windows
of the second story. His physignomy was so massive that to
the ordinary observer he looked dull and sluggish; but the keen
looker could detect the most active watchfulness vigilant and
covert
beneath all. His lips were very prominent and fleshy, but
marked with good sense and moreover with sensuality.
He wore a snuff-colored coat that looked as if it had been the daily
companion to his back for eleven years, and snuff-colored trowsers
and snuff-colored cloth vest, all three very much worn and faded, and
stained till almost every hue from drab to black was represented in
spots upon them. Yet they were whole and substantial and
showed
not so much poverty of apparel as negligence of costume. In
height he was not under six feet, his neck, however, which was very
long and scraggy, making up a fair proportion of his height. A
narrow
fold of white cravat encircled his throat leaving fully exposed
Adam's apple, which was a most formidable protuberance in his
thorax.
Such was the personal appearance and dress of Simmins Satchell,
Esq., Attorney at Law, or rather ex-Attorney, for he was no longer
a member of the bar, having been degraded from it some years past
for some dishonorable practices. He nevertheless, continued to
hover on the verge of the courts, or better to say, to linger in their
purlieus.
To describe the character and draw a true picture of this man
would be to write a history of a life of fraud, dishonor, and criminal
transactions, more especially that part of his life which had
transpired
since his professional degradation. He was one of those
broken-winded and dishonored members of the legal profession,
to be found in all large cities, who are driven to prostitute their
talents
and learning, no longer available in an honorable way, to the
basest of ends, advising for fees the rogue and the swindler, how
far they can trespass on the community without making themselves
amenable to the laws; and for this purpose carefully digest the
criminal laws that they may note and avail themselves of every
vantage point for the benefit of each lawless client, if the
applicants
to a man no longer recognized at the bar as a lawyer, can
properly
be said to be
clients
.
As he sat leaning back in his arm chair poring over the volume
which he held, from time to time he would thrust his big dirty hand,
into his thick, short, black hair and rub with great energy the top of
his head, a habit peculiar to him when perplexed, and closely
thinking
.
At the same time he would project out his under-lip and
purse in his upper, knit his beetle brows and thereby make himself
of aspect most hideous. But black and ugly as he looked, he
looked
intellectual still. His keen bright eye beamed with profound
intelligence and sagacity. And to do Simmins Satchell justice he
was an able lawyer and well read in his profession. He had the
talents and industry that, properly directed and rightly balanced by
moral sense, would have placed him, now in his forty-seventh year,
upon the bench instead of finding him a despised outlaw from his
noble
profession, catering to the lowest villanies that dishonor mankind.
It is not important to mention here the circumstances which led to
his degradation. It is sufficient to say that a natural or
educational
want of moral honesty was the cause and the secret of his
fall.
The day was drawing to a close as he sat leaning back in his
chair, to catch the light from the low windows with one knee laid
over the other. The windows looking into an alley and sunken under
the projecting roof, let in little light when the sun got low, and thus it
was evening in his room when the sun was shining brightly upon
the roof of the town. He was about to turn his book to catch
the fire-light, when he heard the rap at his door already alluded to.
He laid down the book and prepared to rise to go to the door and
admit the comer, when the tea-kettle began to boil. He stopped to
remove it from the hook, and in doing so forgot to use a newspaper
holder that lay at hand and thereby burned his hand so heavily,
that he dashed the kettle to the hearth and ripped out a series of
curses that would have done credit to his friend Tom Paine, in his
most blasphemous moments.
He placed the kettle upon its base again with the dimunition of
half its contents, and then the knock being a second time repeated
he approached the door and unlocking it, said grumly,
Come in!
And the prim little gentleman in the dapper hat walked in.
CHAPTER II.
THE LEVEE AT SATCHELL'S.
The
expression of the lawyer's face did not alter upon seeing
who his visitor was, so that it could not be guessed whether he
were glad or sorry to behold him. His countenance neither bore
the bland aspect of a welcome, nor the stern look of repulse. If
there was any peculiarity of expression to his dark features, it was
a slight ludicrous twist to them, caused by a feeling of lingering
pain in the palm of the hand, burned by the hot handle of the
tea-kettle
.
Good afternoon, or rather good evening, squire, said the man
in the olive-tinted gloves, lifting his hat with an air of respectful
consideration, as if his better spirit were awed by the spirit of the
lawyer. You see I am here to my appointment. Always keep
punctual time! Punctuality is the greatest human virtue that can
adorn humanity in my humble estimation!
Humph, ejaculated Satchell, with something like contempt
for him. Sit down, and let me hear what you have done?
And locking the door he returned to his chair, and resting his
arm upon the corner of the table and dropping his chin into the
hollow of his hand, he fixed his eyes steadfastly upon the delicate
red and white cheeks and small pale eyes of the gentleman in
olives.
Well, I have found a store,a capital store! I had not the
least difficulty in the world!
In what street?
street, No. 34.
Who is the landlord?
Mr. Wells,Mr. George Wells, added the speaker, refreshing
his memory by glancing at a paper in the top of his hat which
rested on his knees.
I know him! He is a good sort of a man for our purpose.
So I hope. But you are
sure
there is no danger, squire?
inquired
rather anxiously Mr. Peter Pindle, for this was the name of
the prim gentleman.
I have closely examined the law, and can assure you there is
none whatever. You cannot be touched by a criminal prosecution,
that is if you are guided by me in all points.
That we shall be, sir. We place the utmost confidence in your
judgment, sir, and knowledge of the laws. You know if we make
ourselves liable it will be a bad job, a very bad job.
The worst that can come against you will be a civil suit; but
I have satisfied your senior partner, Mr. Swindle, on that score.
Oh, ah, I dare say. If he is satisfied, I am.
I should suppose so; for Mr. Swindle is a man of experience
and sense. I mean no insinuations, Mr. Pindle, added Satchell,
with a sardonic expression about the corners of his mouth.
Oh, not the least, sirnot the least, answered Mr. Pindle, in
a quick, satisfied way. You seem to have just been about taking
tea, hey? Don't let me interrupt you. I can amuse myself till
Swindle comes in, looking over your books or the papers. Bless
me, what a lot of odds and ends though! I wonder how you find
any thing. Now I keep every thing in place. I am called a very
neat man, Mr. Satchell. I confess I
am
something soa little
precise
as it were. You see I have the bump of order marvellously
large! (Here Mister Pindle raised his fore-finger, and placed it
delicately so as not to disturb the nice arrangement of his hair, upon
the organ of self-esteem!) It is large you see, squire. The ladies
call me a pink, indeed they do! Now do you know,
Switchell
My name is Satchell, sir, interrupted the lawyer, who did not
seem to be at all noticing him, being busily putting some tea into a
tea-pot.
'Pon word, so 'tis. Beg pardon. I do confess I'm forgetful at
times. Now do you
What time will Mr. Swindle be here? interrupted the
lawyer
,
snapping him up with a sort of surly growl, something as an
old cross mastiff receives the annoyances of a pert puppy.
At seven precise, Mr. Satchell,'pon word I like to said
Switchell!
And the other parties, are they to be here?
That I can't positively say; but Swindle knows. He keeps
every thing to himself like a Plomatician.
It is now ten minutes to seven, said the lawyer, looking at a
large silver watch that lay upon the table, with a long steel chain
and smooth gold seal appended.
Pre
zactly, Mr. Satchell, repeated Mister Pindle, taking from
his vest pocket a very small ladies' gold lepine, and looking at it
with an air and in a way to make the most display of it. 'Pon
word, you must find it exceedingly dull living here alone; do your
own cooking too!
My housekeeping suits me, Mr. Pindle, responded Satchell,
sticking a piece of bread upon a fork and setting it down to the fire,
before which he had previously put his tea to steep on a few coals.
I am a plain liver, and a plain eater.
But it's so odd! People say you are so rich too! But it looks
awfully poor to live so! Here the precise pinky gentleman looked
about the room, and then rested his eyes upon the culinary
operations
with a slight shudder of delicate abhorrence.
The lawyer having toasted his bread very deliberately, quite as
deliberately as if his visitor had been a shadow, and made his tea,
poured out a cup of it, to which he added milk and brown sugar
from a pewter bowl, and pitcher which he took from the cupboard
over the mantel-piece. He then buttered his toast, and with a piece
of smoked herring as a relish, proceeded very composedly to eat his
supper on the corner of his table, his cup resting on Chitty's
Pleadings
,
his saucer on a copy of the Revised Statues, and his plate
upon the open volume of the Records of the Court of Sessions, while
his sugar bowl and cream-pot found a clear place of the table for
their accommodation.
Mr. Satchell ate and Mister Peter Pindle gazed in silence, as if he
thought it dangerous to interrupt the lion at his food. At length,
the lawyer rose up, after having drank four cups of tea, eaten four
slices of toast, and consumed a herring and a half, bones and all,
greatly to the amazement and curiosity of his spectator, who, with
his feet placed sharp up to supply the want of a fourth leg to the
chair, and his body bending forward, never took his eyes from
him until he had done.
The lawyer rose up to put away his dishes and light his pipe,
which when he had done it and re-seated himself, he began to
smoke with an air of the most enviable composure and utter
contempt
of the presence of Mr. Peter Pindle, thereby showing that he
was a very independent man, or else that Mr. Peter Pindle, spite of
his olive-tinted gloves and pants and blue cloak, dapper hat and
fashionable toed boots, was nobody.
And Mr. Prindle was
not
much of any body. His history up to
this time can be told in a few sentences. He was the son of a
tallow
chandler in a thriving town not far from Plymouth Rock, and
being by nature of a fair complexion and delicate personal
appearance
,
he had been put behind a man-milliner's store, to sell tape,
silk ribbons, and other articles usually sold by females. If possible
his occupation rendered him still more effeminate than before.
Finally, he got to be a junior partner in a retail thread and needle
store, and being smart, ambitious, and wholly destitute of principle,
using truth and falsehood indiscriminately, just as they would serve
his purpose, he made money and got credit. By and by his partner
died, and he took into copartnership a fashionable dry goods dealer,
and combined the two kinds of business. In a year or two he
dropped the thread and needle part of the business, and moving
into a fashionable store, devoted himself to the retail dry goods
selling. His credit increased. He filled the papers with his long,
flashy advertisement, till Peter Pindle's name, though he was but
a dapper, kid-glove little man, made a great show and as often met
the eyes as Brandreth's.
But Mr. Pindle lived very expensively, boarding at the most
stylish hotel, and spending money very lavishly upon enjoyments.
He got into debt, and times becoming hard, even so that fashionable
ladies saved their money and let their last fashions go another
season
;
he was forced to close his mahogany doors and plate-glass
windows, the landlord placing upon them a placard, To Let.
Mr. Pindle, however, was still Mr. Pindle, though he was in debt
and could not pay twenty cents in the dollar. He succeeded in
getting credit again and stocking anew, and in six months sold out
at cost, and failed a second time.
It was impossible for him to get credit again, though he had
impudence
enough to try it. He was known and marked. He at
length left his hotel and took lodgings less conspicuous, and his
circumstances
growing desperate, he began to cast about in his mind
how he should retrieve his circumstances. There chanced to board
at the same house with him a broken speculator by the name of
Swindle, a man about forty years of age, who had been at one time
in his life worth a hundred thousand dollars, but now was in debt
for his last quarter's board, without means to meet it.
There is always a secret sympathy and instinctive understanding
between the minds of unprincipled men, even before they speak
with each other. They seem at a glance to measure one another,
and to recognize a likeness to themselves.
Pindle had not been three days in his new quarters when he saw
that Swindle was a man after his own heart; and Swindle saw
that Pindle was quite as desperate a character as himself. The
two men came together naturally without introduction, and soon
formed an intimacy based upon similarity of characters, condition,
and hopes.
The result of their growing amity was a determination to combine
in some way so as to bring about a change in their circumstances
for the better. Mr. Swindle was a cautious man. He did not
wish to commit himself so as to be amenable to the law. He
wished
to retain the outward form of a character, however he might be
destitute of its substance. He wished to act in whatever he did so
that the law could not take hold of him. He impressed his friend
Pindle with the cautious action.
Now what can we do, Swindle? said Pindle, after they had
so far interchanged sentiments as to understand that each were
prepared to do any thing however fraudulent, provided they could
steer within the letter of the law. Something must be done; I
am run dry; I have not twenty dollars in the world, and this suit
of clothes shabby enough. You have not but the two dollars I lent
you this morning; though your clothes are more decent than mine.
I am ready to do any thing!
Suppose we consult Satchell, observed Swindle.
And who is Satchell, pray? asked Pindle.
Softlydon't talk quite so loud, said Mr. Swindle; we must
be cautious, for I would not like to be overheard. The partitions
are there, and key-holes are made expressly to convey sounds to
listeners'
ears.
This conversation took place in Mr. Swindle's room, a small
upper
chamber in a fourth rate boarding house in Court Street, over a
confectioner's, where they boarded.
Satchell is a lawyer who was once one of the most talented
members of the bar, but he was degraded, I believe for a forgery,
and imprisoned a year, and now devotes his talents to giving advice
to rogues!
But we are not rogues, dear Swindle, remarked Pindle,
looking
very virtuous.
I
am a gentleman, sir.
Very well, you are a gentleman; I am willing. Satchell is a
man who knows every crook and turn of the criminal law, and just
how far to a hair a man can encroach upon it, without incurring
its penalties. I know some men he has done service to, and the
more I think of it the more I am satisfied he is the man to see,
before
we do any thing.
But what are you thinking of doing?
Of establishing a house and going into business.
Without capital?
Yes.
Without credit?
Yes.
'Pon word, I don't understand it, exclaimed Mr. Pindle, with
very great amazement manifested on his inexpressive pink and
white face.
Well, you shall know if you will call with me on Satchell.
The visit was paid to Mr. Rogues' Lawyer, and advice given
accordingly by the unconscientious Satchell. This interview took
place about ten days prior to the opening of this story, and in the
interval affairs had been progressing to a point from which bold
and resolute action was to begin. The nature of the business, and
the character of the others engaged in it besides Swindle and
Pindle
,
will be revealed by the interview now about to occur between
all the parties in Satchell's office, Pindle being the first comer.
Satchell having, as we have seen, completed his supper and
taken his pipe, had not smoked but a few minutes before a person
was heard stumbling up the stairs.
That is Swindle, said Pindle, jumping up and going to the
loor.
Don't be in a hurry, Mr. Pindle, cried the lawyer; I can let
in my own visiters.
Mr. Pindle slunk back, coloring, and the attorney turning the
key looked carefully before opening the door. He then admitted a
stout built man, about five feet and a half high, with a full, red
face, and a look of respectability. He took off his hat, and
exhibited
a round bald head shining like glass. His eyes were small hazel
orbs that sparkled with a quick, lively light, yet the expression of
his face was shrinking and hidden, as if he feared to trust his
countenance
too freely to be the index of his soul. He wore a brown
surtout and a white beaver hat, and carried an India cane. His
appearance altogether was that of a middle-aged commercial
gentlemen
,
of a fair reputation and independent circumstances. It
was, however, no other than James Swindle, who had not a dollar
of his own on earth, and whose reputation was worthless, except in
roguedom, where it stood high. Like Satchell in law, he had in
the mercantile world been dishonored, and now used his
commercial
talents and experience to further the basest of frauds.
Ah, Mr. Swindle, said Satchell; glad to see you! but the
lawyer did not shake hands with him, for it was Satchell's principle
never to shake hands with any body.
I am here in time, said Mr. Swindle, looking round to see who
was there. Ah, Mr. Pindle, so you are on the spot!
Yes, sir, always punctual, answered Pindle, in his usual
flippant
,
quick, self-satisfied way; for Pindle was a most
self-approving
individual, for such a thorough faced rogue as he was. It is
not certain whether Pindle was villain enough to commit a murder.
It is likely he would have failed in the courage to do such a deed.
But all other crimes less than murder he was ready to do, so that
he could escape the law. For such a delicate complexioned
gentleman
,
he was quite as great a villain as Satchell. In fact, the
three men were very well matched in the internals, though in
externals
they appeared like very opposite sort of persons, and such as
would not be likely to have any interests in common. By and by
other knocks were heard at the door, and in less than a quarter of
an hour after Mr. Swindle's entrance Satchell admitted into his
dark den seven other persons of various sizes, ages, and dress, but
all one in roguery.
CHAPTER III.
THE COMBINATORS IN CONCLAVE.
The
visitors whom Satchell admitted one after the other,
stumbled
about as well as they could in the dark office to find seats,
some of them occupying barrels and boxes and others such places
as they could avail themselves of. The office was by this time
nearly wrapped in darkness, for the day had closed; a faint flicker
light from the fire only cast its uncertain radiance upon the faces
and forms of the singularly disposed group. After they were
seated
,
Satchell lighted a tallow candle and after deliberately sticking
it into the neck of an ink-bottle, resumed his seat in the leathern
arm chair. He then gazed round upon his visitors with a
scorching
glance from beneath his pent-house brows. They all sat
awaiting his pleasure to speak. The last comers looked like
fair-dealing
citizens of the town, so far as dress and appearance went,
being neatly appareled, clean shaved and genteel.
Well, gentlemen, said Satchell, thrusting out his under lip in
quite an august way, we are all assembled, I believe.
Yes, sir, we are all here, responded Mr. Pindle.
Very well. Now as this meeting will be our last before we go
into operation, all the matters should be thoroughly discussed and
understood.
Yes, sir, they should be, Mr. Satchell, responded a heavy
man, with a deep
baritone
voice, and an enormous nose. We
must have all the law clear; we can't run risks and then be found
in the wrong.
No; we put our whole faith in you, Squire Satchell, called
out a squeaking, thin, violin voice, from a slender gentleman in
spectacles, who was seated upon the edge of a barrel, and seemed
rather uneasy on his seat too; we pay you and you must protect
us.
True, Mr. Satchell, Mr. Haul speaks truly, said a man in a
camblet wrapper, who looked half gone in consumption, and who
coughed with a painful hollow sound at every third word.
We
have all the risks to run, while you receive sure profits and without
any capital.
Talking of capital, gentlemen, responded the lawyer, with a
sardonic smile, I think we are pretty much upon an equality. I
have closely examined into the criminal law governing the crime
of obtaining goods under false and fictitious pretences, and I can
assure you that in the enterprise you contemplate you run no risk
whatsoever.
So that we keep within the pale of the criminal law, said Mr.
Swindle, we care not a snap of the finger for civil tribunals.
Yes, that is the general sentiment, said a young man about
three and twenty, with a very keen gray eye, and a small thin
mouth, always pursed up, as if he were playing at cards and was
hesitating whether to play his trump card or trust his partner. He
was dressed in a blue frock coat buttoned to the chin, a black stock,
and a Panama hat; for it was early in the month of October,a
time when the summer gear struggles to hold out against the
innovations
of Winter's costume, especially with individuals like the
young gentlemen in question, whose purses are as light as their
pants.
Yes, that is all we care for, responded the heavy man with
the base voice. Keep us out of the clutches of the criminal law,
and we'll laugh at a civil prosecution.
That is my intention, gentlemen, responded Satchell. I
have here written out a digest of the records of all cases parellel to
the present matter. I have carefully dissected and analyzed them,
submitting them to the severest test. No vantage point has escaped
my scrutiny. If you will listen, I will read to you the result.
Here Mr. Satchell from three or four pages of closely written
manuscript read an abstract of all the reports of cases for obtaining
fraudulently the property of others. He also read notes of his own
appended, showing by what means each particular statute could be
evaded with safety.
This reading was listened to with marked attention, and seemed
to be received with very decided approbation by the gentlemen
present.
Now you see, gentlemen, just how far you can go and yet keep
within the law. It depends now on yourselves to go forward and
make a profitable business operation together. Are you ready to
proceed to action? Mr. Pindle informs me that he has hired a
suitable
store
Before a reply could be given, the company were electrified by a
sudden burst of eloquent recitation proceeding from the room on
the right. The speaker's voice was elevated in a sort of
triumphant
ecstasy. What he said could be distinguished plainly, being
enunciated in the true vein heroic:
Oh, what can compare
To the beautious hair,
That flows in tresses wild
About the brow
Of Parian snow
Of Beauty's lovely child?
Tell me, ye gods, oh tell!
The secret charm that throws
Such a bewildering spell
As in each ringlet flows?
'Tis the priceless Oil of Lil,
For sale by Mr. Rowland Hill!
Fifty cents a box will buy!
Pretty maiden, will you try?
It will make your tresses shine,
And your beauty be divine!
'Pon honor! what can all that mean? ejaculated Mr. Pindle,
who with the rest of the company had been listening with
amazement
.
It will do! continued the voice. By the immortal
Hercules
,
it will do! It is worth two cents a line if it is worth one.
That is a poetical gentleman, who calls himself Mr. Frederick
Byron Rhymewell, said Mr. Satchell, with a smile. He has
lately taken that room, and is doubtless a very harmless person.
So don't look as if you had been overheard plotting a conspiracy.
Be assured if he hears us he thinks of nothing but his doggrel
rhyme, which he makes at so much a line for the shopdealers to
stick in the newspapers.
He seems to be a very noisy individual, sir, said the stout
gentleman with the basson voice, resuming his seat upon the edge
of a box, from which the sudden voice had started him. We
must talk lower, gentle
men
.
Some few low murmurings were still heard from the poet's room,
as if he was buzzing over his copy and correcting it for the press.
I asked you, gentlemen, if you were ready to commence
operations
?
observed the lawyer, once more calling their attention to
the matter before them.
Yes, I believe we are, replied Mr. Swindle, who seemed to
have a certain importance and weight of character among them.
Pindle has the store, he says. Where is it?
No. 34,  Street. I hire from Mr. George Wells, the
shipping
merchant.
I know him. He will do.
So I told him, answered Satchell. Now I wish you to
detail
to me your plan, as I have laid down the law. I can then
judge whether it can be carried out safely.
Our plan is this, responded Mr. Swindle, in a low tone, so as
not to be overheard by the poet in the adjoining room, and in
stating it there need be no mincing of words between us; for we
know one another. Without money, without means, without
character, and without friends, we have combined together to rob
the public, but to rob so as to evade justice. These are the two
great points of our operations. For this we are bound together in
u solemn compact. We have not always been what we are now,
but circumstances have driven us to this course. We are men
whose minds have become so perverted that we cannot follow even
if we could find any honest occupation. There is not one who
hears me that could be honest a month. You see I speak plainly.
We are assembled here, a set of desperate spirits in combination, to
cheat, defraud, plunder an unsuspecting community. We are
united by the same interests. We have sworn to the same
compact
.
I will now, as I promised at our last meeting, lay before
you my plan of operations then hinted to you. It is as follows.
Here the members of the combination drew closer together
so as to be nearer the speaker, and all listened with intense
attention
.
2
In the first place, I propose, as I did on that occasion, that we
select a fictitious firm as the
basis
of our operations.
That is already chosen, said Mr. Pindle. Swindle, Pindle
& Co.
Yes, unless the gentlemen present prefer another, observed
Mr. Swindle, bowing round blandly.
I see no necessity of another, remarked the lawyer.
None whatever. We could not have a better house, or better
men for the operation, answered several voices, among which was
heard the baritone of the heavy gentleman.
Such being your pleasure, my friends, resumed Mr. Swindle,
I am ready to perform my part to the best of my abilities. A firm
being chosen and a counting-room being obtained, this is the mode
of proceeding that I submit. The first thing is for us to engage a
carpenter, painter, and upholsterer to fit up the counting-room in a
very splendid style, to attract the eye and give an idea of capital
at the bottom. We shall then employ a printer to get up a very
showy, neat card, stating our business, &c., `
Swindle, Pindle
&
Co., Commission Merchants, and Land and Real Estate Brokers.'
We must then send our card to a stationer, and get him to send us
all the stationery, books, &c., that we want. Upon our card will
be the references to my friends here, who will have offices similarly
fitted up in other parts of the city, or else hire a desk in some large
counting-room. Swindle, Pindle & Co. will refer the stationer to
Breter, Freter & Co., added the speaker, bowing to the heavy
gentleman and the slim gentleman, to designate them; and also
to Charles Caregee & Co., who will also have a handsome place of
business, and honor our references! here he bowed to the
consumptive
gentleman in the camblet wrapper. Thus we will
establish
a firm and references, gentlemen, and then prepare to make
our purchases.
Do you mean to put your own names upon the business card
as the head firm? asked the lawyer. If you do, you will be
liable.
I so understand you, Mr. Satchell.
No, you would then be amenable in all your subsequent
operations
to the law. The law would know where to find its men.
No, no, that won't do. And besides, you and Pindle are too well
known, for persons to place any confidence in you. You must
choose a fictitious name for your firm. The firm should be
composed
of nobodies, while the references should be
real
.
I see now my error, sir, answered Mr. Swindle. You are
correct. Let me hear what further suggestions you can make; for
now you have an outline of my project, and can with your
shrewdness
no doubt improve upon it.
I think I can. You propose to go into business as a
Commission
House, with no other capital than the references to your
copartners
here present, who will, like you, have offices, where they
will satisfy in the most favorable manner all persons who inquire
about you.
Yes.
Very well; then this is your plan. But I shall charge you one
hundred dollars more for suggesting it.
You shall have it, answered the three gentlemen in specs.
Out of your first gains?
Yes, answered Mr. Swindle, somewhat reluctantly.
If, then, you would make all secure, you will follow my
directions
closely, and I will guaranty you a profitable and safe
business
.
Hire first your counting-room, and get your carpenters,
painters, and upholsterers to fit it up in the style you proposed, and
let them call for their pay some other day, for the excuse that
much money to pay out just in starting will be accepted by them,
and they will waittill they get it. Your stationer will trust you
on seeing your card and references, which you will send to him,
but he will first go and give you a call to look round, and perhaps
call on one of your referees, who must be ready to satisfy
him of your goodness and substantiality. The name on your card,
instead of being your own may be Moonshine, Clouds & Co.,
which is as good as any thing. Your
references
must be
real
names, such as are here present. In the offices of the referees
there need not be so much to meet the eye, but merely a show of
business, desks, maps hung round, old ledgers piled up, and a sort
of busy confusion of humbugery about.
But, sir, what am
I
to do? inquired Mr. Pindle.
You and Mr. Swindle are to be in the counting-room of course.
He, from his respectable air and mercantile gravity of countenance,
will be there as clerk of the firm, to receive callers, buyers or
purchasers
.
You will be the out-doors man to make purchases and
bring business to the house, for which you are very well fitted.
Mr. Swindle will be in the counting-room, always ready to receive
merchandize and packages of goods which you order to be sent to
your firm, that is the firm of Moonshine, Clouds & Co., to which
you are of course only an out-door clerk. It will be important, of
course, Mr. Pindle, that you transact business with merchants who
do not know you.
Of course, sir, that is understood.
It should be, sir, resumed the lawyer and master spirit of this
conclave of rogues. It would be very unfortunate for you to
appear
at all busy in the presence of those who have had experience
of your business affairs. Keep out of their way and out of their
line, which is the wholesale dry goods. Your business in the
present enterprise must lie entirely with a different class of
merchants
,
and in different streets from your old haunts. All will be
new and clear before you. The articles you will deal in will be
principally such articles as are afloat in the market, and pass from
purchaser to purchaser without moving from the original storage,
copper, hides, wool, cochineal, gunny-bags, tea, coffee, raisins,
Mediterranean and Brazilian goods, &c.. You will proceed in all
your operations with the confidence and boldness of men who have
large monied capital, and who intend to pay cash on delivery.
But how would you chalk out a single operation, sir, as a model
specimen? asked Mr. Swindle, with a look of deference to the
knowledge and sagacity of the lawyer.
In this way. You have, suppose, all ready in the
counting-room
,
your cards prepared and yourselves also. You have your
referees at their desks, wherever that may be, and prepared to
satisfy all inquisitive persons.
Very well, so far, so good, remarked Mr. Pindle, kicking his
feet delightedly against the sides of the barrel. Now to the
particulars
.
Oh, Rose, coal brack Rose!
I hope I may be scotch'd
If I don't lub Rose!
'Pon honor! exclaimed Mr. Pindle, at this sudden outburst of
negro melody from the boot-black's premises underneath. What
is
that?
Yes, what in the dl is
that?
demanded the heavy
gentleman
,
in a tone of surprise. You have odd lodgers, Mr.
Satchell!
That is black Handy, who rents a room below, answered
Satchell, dryly. He always sings that particular song when he
begins to black up his boots. You can't stop him. If he don't sing
he can't polish. I've got quite used to him, gentlemen.
'Pon honor, ejaculated Mr. Pindle, as Handy's voice rose in
volume and melody, I think he must suppose
we
love his Rose
too!
CHAPTER IV.
THE CONCLAVE.
The
boot-black had not been singing more than two-thirds of a
minute, when a second voice was heard from the room beneath the
poet's. It was that of Kaleb Kemp, the cobbler. It was shrill and
broken, and by no means had that volume of melody that Handy
poured forth from his lungs. The words of Mr. Kemp's song
reached the amazed ears of the conclave:
Old King Cole was a merry old soul,
And a merry old soul was he;
He wore an old coat with one button-hole,
And buckles all down at the knee!
Then, by way of a rapping chorus, the little cobbler began to play
a lively rap-a-tap in turn upon lap-stone.
Bless me! ejaculated the heavy gentleman; you seem to
have a merry set of lodgers!
And confounded noisy, observed the thin gentleman in
spectacles
,
very positively.
And as independent as emperors, remarked Mr. Swindle, with
a confirmatory emphasis.
I don't see, 'pon honor, how you live here, Satchell, suggested
Mr. Pindle, as Handy, not to be outdone by the cobbler, his
neighbor
,
struck up the next verse of his song in a louder key.
They pay me rent, gentlemen; and one will, you know, put up
with a great many things for money. I can't rent my house,
except
to such people; and, to tell you the truth, I have no objections
to a little vocal music now and then.
You are fond of poetry, I presume, too, sarcastically observed
the consumptive gentleman, after a severe spasm of coughing, in a
tone so hollow that he seemed to be coughing into the mouth of a
hogshead. This remark was elicited by another outburst from the
poet in the adjoining chamber:
O, all ye crooked, twisted men,
If ye would be like Greek Adonis,
Haste to Tompkins', No. Ten,
The only fitter that in town is,
And he will make you coat and pants
Fit for a wedding or a dance;
Every lady will admire,
And for your hand at once aspire
Here the combined lungs of the cobbler and Handy drowned the
poet's less vigorous voice, and for a moment it seemed as if the
conclave in the lawyer's room would break up in confusion.
Satchell saw this, and stamped with his feet upon the floor to
silence
the boot-black, and, rising, knocked upon the partition to stop
the heroic recitations of the poet. The cobbler, however, being
beyond the influence of his landlord's authority, kept still on with
his scraps of songs, interlarded with hammering upon his lap-stone,
but not to the interruption of the business of the meeting.
Now, gentlemen, if you will listen to me, I will finish what
I was saying, observed the lawyer. All your arrangements
made as I have said, one of youMr. Pindle, for instancewill
start forth on a sunny morning to see who wants to sell. You
must seek some
new
firm, Mr. Pindle; for new firms are more
anxious to sell than old ones, are less likely to suspect, and are less
keen at a bargain than your old establishments. Generally, you
will find them over-solicitous to make a trade, and will be satisfied
if your references say you are good, though they never saw either
of their faces before. An old firm will generally require references
from
references, until they follow the scent up to some persons they
well know are responsible. You will therefore seek out a new
firm.
Yes, sir, answered Mr. Pindle, who was listening with the
greatest attention, as also were the rest. But this would not have
occurred to me! What a confounded long head you have, Mr.
Satchell!
Mr. Satchell did not seem to be particularly moved by this
compliment
to the shrewdness of his roguery, and thus resumed:
When you have fixed your eye upon such a firm, green and
over-anxious to sell, you go in with a bold face, and walk up to the
desk with the air of a man who has ten thousand dollars in his
pocket-book to buy with. You will pass the compliments of the
day, such as a cheerful `Good day, sir! how do you do, sir?' If
he answers you in the same way, you will immediately proceed to
business, saying, `Sir, I see, by the morning's paper, that you have
on sale fifteen barrels tapioca, and twenty baskets. We have just
had an order for twelve barrels, which we must fill up forthwith.
What is your price?' `We have the article,' your merchant will
reply. `Should be glad to sell you. Our terms, cash, or approved
paper at sixty days, or ninety, as the case may be. You shall have
it cheaper than you can get it elsewhere in the market.' You will
then, having heard his price, Mr. Pindle, reply, that you are
perfectly
satisfied, and at once tell him that you will take twelve
barrels, ordering him to send it to your store without delay. Then
you will hand him your card in an off-hand manner, saying, `Here
is our house-card, sir, and, as you see, with the most satisfactory
references.' The splendid card, with the firm of Moonshine,
Clouds & Co., with the respectable array of names as references,
will dazzle his eye. You then bow very politely, but hurriedly,
and, as you go out, you see some boxes of raisins and drums of figs.
You ask the price, and order fifty of one and seventy of the other
to be sent also; for `you recollect that you were desired to purchase
if you could find any fresh.'
You will then take your departure, leaving the merchant
congratulating
himself, and rubbing his hands together with
satisfaction
at having got such a capital customer, and made such a prompt
and profitable sale of his merchandize. Let us imagine the scene.
A smile is upon his face, and he looks round upon his clerks like a
man who has drawn a prize in a lottery. `John!' he calls to his
confidential clerk. `
Sir!
' `Do you know any of these referees?'
`
No, I do not, sir, but I dare say they are good. They look so
.'
`Yes. Take your hat, and call upon one or two of them.' `Yes,
sir.' We now suppose our heavy friend here, with the bass voice,
is at his desk when John comes in. `
Good morning
, sir,' says
John, favorably impressed with the business-like air of the
counting-room
,
and still more favorably with the respectable appearance
of our friend here, who at once understands what his visitor wants.
`Good morning, sir!' he responds, blandly; `a fine day, sir.' `
Yes,
sir. Here is a card, sir
,' observes the clerk, `which bears your firm
as a reference.' And he politely lays it before our copartner. `All
correct, sir. Messrs. Moonshine, Clouds & Co. are rather a new
house, but perfectly good. You see by my books,' (for books are
to be presumed to show,) `that I have sold them thousands of
dollars'
worth on credit and cash. I am ready to do it again, to any
amount they want.' This is said to the clerk in a very imposing
decided way, calculated to impress. The clerk bows, is satisfied,
takes his leave, and returns to the firm which sent him, which we
will call, for distinctness' sake, `Green & Shallow.' `
Perfectly
satisfactory
,' answers the clerk to the inquiring eye of Mr. Shallow,
as he enters the counting-room. `They showed me their books
where they had sold this firm hundreds and hundreds of dollars'
worth, both on cash and credit. They said they were ready to do
it again, and to any amount they might want. He says there are
not more punctual men in town, sir.'
`Then, as all is right,' says Mr. Green, looking at Mr. Shallow,
`we will send the articles round at once. Michael!' he calls out
to his handcartman, `call a dray to take the raisins and figs, while
you load up with the tapioca; and have the goods all taken at once
to the counting-house of Messrs. Moonshine, Clouds & Co.'
In the mean while, resumed the lawyer to his listening
auditors
,
we will suppose that, while the clerk went to see our heavy
friend here, Mr. Shallow, the junior partner,
dropped in
at the
counting-house of Moonshine & Co., to look about. Appearances
are satisfactory,
very;
and he returns, and so has reported to the
senior, before the clerk comes back with his glowing account.
Well, the articles are all sent off on drays and in handcart to the
place of business of the purchasers.
And now comes the rub, sir, observed Mr. Swindle, who had
listened with admiration to the process of proceeding thus far.
You ought to have been a merchant, Mr. Satchell. But I have
some curiosity to know how you are going to get the articles into
our possession; for, of course, the
bill
will be at once sent with
them.
You will find that it will take a
lawyer
to get along with the
affair at this crisis, answered Mr. Satchell, with a secret smile of
conscious power. Listen, gentlemen; for I wish to detail
perfectly
to your understanding the whole plan of action by which, in
less than twenty-four hours after you commence business, you will
be able to
retire
with very handsome profits.
There was a general movement to get a little nigher the speaker,
and ears were bent with the closest attention.
Mr. Pindle having done his part of the business, that is, the
purchasing
part, Mr. Swindle will now be ready to act. His
appearancevery respectable and grave, as you see, gentlemen
will be all in his favor. Here there was a spontaneous leveling
of the eyes at the person of Mr. Swindle, and apparently with
approval
.
Mr. Swindle withstood the inspection with that modesty
which was one of his remarkable characteristics. The drays
arrive at the counting-room door of Moonshine, Clouds & Co. The
clerk, John, enters at the same moment, with the bill of articles,
receipted; the amount some three thousand dollars, which he
expects in five minutes to find represented in his pocket by a check
on a bank in State street. He enters, and glances round for Mr.
Pindle, the only one of the firm he has ever seen, and who, as he
had been given to understand by Mr. Pindle, represented the `Co.'
of the firm. But Mr. Pindle, at this particular moment, is
not in
.
But he sees Mr. Swindle, and, supposing him, from his respectable
appearance and gray hairs, to be the senior partner, he approaches
him, and suggests, very politely, that he probably has the pleasure
of addressing Mr. Moonshine, or Mr. Clouds. Mr. Swindle replies,
with a slight blush, that he has not the honor of being either of
those distinguished gentlemen; that his position is only a clerk.
Mr. John stares, but is confirmed in the stability of a house that
has such respectable clerks as Mr. Swindle. If the clerk is such a
weighty-looking personage, what must be the principals? He now
inquires where the firm is, and
when
they will either of them be in;
and, having seen Mr. Pindle already, he asks particularly for that
gentleman.
`The firm are out,' responds Mr. Swindle, `and will be in in
the afternoon, or certainly in the morning before bank hours. If
you have any business, leave it with me, or call to-morrow.'
`I have here the bill of the tapioca, raisins, and figs, which
your Mr. Pindle bought of our house, and the articles are delivered
at the door. Did he leave any instructions for you to settle it?'
`No, he did not. He will, however, be in himself before long.
You had best wait,' answers Mr. Swindle, offering him a chair;
`or, if you will call again in an hour, you will be sure to find
him in.'
The goods, in the mean while, resumed the lawyer, are
unladed
from the drays, and placed on the sidewalk. The clerk,
having no suspicion whatever, and not caring to wait, goes away,
with the intention of returning in an hour. The articles he will
leave behind, of course. He is no sooner out of sight with the
drays, than Pindle makes his appearance out of the safe-closet, and
immediately orders a new set of drays, piles on the articles, and
hurries them off to an auction-room, or to some dealer who will
buy at once, and turns them into cash. This operation you will
perform as many times in the day you open for business as possible;
and, if you are industrious, and faithful, and fortunate, you ought
to make at least forty thousand dollars by a single day's operation.
You can then
vacate
your places of business, and come here and
share your spoils. Now, gentlemen, you have the outline of my
plan, concluded the lawyer, and I submit it to your decision.
There could be none betternone better! exclaimed the
conclave of rogues, unanimously.
You deserve to be the prince of swindledom! cried Pindle,
with exultation. We can see with half an eye, from our
experience
in business, that your plan will be easily carried out. What
a capital business man has been spoiled in your becoming a
lawyer!
You have shown great skill and depth, I must confess, said
Swindle. The whole plan seems to promise the most perfect
success.
I can make at least a dozen such operations in a day, answered
Pindle. 'Pon honor, Satchell, you deserve a vote of thanks! I
rise, gentlemen, to propose
Wait, Pindle! cried the heavy gentleman; wait till we
succeed. There is time enough then. I want to be sure that these
operations won't involve us, and get some of us into prison. There
is none of us here that cares a fig for a civil suit for debt; for, as
we have no characters to lose, nor money either, we can laugh at
such suits. Those who sue will have to pay the costs. But I feel
ticklish about the criminal law. Can you make us sure on that
point, Mr. Satchell?
Perfectly, sir. The statute I have discussed and examined
closely. You can go into this operation with perfect security that
the law can't touch you. You may buy for cash on delivery, or in
any other manner that will enable you to get possession of your
goods, without any fears. When once they are in your hands, and
are immediately carted off to some unknown quarter, they can't
of course trace them and get them back. They will then resort to
a civil suit, if they can find you, or perhaps a criminal one for
obtaining
goods on false pretences. Neither of these, however, will
be of any avail. The former will only add to their `profit and
loss.' The latter, I assure you, gentlemen, has failed in every
instance where such rogues as you areno offence meanthave
been criminally arraigned; for you are not the first gentlemen
whom I have advised legally in such operations. You go to the
District Attorney, and he will tell youat least, he will tell your
victimsthat he cannot convict. Thus, if you see fit to stand the
suit, you can do so, and keep open your counting-rooms after the
first day, and do your best to make further `operations' upon those
who do not know you. But there is some risk that your firm may
be warned against in the papers, by an advertisement signed by
your victims; so I would advise you, if your first day's operations
prove profitable, that you close the concern the same night, leaving
your desks, &c. to the carpenters and upholsterers who
loaned
them.
Now, gentlemen, it remains with you to go forward and bring my
plans into action.
And that we shall do at once, answered Mr. Swindle.
After some further conversation and discussion of the minor
points of preparation, the conclave broke up and retired, to
commence
operations on the ensuing day.
[1]
[1]
In these chapters, we have laid open actual transactions.
CHAPTER V.
THE POET.
When
the lawyer was left alone he snuffed his candle and threw
himself back in his chair with an air of very decided satisfaction.
I shall make a thousand dollars at the least by this affair,
he said aloud. They run all the risk and have the whole trouble,
while I only give my advice. I have the utmost confidence in the
whole plan. Swindle and Pindle are both the right sort of men.
They will carry it through.
He was interrupted in his meditations by a low, timid knock at
his door.
Another visitor! It is past nine o'clock. I wonder who it
can be?
He rose and went to the door, but did not unlock it, but
demanded
who was there?
It is
me
, Mr. Satchell, answered a soft voice.
Who is me?
Byron! simpered the lips without.
Oh, my poet, hey! answered Satchell, unlocking the door and
letting him in.
The visitor was a very slender, pale-faced young gentleman, with
very long light hair, very much tangled, very large wandering blue
eyes, and no beard. He was dressed very shabbily in a black coat
out at the elbows, shrunken up trowsers, a vest double-breasted
pinned for want of buttons close up to his throat, which was
encircled
by a seedy black handkerchief. He looked altogether like a
young gentleman in distress, and had an air at once meek and proud,
the pride of conscious genius struggling with conscious poverty.
His hair was brushed back from his high forehead, and a pen
behind
the right ear protruded itself through the uncombed locks.
Good even Sare, said the poet, bowing very politely, and
looking at the same time very grave, I have taken the liberty to
intrude
upon you, Sir, to solicit the honor of the loan of about half an
inch of candle!
What do you want with candle? asked Mr. Satchell with a
smile of curiosity.
Why, Sare, I am exceedingly mortified to have to make this
request
of you, but I have been penning an ode and had just finished
all but seven lines when as the fates would have it, my candle
expired very suddenly and mysteriously in the socket, and I was
left in Hadean darkness. It is important Sare, that the ode should
be completed to night, as it must be taken to the printers to appear,
without fail in the morning's paper! So you perceive, Sare, the
infinite
importance of my request for the loan, temporarily of half an inch
of candle!
Here Mr. Frederick Byron Rhymewell bowed with great gravity
and courtesy.
Come in and finish your ode, Mr. Rhymewall at my candle, if
you have a mind to. I am sorry to say that this is my last one!
Sare, you are exceedingly polite. I would avail myself of your
very handsome offer, but really Sare, there are certain difficulties
that attend genius, which perhaps, Sare, you may not properly
appreciate
!
Will you believe it, Mr. Satchell I cannot compose a line
unless I have my own ink-stand before me and papers and the
things I am used to, and then my face must be towards the same
corner of the room!
Indeed, well then I will take my candle into your room and
wait until you complete your ode!
I am grateful, Sare, for your condescension!
Not at all, answered the lawyer taking his light and following
the poet into his own room. This was an apartment about eight
feet square and wholly destitute of furniture, save a wretched little
table, a chair to match, and a dingy mattrass rolled up in the
corner
.
The rest was bare floor and bare walls. It was lighted by
day by a single window, which had fewer panes of glass than
shingle
and rag panes. Upon the table was a cork ink-stand, a few
sheets of browny-white cap-paper, a pen worn to the stump, and a
rhyming dictionary very much dog-leafed and thumb-worn. A
scrap-book lay, also, upon the table, containing the various printed
poems and odes which Mr. Frederick Byron Rhyme well had
written
for the newspapers at the order of shop-keepers, at a penny
a line.
Be seated, Mr. Satchell, said the poet, handing him the only
chair.
No, I can stand!
By no means, Sare! I insist! I can write my poem upon one
knee! I often do!
Here he placed the chair, broken at the back and half its seat
whittled away with a penknife, for his landlord to sit in, while he
dropped gracefully upon one knee before his table, where he had
placed the light, seized his pen, dipped it in the ink, and then
elevated
his chin and eyes to a dimly seen dark spot in the corner of the
ceiling, and seemed all at once to forget that he was not alone. In
an instant he was lost in the world of abstraction. Suddenly he
started as if he had been electrified and dashed the words of
inspiration
off upon his paper with the speed of thought. It was like the
race of Pegasus. The ink flew in spatters as gravel might be
supposed
to fly from the hoofs of Pegasus. In an instant one line was
penned and up went chin and eyes in fine phrenzy rolling in search
of another line in the dingy spot in the corner. At length it was
seized and penned down upon the paper, below the other. Five
more lines followed in rapid succession, and with a tremendous
flourish
of the last word, Mr. Rhymewell triumphantly exclaimed,
It is done! a quarter earned in two hours and a half!
You seem to be pursuing quite a profitable business of it,
observed
the lawyer, who had silently awaited the conclusion of the
poem.
Yes, toler
a
bly, Sare! I have a few good patrons, Sare! But
money I do not think of. It is fame and immortality, Mr. Satchell!
he very earnestly replied.
True, that is the main point, I dare say! You said you had
but seven lines to complete your ode, when you come into my room.
Do you always calculate the lengths beforehand?
Oh yes! This is a twenty-five line poem, Sare! Twenty-five
cents was all Mr. Cologne said he could give me!
You are writing it for a purfumer then?
Oh, yes, Sir! Let me read it to you.
I am quite satisfied it possesses merit! Don't take the trouble!
But the first line Sare! You must know, Mr. Cologne is a very
fashionable retail dealer in cosmetics. His rival, Mr. Lavender
got me last week to write him a poetical advertisement; well, you
see it took amazingly. You have no idea how it brought custom
to the shop. A perfect rush, Sare! 'Saw your sweet poetry, Mr.
Lavender, says a beautiful lady, `and come to see what you
had!' You have no idea, Sare! Well, Mr. Cologne finding how
things were going, sends to me this morning to write him one that
should out-clipse that I wrote for Mr. Lavender, his rival! So this
is it! He is to give me twenty-five cents, Sare! Allow me to
read it!
From Isles of Arabia and gardens of Ind,
Borne on the Zephyrs of the soft-breathing wind
The odors of Eden, the scents of each zone,
Are received at the shop of Mister Cologne!
There you'll find maidens fair,
Soft oils for the hair!
There youll find gentle beau'x,
Sweet smells for the nose!
There you'll find all the odors that ever was known
In the fashionable shop of Mr. Cologne!
That is what I call a climax, Sare!
It is very fine!
I see you appreciate poetry, Sare!
You compliment me! How do these lines compare with those
you wrote for Mr. Lavender?
Bless you, Sare! They are not to be named in the same letters
of the alphabet! Mr. Lavender is cut all out. But you havn't heard
the whole!
I can guess at the rest, from the specimen!
Let me read to you Mr. Lavender's, Sare!
Here the excited poet rapidly opened his common-place book,
which was made of some twenty leaves of brown-paper on which
were pasted narrow newspaper columnar strips containing his
lucubrations
.
To one of these he turned and began to read forth with
as if he feared his auditor would not wait.
There is a shop in Washing' street.
What street is Washing' street, sir?
Washington street, Sare! The last syllable is omitted by a sort
of poetical license, because it makes the line too long for the ear.
I have a desperate musical ear sure!
I understand now!
There is a shop in Washing' street
Such as one doesn't every day meet,
It is a store with windows four
And a handsome sign above the door,
Upon it as you pass it, sir,
You'll see the name of Lavender!
He keeps all sorts of scents and smells
For tripping beaux or pritty belles!
There's wash-balls.
That will do! I see you have in the other surpassed yourself
in this one!
De
cidedly, Sare! It would give me very great pleasure to read
both of them through to you, Sare!
I should be sorry to detain you, answered the lawyer with
mock gravity. I think I heard you say, you had to take them to
the printer to night!
Yes, sirbut
It is already past nine!
Bless me! I did not believe it was so late! exclaimed Mr.
Rhymewell pulling at his fob, with an air, but coming in contact
with his torn and buttonless waistband. I shall be back in an
hour, I will then pay you your rent. It is due to night, I believe.
I always like to be punctual! It is a nine-pence a day for the room,
which is for three days (I was to pay my rent every three days,)
three nine-pences, which makes just thirty-seven and a half cents,
Sare!
In the morning will answer, as I shall be in bed when you
come in!
How extremely condescending, Sare! I am delighted to see that
I have so far your confidence that you are not afraid to trust me!
I adore a man of honor like you, Sare! It was a glorious fortune that
sent me here, Sare, to be your guest at a ninepence a day!
How much have you made to day, Mr. Rhymewell? asked
the lawyer, curious to know how such a strange being lived; for he
had seen him only four days before standing near the outer-door in
the alley as he went out, and questioning Handy as to the
probability
of hiring a room in the tenement. Handy was just giving him
suitable encouragement touching the matter when seeing Mr.
Satchell
he referred him to him, saying, `Here's de Boss, ax him and I
guess he put you somewhar!' So, Mr. Satchell, who to do him jus
landlord over the only tenement he owned
rented him the room he now occupied at the rate of ninepence
per
diem
, payable, at the end of every three days. Mr. Rhymewell
herefore deposited himself there at once, hiring of Handy a mattrass
or two cents a night, payable in advance, and negotiating with him
or his meals at four cents each. Thus inducted into his new abode
and provided for in his household matters Mr. Rhymewell had
nothing
to do but to devote his pen to the coining of the twenty-seven
cents,
per diem
, aggregate, a very heavy sum for a penny a line poet
to make up daily. But, thus far Mr. Rhymewell seemed to be
doing
a very prosperous business.
How much have I made, Sare? repeated the poet. Let me
see! There is the poem for Mr Rowland Hill, Jr., the hair oil
gentleman,
that is a shilling! Then there is another for the Fur-store, that
is eleven lines, eleven cents! How much is that, Sare?
Twenty-eight cents!
Eg
zactly, Sare! Then here is this for Mister Cologne, this is
twenty-five cents?
That makes fifty-three cents!
So it does! I had no idea it come to so much?
How much did you make yesterday?
I made my fourteen cents! I dont make so much every day,
as to-day, Sare! This is one of my lucky days. Fridays are
always
lucky days to me!
People generally call them unlucky.
People! I don't level myself with the people, Sare! Genius has
nothing in common with other men, Sare. I would walk on my
head if I could!
Are you now going out? It is a chilly night. Have you no
over-coat?
Over-coat! I scorn an over-coat! Sare, responded Mr.
Rhymewell
,
buttoning closely to his breast by its only button his
short-waisted
coat, and swelling out with his legs astride so that his short
pants came above the tops of his dirty cotton socks. Sare, a man
who has true genius in his soul, never knows cold! He can't feel it,
Sare. I don't feel it, Sare!
Mr. Rhymewell then took a very suspicious looking nap-worn
white-hat with a very narrow brim from a nail, and thrust it upon
his head, inclining it a little back. He folded his ode in his hand
and strode to the door with an air as if he scorned using even legs
to walk with. The lawyer took up his candle, which was nearly
burned down into the ink-stand which served it as a candle-stick,
and followed him out, for the poet seemed all at once to forget that
he was there, or that his door had to be shut after him. Without a
word he passed down the stairs three at a time, and the lawyer
could hear him going through the entry below, muttering in a
half-tragic
tone,
Cold! who speaks of cold? none but the slave
Whose naked limbs are bared to the northern blast,
And who has no genius in his blackened soul!
What dat you say Massa Byrum 'bout bracking? asked Handy,
who was in his door polishing boots. You want your shoe
bracked I do 'em for half price! But if you wants de sole ob em
bracked too, I axes two cent more!
Out upon thee, son of Afric, out! Thy speech smacks of thy
grovellin' trade where all thy thoughts are! I scorn thy brush and
thee!
Here the poet took one enormous stride and vanished into the
alley.
Bress us! what am got inter Massa Byrum wid his poeticks to
night? He am a berry odd man any how. He tell me git out for
son of Africky! Bell it am a berry perlite way ob callin' a colored
gemman a nigger!
Satchell who had heard all this, re-entered his office laughing
like one who, with all his evil, could appreciate oddities of life and
character in individuals. Handy began to sing coal-brack Rose,
again, and Kaleb struck in with the Cobbler's Song, to the same
tune; and thus their rival songs mingled harmoniously with each
other.
Handy
. Dat you Sambo, yess I com'!
I am a little cobbler
I have a little wife,
Don't you hear de Banjo,
Tum, Tum, Tum!
I have a little stall, sir,
Where I live a merry life,
Rap away lapstone,
Rap, rap, rap!
Oh, Rose, coal black Rose,
I wish I may be scotch'd
If I don't lub Rose!
When the lawyer re-entered his room he carefully locked the
door, and then going to his turn-up bedstead he let it down,
discovering
a door behind it. It was fastened by a pad-lock, which he
removed, and taking in one hand a pistol from a shelf over the door
and his candle, he opened the door and entered the room, the outer
entrance to which was nailed up.
CHAPTER VI.
THE BRIDE AND BRIDEGROOM.
We
now go back with our readers to a period prior to the
opening
of our story, and present to them new scenes and new
characters
,
but which equally with those already introduced, act their part
in the progress and final denouement of the tale.
About two months previous to the time when Satchell is
introduced
to the reader in his office, a young gentleman of fine
appearance
was standing by the window of one of the most elegant
mansions
overlooking the common. By his side was a lovely woman,
scarcely in her twentieth summer. Their countenances expressed
calm happiness and deep, unbroken affection. They were a young
husband and his youthful bride. Their honeymoon, so far as that
state was measured by days, was that day ended; for they had
been married just four weeks. They were looking together and in
silence at the golden September skies, as the evening sun dyed
them with the most gorgeous hues, which a soft haze floating in
the atmosphere mellowed with exquisite effect.
It was such an evening as this when we first met, Gertrude,
said the husband, turning his gaze upon her with the fullness of
love.
The same thought was in my own heart, she answered,
smiling.
Do you think with your
heart
, dear wife?
When I think of you, Edward, she answered, looking up and
answering his eyes with glances as deep and fond if not so ardent
as his own.
How important to my happiness was that moment, he
continued
.
It has cast its sweet influence over all my life. It will
govern me with its power through eternity; for through eternity I
shall love you.
Yes, I feel that love like life, when once created can never die.
We must always love.
Always, and more and more if possible as time and eternity
roll on, he said earnestly.
You talk as if you were quite by yourselves, my wedded
lovers, said a voice kind and singularly agreeable in its tone, from
the centre of the room.
The young husband turned slightly, sufficient to catch the eye
of his father, a well-made, intellectual looking gentleman, who had
entered a few minutes before unobserved by them, though he took
no pains to conceal his presence, and was now reading a book by
the table.
Ah, father, you have been young once, said the bridegroom.
Yes, and I know how to sympathize in your happiness. I love
to hear you talk to Gertrude thus, and tell her how much you love
her. It will make her happy. Tell her so every day, my son, if
you live to be a hundred, and every day she will be made happier
for it. Wives love to be told that they are loved. It makes them
good wives.
An excellent lesson, dear father Judge, said the bride, laughing
till her beauty seemed so sparkling that the father-in-law and
husband
looked upon her in silent admiration. She blushed at this,
but her loveliness was enhanced though in a new aspect.
We will talk lower, sir, observed Edward Manning, turning
his eyes once more upon the landscape before them. Do you
know, dear Gertrude, by what a mere accident I happened to be at
Mount Holyoke at that time? I had planned to go to Montreal
and tour it through the Canadas, and was on my way there through
Northampton, when the stage stopped merely to dine. After dinner
I strolled through the streets, the landlord saying I should have
half an hour, as something had to be done to the coach before
starting. When I went back, I found that the stage had gone, but
leaving my baggage. There I was detained for another day. But
as I had my own time I did not complain, and I resolved to
embrace
the opportunity to ascend Mount Holyoke; for on the books
at the inn I had seen the names of a party from New York, which
had gone to the mountain. Somehow your name, Gertrude
Livingston
,
on the book struck me at first seeing it. I felt inspired
with curiosity to see the fair owner, for I instinctively felt she must
be fair.
How disappointed you were when you saw me! I recollect
you started with quite a shock when your friend, Doctor
Wells-borough
,
who was with us, introduced you as we encountered upon
the very apex among the clouds.
You know better, wife. I was struck at your beauty, or rather
I was
smitten
on the spot. From that moment I was yours, and
now you are
mine
. I do not believe that it was an
accident
by
which I came to know you. I am positive it was the ordering of a
kind Providence. So much of my life's happiness could not have
had its origin merely in the inadequate incident that I was three
minutes too late for a stage.
You are no believer in accidents of any kind, Edward.
No, I am not. An accident might overturn a world as well as
a coach, if God did not control accidents. An accident might have
destroyed all the circumstances of prophecy. An accident might
have cut off the years of, if I may with holy reverence thus speak,
the infant Saviour, unless accidents are under the control of an
almighty
law. There is properly no such thing as an accident.
What are called such are permitted links in the chain of human
events, and all have their errands and ends. There goes by a
carriage
containing a happy family, father and mother and children.
Yonder boy throws the stone he holds in his hand through the air,
and it strikes one of the horses in the eye. The animals dart away
affrighted, the carriage is overturned, the parents are killed; the
children live, and are found to be without means of support; they
are cast upon the world, become vicious and criminal through the
want of parental control and guidance, and by and by they end
their lives upon the gallows or in a prison. Will any one say that
all these events were the result of an accident, Gertrude? If so,
then all terrestrial events are nothing more nor less than accidents.
No! God is over all. Not a sparrow falls to the ground without
his notice.
I think with you, dearest Edward. I cannot believe that all
my present happiness in your love is owing to an accident. I
would
not believe it, else I should believe, too, thatbut I will not utter
what was upon my lips.
3
That what, Gertrude? Let me know your thought.
That
accident
, too, might destroy our love.
Never, dearest Gertrudenever.
I know it never will. You spoke of our first meeting on Mount
Holyoke a year ago, and the beauty of the sunset, such an one as
this. Do you remember how different was our wedding-dayall
clouds and thunder, and the most fearful lightning.
You look pale at the recollection, Gertrude. I should think
you were superstitious, if I did not know you so well.
No, I am not. But one can't help impressions. They will
force themselves down upon the soul and darken it. Do you know
that I more than once on our way to church to be married, had it
upon my lips to entreat you to turn back and put off the ceremony
to another and more propitious day.
Did you then take the gloom and storm of the day so seriously
to heart? he said, with surprise and sympathy.
Yes, but I have not thought of it since until just now, when
you compared the beauty of this evening with that of our first
meeting. Then I recalled irresistibly the tempestuous day of our
nuptials.
Be assured it is no evil omen. Sunshine and happiness follow
storms, said Judge Manning, approaching the window smiling.
Why what a superstitious beauty you are, Gertry, he added,
tapping her shoulder.
I am not so at all, my dear Judge. I was merely comparing
one day with another day, she said, laughing without a shade of
solicitude. Come, dear father, she said, drawing towards the
window recess a large velvet-cushioned parlor easy-chair, come
and sit down here by us and be sociable. We are not such young
lovers
that we must talk all the time between ourselves.
I will sit by you with pleasure, answered the Judge, with a
fine cheerful expression of paternal pride and affection, as he looked
upon one and then upon the other, as they sat upon the
fauteuils
of
the window, one on either side of him. And well might he gaze
upon the noble pair with pride and fondness. His son, his only
child, not only possessed a fine person and a face expressive of
intellect
and elevated character, but his mind was stored with
profound
scholastic knowledge and with elegant literature, and his
heart was pure and undefiled by contact with the vices that throng
the paths of young men. He had graduated at Cambridge with
the highest honors, and left the walls of the university with a
reputation for excellency of moral character that eclipsed that
which he had won for ascendency of intellect. He left college
without an enemy, and the centre of friendship for a hundred noble
hearts.
His father, who was a Judge of high eminence, had destined him
for the bar, to which he saw from his talents and virtues that he
would be a brilliant ornament. But the law was not the profession
that held out to Edward Manning any attractions. His feelings
and tastes early prepossessed him in favor of the church; and
greatly to his father's surprise he made known to him, soon after
leaving college, his predilection.
The choice which he thus betrayed did not displease the Judge,
although it disappointed him. Ho used no arguments to dissnade
him, well aware that young men are generally the best judges for
themselves in the selection of a profession. He knew that he would
be an ornament to the sacred calling he had embraced, distinguished
and useful.
After three years devoted to the study of theology, Edward
Manning
took orders; but he for the present declined a parish. He
wished to devote himself more closely to studies before taking an
active part in the ministry. He was rich, and was therefore not
driven, like most young gentlemen, at once into the field. He felt
that he was yet very young, and he was diffident of his own talents
as a speaker. His father also had desired him for the present to
remain with him.
It was during a few weeks traveling recreation in the summer of
the year previous to his introduction to the reader that he met
with Gertrude Livingston, in the manner already stated. This
young lady was every way fitted to become the wife of such a
person
.
She was accomplished, high-born, and lovely in mind and
person, and possessed a very noble and generous nature. The
union of their hearts was based on an instinctive perception of the
excellencies of each other's character.
At the period of our story they had been but a few weeks
married
.a
period of unalloyed and rational happiness. A few days
before the evening on which we see them at the window they had
returned from Saratoga, whither they had gone on their bridal tour
from New York. The day previous he had decided upon accepting
the charge of a parish in the city.
Such were the condition, prospects and circumstances of the
young gentleman whom we have thus introduced to the reader as
a fond and happy husband. There is no wonder that his father
gazed upon his fine, manly and intelligent face with pride; or that
he regarded with affectionate interest the charming features of his
lovely bride.
Now, my dear father, that we have got you here between us,
said Gertrude, I am determined you shall make us a promise.
Well, what is it? I am in the humor to promise you any
thing.
That you will not say one word more against our going to
housekeeping?
I can't promise that. I assure you, you won't have my
consent
.
What do you want, I pray? Haven't I here a large house
all furnished, and every thing all to your hand? What do you
want more? This is your house, so long as I am in it.
True, dear Judge, answered the lady, with a charming air;
but then it
isn't my house
, you know. A bride loves to keep
house of all things. Really I shan't realize I am any body, unless
I have a house to manage.
I see how it is, lady fair, responded the Judge, pleasantly.
You want to have a house all to yourself, so that you can manage
your husband.
What an idea, dear Judge!
It is the very idea, I'll be bound, that is in your head.
Yes, I dare say it, father, observed Edward, laughing. Se
for fear of consequences, I shall vote against housekeeping.
You promised you would be neutral, Edward, and leave it to
the Judge and me.
So I will. But really I should prefer, Gertrude, remaining
here. You will be installed in my father's house precisely as if it
were your own.
But I fear I should reign only a short while; for I know a
secret
,
Judge.
Do you, you beauty, hey? responded the Judge, slightly
coloring.
Yes, I do. So I fear I should have to abdicate before many
months.
What do you suspect? demanded the Judge, smiling
consciously
.
I don't suspect what I am quite certain of. Confess it,
Judge?
Well, I plead guilty, and throw myself on the mercy of the
court.
Then you are going to marry the handsome Widow
Winterley
?
Yes, if she doesn't change her mind before spring, responded
the Judge, looking very pleasantly embarrassed. It isn't to take
place till spring.
Oh, that will give me but six months reign here; so I think we
had best go to housekeeping at once. Perhaps the widow will
relent
,
and name next month.
What! so soon after Ned's marriage?
Why not, father?
Yes, why not, pray? You speak as if he had been buried
instead
of married. We must have it as soon as we get to
housekeeping
.
Well, if you say so.
Yes, dear father, answered both together, it must be next
month.
I will see the lady and tell her what you say. I rather think
she will not object; for to tell you the truth she fears some what
lest you won't like it at all.
I shall be very glad of it, sir, answered his son. She is an
estimable person, and I have no doubt will render you happy.
Thank you, dear boy. I will go and see her this very
evening
.
The servant now brought in candles, the curtains were drawn,
and leaving the window they soon after proceeded to the tea-table.
CHAPTER VII.
THE TIMSES.
About
three weeks after the conversation detailed in the preceding
chapter, the beautiful wife of the young clergyman found herself
presiding over a household of her own. The residence which
Edward had chosen was in one of the handsome streets that run
northward from Beacon, and it was one of the most elegant in the
street. The house was purchased for him by his father, and
presented
to him; while Gertrude, with a portion of her own splendid
fortune, insisted upon furnishing it.
Her taste and wealth were exquisitely apparent in the minutest
detail, as well as in the grander features of the sumptuous
apartments
.
A refined elegance and a just taste prevailed throughout.
In addition to costly mirrors, priceless pictures, velvet lounges,
alabaster vases, statuary, and a thousand ornamental, yet useful
articles, that enriched her drawing-rooms and parlors, there was a
handsome library, most luxuriously arranged, for Edward, and a
charming conservatory, filled with the most rare and fragrant
flowering
plants. The conservatory was a long, glass-enclosed gallery,
overlooking the garden; and, besides the ranges of beautiful vases
for plants, it contained in the centre a vast marble fountain, in
which swam dazzling schools of gold and silver fish; and around
the conservatory, hanging among the foliage of the taller trees,
were suspended small gilt cages, containing singing birds. Not far
from the fountain was a little artificial bower, of the most tasteful
construction, in which were seats for two, Edward and herself, and
a small marble table in the midst for her work-basket, a book, or
even for the salver to stand upon, whenever she invited her husband
from his library, which opened into the conservatory, to take tea
with her; which was a treat, she said playfully, she should extend
to him but once a week, lest, if granted more frequently, he should
lightly esteem it, and not look upon it as a privilege.
Wealth, in the hands of the refined and pure-hearted, comes to
its right uses. It can make earth a paradise; and such will earth
be, when riches are at every one's command, and all are good, and
in charity each with his neighbor. When innocence, love to God,
and charity towards our neighbor, prevail in the hearts of the
whole human race, then will riches be the greatest earthly blessing,
instead, as too often now, the greatest curse, vouchsafed to our
race. It will make an Eden of the globe, and earth correspond to
Heaven in excellence and beauty.
How perfectly happy were Edward and Gertrude in their new
abode, their
first home!
If happiness could be found on earth, it
dwelt with them. They were virtuous; they feared God; they
had the goods of this life, and the calm hope of the life to come, (a
source of ineffable happiness in itself;) they were intellectual; they
were rationally intelligent; they had minds to comprehend and
hearts to feel the beauties and glories of creation; they had refined
and accurately cultivated tastes, elevated and purified by religion,
the spiritual alembic of the human soul; they loved one another
with that pure and virtuous love which adores without idolatry.
Linked heart and heart by sympathy of mind, and tastes, and
hopes, they were one rather than two. The most perfect mutual
confidence and trust dwelt in their bosoms; and so closely were
they united in spirit, that it would seem that, if Edward should
feel a grief, though absent from her, she would know, and share,
and feel it instinctively, miles though they were divided. Such
was their lovesuch their happiness. But, alas! human happiness
is never enduring. It is either terminated by our own restlessness
and follies, or by the means of the envy and malice of our enemies.
Like the happiness of our first parents in Eden, their bliss had an
envious and hateful spectator. There was one who planned the
destruction of their peace, and who brought to this end all the
strong energies of his mind, and the deep evil of his heart.
We have already alluded to the degradation of Simmins Satchell
from the bar, which he had talents to have adorned, if his moral
obliquity of character had not diverted him from the path of honor.
We will now proceed to explain the causes which led to it, before
we go on to show the results which are to follow it.
Simmins Satchell was a native of one of the country towns of a
State adjoining the commonwealth. His father was a man in low
life; the highest occupation to which he ever was known to attain
was to help keep bar in the village inn on the grand occasions of
general muster and fourth of July. At such times, he was paid in
as much as he could drink, and a quart of rum to carry home. But
there was many a four-pence-half-penny, too, that should have
gone into the money-draw, that mysteriously found its way into his
sleeve. On other days, Tim Satchell, as he was called, used to get
a living by doing chores, sawing half a cord of wood when
driven to extremities, and sometimes carrying the squire's
marketing
home for him; but his favorite mode of raising the wind
was in holding travelers' horses, at which genteel profession he
used to make sometimes two shillings a day. This pursuit was
just idle enough to suit Tim, as he could sit about all day on the
benches in the gallery of the inn; and so, if any one charged him
with being an idle vagabond, he could reply that he was vaitin'
for 'osses. And in waiting for 'osses Tim passed the most of
his time. Tim ostensibly had a home, but it was only a
lodging-place
.
It was a wretched, one-story cabin, on the skirts of the
town, remarkable for the rags in the windows, which rags, by
computation
,
if sold, would have paid for glazing them. The house
was a wretched, tumble-down affair altogether, that a southern
slave would turn up his nose at, and in which no southern master
would put a slave to live. It was a bleak, desolate abode, with
broken door pannels, and, in winter, no wood-pile. No wonder
that Tim loved the tavern, with its pleasant, sunny gallery, and
loafer's bench, its warm bar-room fire in winter, its constantly
changing company, life, talk, and tippling! There was always
something going on at the tavern in sympathy with Tim's feelings;
when he was a sociable, dram-loving poor devil. There were the
stages to come in and start out four times in the course of the day,
when it was quite a busy time for Tim, who always, if not too
tipsy, was found at the leaders' bits; and, if he happened to be too
far gone for this, he would watch from the bench, with great
cugers
,
the letting down of the steps, the getting in of the
passengers
,
the shutting up of the steps, and fastening of the door. He
would dreamily inspect the process of the driver's mounting his
box, gathering up his reins, taking his whip and giving it the
preliminary
flourish in the air. Crack! away bound the leaders! the
wheelers dance, and prance, and follow! The stage whirls away
after them, when Tim, inspired by the excitement, catching off his
old hat, swings it, and gives two tipsy cheers and a half, sinks
away into a toper's snooze, with his hurrahing hat feebly sinking to
his side, his unshaven chin fallen upon his breast, his red,
foolish-looking
eyes closing with a ludicrous series of winks, and his whole
form as supple as an India rubber man.
Then there was the constant arrival and departure of travelers;
there were groups talking politics before the door to listen to; there
was a trade in horses to watch; or a menagerie come to put up and
perform, and bills to be posted, when Tim was in his element. No
wonder Tim liked to be at the tavern! It was a sort of paradise to
him. It was, moreover, his place of businesshis exchange. His
house presented quite opposite images. There was Tim's wife
naturally a good-hearted woman and kind, but who, with the cares
of a large family and Tim's idleness and intemperance, had lost
her patience with her beauty, and was now become a perfect virago,
at least to Tim. He never came home at night that she did n't
give him the gall that had laid in her heart for him all day; he
never left in the morning without an inverted blessing, and the
charitable wish that he might get his neck broke in a gutter before
she laid eyes upon him again.
Tim used to say that it was his wife's tongue made him drink,
and drove him to the tavern. But this was a slander, and,
unfortunately
,
a very common one, from Tim Satchell's. Tim knew,
and so do most other Tims know the same, that her tongue was
the
effect
, not the
cause
. Tim began to drink when she loved him,
and her tongue was kindly in its cadence. By and by, as he
neglected
her, his family, and his own character, she became soured.
She saw that her visions of happiness were wrecked; for all young
women who marry look for happiness. When young women marry
young men, the young men are not drunkards; they are upright;
their cheeks are fresh with health; their eyes sparkle with hope
and beam with love, whether the young man be a farmer or
mechanic
.
It is a marriage of love, and youth, and hopes of
happiness
.
All marry, the lowest and humblest marry, with such hopes.
So had the wife of Tim wedded him. She was nineteen, and rosy
and healthy, and loved him heartily; for he was then hale, strong,
and kind-hearted and,
she
thought, handsome. But a few years
passed on, and Tim took to tippling, by degrees at first; but
by and by he became a confirmed inebriate. His poor wife,
shivering
over the few embers upon her hearth, remembers their
wedding-day
,
and the first few months of their married life, and weeps.
But tears will not always flow. By and by, after months of wo
and privation, their fountain is dried up. The spirit becomes
hardened
,
and the spirit yields angry fire instead of tears. The voice
becomes harsh in addressing the wronger, and the eye welcomes
him, in his beastly intoxication, with scorn and hatred instead of
love. No, there is no more love! Stern endurance has taken the
place of all the gentler emotions. Alas, for the wife of the
inebriate
!
Who will condemn the cross wife, because she is cross?
Has she not enough to sour her spirit and embitter her words?
Who that hears the wretched mother, in the midst of her ragged
and father-deserted brood, lifting her voice, and dealing her blows
to the right and left, will condemn? Be assured, that the voice of
anger, and the language of the virago, is oftener the expression of a
broken heart and crushed hopes, seared into sternness, than the
manifestation of a hard heart and cruel temper. Speak to her kindly.
Hear her tale of crushed hopes, of privation, of insult, of neglect,
of poverty, of cares that seemed too hard to be borne. Who would
be even as sweet-tempered as she? Judge not. Beneath all that
seems harsh and evil, lies a crushed heart! When we look at the
stars, we place to our eyes a telescope. When we look upon the
poor, let us use the lens of charity, which magnifies and brings in
the foreground the good, but diminishes and removes at a distance
the evil.
Tim Satchell was not driven from his home to the tavern by his
wife's tongue, as he told every body,villain that he was, thus to
speak evil of her whom he had sworn to love and cherish, not to
dishonor! Her bitterness of words was the consequence of his
degradation, and neglect of her. How could she receive kindly the
man who had made himself a by-word? Was she not, as his wife,
degraded? were not his children degraded? She was drunken
Tim's wife;
they
were drunken Tim's children.
Thus
were
they designated, she and the babes of her bosom, through him who
should have been a sun to his household, to dispense light and glory
therein. What wonder that she should look upon her ragged babes,
as they cried around her for food, as they grew up in poverty and
vice, and pilfered, and cursed, and got evil names in the town,
what wonder that she should look from them to him, and curse him
in her heart?
The wretched interior of his cabin, no furniture, no food to eat,
no fire-wood, crying, tattered children, a sour-featured wife,no
wonder that Tim loved the tavern, and hated his home! But he
had himself made his home the hell he called it, and felt it to be.
In this home, if such it be called, Simmins Satchell first saw the
light. He had the advantage, from being the oldest, to have passed
the first five or six years in comparative happiness, compared with
the infancy of his numerous brothers and sisters, especially the
later ones; for each succession entered upon a harder lot than the
preceding. The father was more brutal and idiotic, the mother
crosser, the poverty deeper, and starvation more certain; for food
was less, and mouths more. These children, nine in all, grew up
like cats and dogs. They ate nothing that all did not fight for;
they squabbled and fought like dogs for bones; they hated each
other, as hungry children will, because each saw in his brother or
sister a devourer of food which he wanted. The children of Tim,
indeed, could be likened to a litter of young wolves, without
stretching for a comparison. As soon as they could run about, they
stole apples and fruit, and whatever they could get. Three or four
of them had even been known to sally out after a large dog
carrying
a bone in his mouth, attack him with sticks till he dropped it,
and then attack each other for its possession.
Young Simmins, as he grew up to stout boyhood, had got to be a
thorough-paced rogue; for his early advantages, during his father's
industrious years, had only made him more skillful and intelligent.
At sixteen, he would lead his whole horde of brothers and sisters,
not even excepting the one three years old, next to the infant, to
rob orchards, hen-roosts, yards, and barns, till they became so
formidable, from their number, adroitness, and daring, that the
town took the matter in hand. Simmins, and three of his brothers,
were one night waylaid and caught in the act of climbing a garden
fence, with arms filled with vegetables, chickens, clothes from the
line, and other articles that they had fallen in with in their foraging.
These being handed over to citizens in waiting, the constables
entered the garden, and found two of the Tim-girls, stripping a
plum-tree; these, by great fleetness of foot, escaped. The house
was then approached, and, through a broken pane of glass in the
sink-room window, they saw the heels and little legs and back of a
young Tim coming out. They received him in their arms,
much to his surprise, and found his little fistsfor he was not five
years oldfilled with silver spoons!
The next morning, they were all had up before a magistrate, and
all but Simmins were sent to the poor-house for a month, to pick
oakum, greatly to the relief of their mother, who had no more
control over them than over so many rattle-snakes. Simmins met
with a different fortune, and one which led the way to his future
career as a lawyer.
CHAPTER VIII.
THE LAWYER.
The
justice before whom Simmins was arraigned was a shrewd
man of the world and possessed much knowledge of character, for
one who had moved only in the narrow sphere of a country
shire-town
.
When Simmins was brought before him to receive his
sentence
,
which was after the rest of the young thieves had got theirs,
his air was so bold and impudent that the justice stared at him for
some minutes, as if he had been inspecting for the first time a
young panther. Simmins returned the look with the utmost
coolness
and assurance, and was the first to speak, observing,
I 'xpect you mean to know me next time, old 'un.
I do indeed, my lad. What is your name?
Sim Satchell.
You have been caught stealing, and have besides a notorious
character as a universal young reprobate. What reason have you
to offer why I shouldn't commit you?
Because I was not caught stealing, answered the boy, boldly.
Do you deny it? You were caught with your arms filled with
vegetables and apples and chickens in a bag.
That wasn't bein' cocht stealin', old blue nose, responded
Simmins
,
confidently.
It amounts to the same thing, you scamp.
Not a bit of it. How does eny body know I stole 'em? I
confess, old chap, the officy gripped me a climbin' the fence and the
things in my hands. But he can't prove I stole 'em.
Can't? What a brazen-faced little rascal! The vegetables
and chickens were proved to belong to Doctor Bentick, whose garden
you were in.
I doubt that. How could he identify vegetables afore he ever
saw 'em dug out o' the ground? and how could he swear to a
chicken bein' his as had been picked? And suppose he
did
know
'em be hisn', and they was found on us, I'd like to know who'd
swear on the book we hadn't picked up and found 'em a'ter another
thief had stole 'em and throw'd 'em away? Afore you send me to
jail, old spectacles, I'd like to have you and the blessed constybles
here prove as I stole the articles as was found on me. Till they
prove that, I stand here on my rights as a 'merican citizen
and
a
freeman!
The squire was altogether confounded by this bold defence and
sophistical argument from a ragamuffin of seventeen; and being a
just man and somewhat conscientious, and by no means versed in
the subtleties of the law, he thought that the lad had presented a
difficulty that could not be got over. He therefore turned to the
constables and the other witnesses present, and called upon them to
know whether they were ready to take oath on the Bible and at
the risk of their soul's salvation, that the prisoner
stole
the articles
that were found upon him. I have not the least doubt but that
he
did
steal them, added the worthy justice; but unless you can
make oath to the fact, I shall feel it my duty to acquit him and let
him go.
Neither of the constables were willing to peril salvation by
making oath to the fact; and the justice turning to the prisoner,
said as follows:
Sim Satchell, you are a thief and a rogue, and stole the things;
there is no question about it in my mind. But it can't be sworn to,
and so you are at liberty to go about your business. But first let
me ask you if you wouldn't like to study law with me; for you
will be either a lawyer or a rogue.
I see no choice between 'em, old 'un.
Well, I want a boy, and I have some old law-books in my
office. I have nothing that you can steal, for I am a bachelor, and
board, and have nothing but what I have on my back. If you have
a mind to come and live with me and try to be honest, it's a
bargain
.
I
can manage you, and I'll promise I'll make an honest
man of you.
It's done, squire. I'll live with you and do your chores, if
you'll give me schoolin'.
Good! I like that. A boy that wants to learn isn't quite
reprobate
.
Yes, you shall go to school six months in the year.
The same evening Simmins Satchell was domiciliated in the
justice's office, where he had a mattrass to sleep on, taking his
meals at the second table at the squire's boarding house. The
justice
had said truly there was nothing to steal unless he stole old
newspapers and a thumbed copy of the Revised Statutes, out of
which his honor got all his law learning.
The squire, as the event showed, was not disappointed in his
charge. Simmins took to books with a passion that was truly
wonderful, and betrayed a degree of intelligence that astonished the
town schoolmaster. His advances in study were rapid and
thorough, and the more he learned the less wild and vicious he
was. He literally devoured books, and at the expiration of a year
the master said he had taught him all
he
knew.
The squire now resolved to remove him to an academy, for
Simmins
had proved as faithful an errand and office-boy as he had
proved at school; and the squire seeing the talent that he displayed,
congratulated himself on having diverted him from robbing orchards
and hen-roosts into a more honorable channel. Simmins was sent
to the academy at the squire's expense, and at the expiration of
fifteen months was fitted for college. His patron now resolved,
being a man of substance and childless, to adopt him and complete
his work by giving him a university education.
At the age of twenty-three Simmins Satchell graduated from the
university, and with the second honor, the first, which he aimed
for, being carried off by his classmate, George Manning, whom the
reader has already seen as Judge Manning. This defeat he
attributed
to partiality and favoritism in behalf of his rival, who was of
a distinguished aristocratic family, while he himself was of no
family, or worse than none. He, therefore, never forgave the
university
nor his successful rival. Perhaps his complaint was justly
founded, for until a few weeks previous to the commencement it
was generally believed that Satchell would have the first honor.
His scholarship both in languages and mathematics stood high,
the highest in his class. But he was unpopular, His manners
were rude and uncivil, and he but little regarded the social
amenities
of life. On the other hand, Manning was not only an elegant
scholar but an accomplished gentleman. If partiality was shown,
it was based on feeling rather than from any intention of
complimenting
an aristocratic name.
Simmins had a passion for the law, and entered the law school,
where he soon distinguished himself in the moot courts for his
eloquence
,
close reasoning and legal acumen in debate. George
Manning
was in the class with him, and Simmins strove his utmost to
surpass him. Revenge gave brilliancy and power to his eloquence,
and success crowned his exertions in almost every attempt; for
now that Manning, the wealthy and the gifted, had passed with
honor the ordeal of the university, he felt less ambitious of
distinction
in the law school, willing to exist on his past honors, and
feeling that he would have years to perfect himself in law, while
kicking his feet for clients. Besides, being rich he felt no spur to
undue exertions. But with Satchell circumstances were different,
and hatred urged him on. He took his degree of law with honor,
and at once went into the city to practice the profession upon the
threshold of which he had entered.
His patron and friend the justice died before he got through the
law-claims, leaving him all his worldly goods, which amounted to
about six thousand dollars. Of this Satchell had four thousand
when he went into town and opened his office in Court street. His
talents had already preceded him, and he had not been in town a
month before as many as six applications or proposals had been
made to him by old established members of the bar to form a
copartnership
;
for a young talented lawyer is a very desirable
acquisition
for an old practitioner. Satchell, however, with that
independence
characteristic of him, declined to enter into any such
union, resolving to make his own way by his own merits. He soon
got into a busy and profitable practice, and the future seemed to
hold out to his grasp the highest honors of his profession.
But there existed a moral obstacle to his high advancement; this
was his total deficiency in principles. He had no religious feelings,
nor had he ever given a thought to his Creator. He knew, for he
lived in a Christian land and could not but know, that there was a
God, a Bible, a crucified Saviour, a heaven and hell, and that he
possessed a soul. But these ideas were entertained in his mind
only as vague notions, without any definite reflection upon them.
It was the same to him whether Christ or Mahomet were the
Saviour
.
It was the same to him whether men believed the Koran or
the Bible.
He
believed neither. In a word, he was an infidel.
He, therefore, could nave no principle. He who believes not in a
Deity can have no restraint upon his conduct, beyond the fear of
personal inconvenience from the criminal law courts. He will do
what he finds it in his heart to do.
Such a man was Simmins Satchell, Esq. Ambitious, talented,
aspiring to the highest eminence in his profession, he was destined
to fall. He needed Integrity at the helm, and without her he was
wrecked.
In the course of his practice, about seven or eight years after his
admission to the bar, he was appointed executor to an estate, and
also guardian to a ward then within three years of majority. The
dishonest lawyer saw that there was an opportunity through this
executorship of enriching himself and impoverishing the heir. But
to effect this it became necessary to forge certain papers, and to
erase signatures from others. After calculating all the chances of
detection and weighing them against the profit, he resolved to yield
to the temptation, or rather suggestion; for there can be properly
no temptation when the mind is previously prepared to evil. A
suggestion is all that is requisite to be readily adopted.
The forgeries and the erasures were effected in the secresy of his
own chamber, and he felt sure that detection could not follow.
But among Satchell's negligent habits was one of leaving small
silver change and pennies loose upon his table. This display had
more than once caught the sharp eyes of a lad who belonged in the
office upon the floor directly above that occupied by Satchell, and
who was frequently sent by his employer to and fro to the office of
the former on errands. After devising various modes to possess
himself unseen of the coin that he always saw there, more or less
of it, when he called, he at length hit upon a plan. One day, when
Satchell had gone out to an eating-house to dine, as was his custom,
the boy provided with a small gimlet augur, locked himself in his
own office, his master being at dinner, and began to bore a hole
through the floor. In a few minutes he had an orifice through the
plank and the lathe and plastering underneath in which he could
thrust his little finger. Looking down and seeing upon the table
directly beneath a ninepence and three or four fourpences he looked
very well satisfied, and prepared to take possession of them in the
following manner:
From his pocket he took a fishing-line, upon the extremity of
which was secured a heavy leaden sinker. Upon the flat bottom
of this sinker he stuck some very soft and adhesive shoemaker's
wax. He then dropped the plummet thus prepared through the
opening and carefully let it descend over the table. By careful
observation
and adroit management of the line he dipped it upon the
quarter of a dollar, and caught the coin up by the wax. He now
raised it up with great joy, when to his disappointment he found on
drawing it up to the hole that it would not by any means pass
through. He therefore had to let it drop, and content himself with
the fourpences, three of which he succeeded in transferring from
the table beneath into his trowsers pocket.
He now drew up his line and stopped the hole in the floor with a
viol cork, which he besmeared so that it should not be observed.
In this manner this ingenious young gentleman of fourteen amused
himself for some days, as often as his observation made known to
him that the lawyer had placed other fourpences upon the table.
Mr. Satchell had missed the small coin, but well knowing no one
had been in his office he attributed it to absence of mind on his own
part, supposing that he had taken them up and paid them away.
The large pieces remaining and the small ones only disappearing,
entirely prevented him from suspecting the entrance of a thief.
At length on the day upon which he resolved to execute his
forgeries
,
he, for greater privacy, carefully curtained his windows and
even filled the key-hole with mashed paper. The young
money-lifter
supposing he had gone to dinner, (for Satchell had chosen for
his purpose the dinner hour, when all the lawyers occupying the
building were out,) drew out the cork from his opening, for the
purpose of bobbing for more silver fish. To his surprise he saw
the crown of Satchell's black head beneath. Hoping he would
soon leave, curiosity led him to watch him to see what he was
doing, so that he might form a guess how long he would remain;
for his own master, a man of small appetite and very industrious,
and withal a great envier of Satchell's large practice, never was
away more than half an hour. There were, as it happened, more
than the usual number of fourpences upon the table, and the fisher
was very impatient to monopolize them. He felt, therefore, very
solicitous for Satchell's departure in time for him to operate. But
he found that he was not likely to go very soon, and after watching
him till he was tired, he got up to stop up the orifice lest his master
should catch him at his pastime. But before he could get off from
his knees his master was at the door. He flew to unlock it,
knowing
he could not answer
why
he had locked it, but the attorney had
already discovered that it was bolted. The boy nevertheless
unlocked
it as quickly as possible, and stood before him coloring and
trembling.
Locking the door! exclaimed he. What is this for? what
have you been at?
Nothing, sir.
Nothing? and the attorney's quick eye flew round the room,
to see if he could not detect the something he well knew he had
been at. The unlucky cork upon the floor and then the freshly
bored augur-hole caught his glance.
What is this? what have you been doing, sirrah? he
demanded
;
and as he spoke he stooped to examine. He found the hole
went through into the room beneath. He looked down, very
naturally. He saw lawyer Satchell at work over papers with a
pen. He seemed to be practicing signatures. The attorney placed
his eye close and could read the signatures. At length he saw him
make one at the foot of a deed, and then append one to another
engraved
paper. He then saw him with his penknife begin to erase
a name from a deed, which name the attorney recognized as that of
the deceased testator.
CHAPTER IX.
THE PLAN OF REVENGE.
As
soon as the attorney made this discovery, he became very deeply
interested in what was going on; so much so, that he quite forgot
his boy, who was looking at him, as he crouched upon his knees,
with not a little wonder.
The height at which the attorney was above the lawyer was
fourteen feet,a distance not too remote to prevent him from
satisfying
himself that Mr. Satchell was making foul play, as he
afterwards expressed it, with the signatures of deeds, conveyances,
and vouchers. He distinctly saw him erase one name from a
parchment, and substitute another; and both names he was able to
read. He saw him alter dates, and do other acts that satisfied him
that he was engaged in unlawful altering and mutilating of papers,
the integrity of which was of the highest importance to the ward
whose guardian he was.
Having fully convinced himself that the lawyer was executing
bold forgeries, he rose from his knees, and, looking his surprised
office-boy in the face, told him to remain there while he went
below, and to let no one in. He then hastened down stairs, and
knocked at the door of Satchell's chamber. He listened, and could
hear a hurried gathering up of papers. He knocked again, but
there was no reply. He repeated the knock, and no answer was
returned. He peeped in at the key-hole, but saw that it was
stopped carefully with paper.
Satisfied that Satchell was in, this silence and precaution
confirmed
him in his guilt, if he needed to be confirmed. He left the
door, and went into Mr. Manning's office, on the same floor, and
informed him of what he had discovered. George Manning, Esq.,
was then the District Attorney.
The result was, that the attorney openly, in full court, charged
Satchell with the crime of forgery, and in this manner:Satchell
was retained for a defendant, and the attorney for the plaintiff.
When the case was called, the attorney rose and said, boldly, that
he begged leave to decline engaging in a cause where the opposite
party retained a forger as its counsel. Satchell was seen to turn
deadly pale, and, conscious of guilt for a moment, was confounded
both at the knowledge of his crime and its open exposure. The
bench and bar were amazed, and the whole court was excited.
What do you mean, sir? at length demanded Satchell, fixing
upon him a look of defiance.
I mean, answered the attorney that I here openly in the face
of this court charged you with forgery. I have waited until this
time that I might know whether the deeds you forged would be
recorded by you as they were falsely executed. I have this
morning
visited the records and find that you have recorded them as you
forged them. I now pronounce you a forger and I dare you to
deny the charge!
Are you ready to substantiate this accusation, sir? asked the
judge of the attorney.
I am, sir, firmly responded the attorney. And it is my
intention to enter prosecution in behalf of the heir whom by his
forgeries he would defraud out of her estate.
What have you to say to this, Mr. Satchell, inquired the
judge, it is true my question is informal and as you have not
been prosecuted you are at liberty to answer or not, or proceed with
your client's case.
I shall not proceed with it, sir! I shall leave the court, and
before I enter it again, I trust I shall be able, your honor, to
vindicate
myself from this charge! Satchell spoke quietly and like an
innocent man. He gathered up his papers, took his hat and walked
out of the court house. He left behind him the impression that he
was innocent and that the attorney had been precipitate.
But the next day the district attorney, Mr. Manning, prosecuted,
a bill having been found against him; although Satchell made an
able defence he was convicted, degraded from the profession by a
solemn resolution of the Bar, and was sentenced by the judge to a
year's imprisonment. Attributing, as he did, his conviction to the
eloquence and profound arguments of the district attorney, Mr.
Manning
,
his former hostility rankled deeper than ever in his heart;
and in the silence and solitude of his cell he meditated against him
the most finished vengeance.
But years passed by after his discharge before he could decide in
what manner he should effect his revenge upon the man he hated
above all men living. Murder he did not meditate, for to kill an
enemy he felt was not to be avenged upon him. He resolved that
when he meted out to him his revenge he should
feel
it, be conscious
of it, and
suffer!
To take away a man's life to punish him he
thought folly; and justly so, for how can a man be considered an
object of punishment or vengeance when he is dead? With life
ceases the power of his foe over him!
Therefore, Satchell devised some mode that should reach his
heart, not his life. Not a day of the eleven years which had
expired since he left his prison, had he suffered to pass without
meditating upon his vengeance; but so deep and thorough did he
mean that it should be, so above all other ordinary modes of
revenge, that he could not decide in what
shape
to effect his object.
A score of plans he had conceived of and half-resolved to execute,
but they fell far short of the broad limits of his hatred and he
rejected
them. In the mean while he devoted his talents and
profession
to the basest of uses. He became notorious as the Rogues
Lawyer, and walked abroad among honorable men, like Satan
among angels. Every one knew him and shunned him. He would
pass along from one end of a crowded street to the other, and no
eye met his in friendly recognition, no voice of friendship or of
acquaintance fell upon his ear. Yet all knew him, for he was a
marked man. The good would not notice him, the evil who knew
him and had had business with him feared to notice him, lest they
should be seen and importuned of being one of his clients.
Such was the man, Simmins Satchell, at the time that we
introduce
him to the reader in his den of an office in the obscure alley in
the precincts of old Cornhill. A few weeks before this period, his
long brooding revenge had hatched a plan of vengeance, that seemed
to him to embrace all that his hatred of his enemy could desire to
compass.
George Manning, Esq., had now become a judge of the Supreme
court and stood at the very head of the bar as a profound jurist and
practical lawyer. For his elevation and virtues, Satchell, if this
could be possible, hated him the more. He had, at one time,
conceived
,
among others a plan for destroying this high character, by a
conspiracy to make him suspected of bribery in his official capacity;
but the difficulty of substantiating the fact, even by the false oaths
of certain criminals who had been acquitted, which he could have
obtained for money, led him to abandon this mode. At length his
fertile brain conceived a plan that astonished even himself for the
depth of its diabolical iniquity. It possessed the advantage over all
others which he had contemplated, of being a three-fold vengeance,
a barb, not only armed with one point but with three. The idea
came to his mind in the following manner:
About five weeks before the opening of our story, he was seated
in his office reading the morning paper. His door was locked as
usual and his room wore the same dark, dingy, chaotic aspect
which has already been described. He felt at the time in
particularly
good spirits, for he had just learned from one of his emissaries
the success of a plan he had projected, for clearing a criminal by
means of an
alibi
. Four men, low shop keepers, properly schooled
by him had made oath to having seen the criminal and been with
him at the very time he was charged with having committed the
offence for which he was arraigned. This testimony was received,
and the criminal was acquitted. The fellow with the four false
witnesses, had just been in to pay their benefactor a call and report
their success; for securing which he received two hundred dollars.
This money now lay on the table by him exposed, as he used to
expose his silver, for though he loved money and had forged deeds
to enrich himself, yet he was careless of taking care of it as if it
4
possessed no value. He was in high good-humor at the success of
his
alibi
, and every now and then would wreathe his large under
lip into a smile of satisfaction as he thought of it. He went on
reading the paper by the light of a tallow candle, for it was an hour
after dark, when suddenly a deep exclamation burst from him in
the form of an oath, such an execration as a bad man gives vent to
on an occasion of sudden surprise and pleasure. He sprung from
his chair, made a gesture with his arm as if excited, then sat down
again and fixed his eyes intensely once more upon the paragraph,
which had so suddenly changed his whole manner. It was as
follows:
We learn with pleasure, that the Rev. Mr. Edward Manning
has accepted the charge of  church in this city. Mr. Manning
is a young clergyman of great promise, commanding talents and
deep piety. His mind is of the highest order and accurately
cultivated
,
and few clerical gentlemen of the day surpass him in
elequence. He is a son of Judge Manning, and possesses his father's
fine talents as well as his excellencies of character. We
congratulate
his parishioners upon their acquisition.
There is my man! exclaimed Satchell with emphasis, his
face darkening while his eyes lighted up with the ball-fires of
settled
hatred. That is my man! I will strike at the father through
the son! No men are so open to calumny as the clergy! The least
breath that stirs not the hair upon the heads of those of other
professions
,
will be to them the sirocco blast, withering and fatal.
The hour of my joy has come at last! The mode of my revenge
is fixed! What good friend directed my eyes to this paragraph,
and then suggested, as it were by a flash of lightning, the scheme
of vengeance. Like Minerva, the thought has been brought forth
full armed and mature. I see it in all its bearings. My mind
grasps all its features.
She
who so madly loves him will aid me
heart and soul! Success is certain! My triumph will be complete
Were he other than a young clergyman I should hesitate! But a
man of God is vulnerable at all points. He is like a sensitive plant
that the least touch will cause to shrink. What happy
thought wrought this mode of vengeance into my brain. Eleven
long years have I been planning revenge against George Manning,
and now, all in an instant, as by inspiration, I have the mode before
me! I can reach him through his son! I know he is attached to
that young man, who is his only child, and to whom he will leave
his fortune. I know that he loves him with all a father's love, and
is proud of him with all a father's pride! My revenge is at hand!
Blessed little paragraph!
He rose up and walked his room. His face was dropped towards
the floor as he paced to and fro in deep thought. His brows were
knitted and his whole manner that of a man who was mentally
planning some deep purpose.
At length he threw himself into his chair again, sat a few minutes
with his hand upon his forehead as if collecting his thoughts to a
focus, and then wrote a few lines, sealed and directed the note, took
his hat and cane and hastily left his room, locking the door behind
him and putting the key into his pocket.
Upon reaching the alley he turned to the left, crossed Cornhill,
descended through a steep passage by a flight of stone stairs and
emerged upon Brattle street. The night was very dark and cloudy,
but he found his way by the glimmer of the few far apart lamps in
that neighborhood, and moved along as rapidly as in noon-day.
Reaching Hanover street he crossed it a few rods down and entered
an obscure side street, in which stood a few old fashioned dwelling
houses, with large elms in the yards. Before one of these mansions
he stopped and opening the heavy gate walked up a short, paved
walk to the front door which stood under a portico.
The house had a respectable, ancient aspect, and looked as if in
olden times it had been the abode of one of the first families of the
town. It was three stories in height; the cornice and architrome
were elaborately moulded and enclosed a carved frieze. The yard
was spacious, and contained, besides two noble trees of great age,
several flowering shrubs and plants encircling a walk within the
fence. In the rear of a paved yard, stood with an imposing front a
range of stables and out-houses.
Over the gate-way was a lamp-frame, but the lamp was not a
light; but from the windows on the left shone through the foliage
of a jessamine the rays of a candle within.
The lawyer knocked at the door but once only, lifting its heavy
brazen knocker in the shape of a lion's claw. It was opened after
a few moments by an African girl, with a remarkably black
complexion
,
setting off features of singular deformity even for one of
her race.
Is your master at home?
Yes, she replied as if recognizing Satchell, but still holding
the door very close.
Tell him I wish to see him! as he spoke he pushed in by her
and stood in the large hall.
She went into the room on the left, and in a moment returned,
saying,
Yiss, master say you pleas come in!
The lawyer, who had been impatiently glancing his eyes round
upon the architectural ornaments of the cornice and bannisters of a
spacious stair case, crossed to the door which she held open for him,
and entered the room.
The negress immediately closed it after him and returned to his
kitchen where sat in tender waiting for her return, Handy, the
musical Boot-Black, who, be it here recorded was her accepted
lover, and she the Rose of his amorous ditty.
CHAPTER X.
THE VICTIM.
The
apartment into which the lawyer was ushered by the negress
was a large, square, old-fashioned parlor with high wainscoatings,
deep cornices and pilasters above the mantel-piece supporting an
arch, upon which reclined a Bacchus upon a couch of carved
grapes.
The furniture of the room was as old-fashioned as the
architecture
,
consisting of half a dozen black high-backed chairs with
open-work
backs in wood, and seats of faded needle-work; a sofa covered
with flowered chintz, a mahogany beufort, three or four ancient
pictures in large oval frames, and polished mahogany tables almost
of an ebony color with oval leaves. These were placed against the
sides of the room one opposite the other, with a mirror in a heavy
elaborate gilt frame suspended above each.
At one of these tables, that which was on the left of the door by
which Satchell entered and between the two front windows, stood
a gentleman who had just risen from a chair by it to receive him.
There stood a tall wax candle upon the table in a very tall silver
candle-stand, and by its light the features and person of the
gentleman
were visible. He was in height nearly six feet, very noble in
the breadth of chest, and with an air and carriage of the head
singularly
imposing. His head was finely shaped, the features regular
and handsome, and his hair which was nearly white was worn
long upon the temples and adown the neck. His age could not have
been more than fifty, for his face was unwrinkled and his form
vigorous. He wore a dark brown dressing-gown and a white vest
with gilt buttons set closely together; a finely plaited ruffle adorned
the bosom of his shirt, in which was pinned a small jet cross. His
hand was very white and small.
His countenance looked troubled, as if the visit was untimely or
the visitor unwelcome. He nevertheless assumed a smile as
Satchell entered, a sickly, sad smile, and advanced a step towards
him but without extending his hand, like a man who felt compelled
to receive his guest with courtesy, yet resolved not to yield more
towards him than was absolutely necessary.
Good evening, Mr. Satchell, he said, with embarrassment and
a constrained air; and, as we have said, he bowed politely but did
not extend his hand. Perhaps he was aware of Satchell's principle
never to shake hands with any man. But a close observer would
have set down the omission to instinctive repugnance to the man.
Good evening, Colonel Harwood, said Satchell, in a bland and
social manner unusual to him.
Be seated, sir. To what favorable circumstance am I to owe
this visit to me, sir? added Colonel Harwood, as Satchell took a
chair by the side of the table, so that the candle stood between him
and his host, who had also reseated himself. This question was
asked in a hesitating manner. Indeed his whole bearing was like
that of a man who feels himself in the power of another.
To circumstances that affect me more than yourself, Colonel
Harwood.
I trust that you have come to inform me that you have, at
length, decided to accept of my offer for the correspondence, and
thus relieve my mind of a most painful source of anxiety.
You proposed to give me
Five thousand dollars in money down, sir, for the papers,
answered
Colonel Harwood, with great earnestness. I am as ready
to repeat the offer as I was to make it last Thursday when I saw
you in your office.
I cannot take that sum, Colonel Harwood, answered Satchell,
quietly.
Then why are you here, sir? Do you come to feast your eyes
upon your victim? Do you delight to gloat upon him whom a
word from you will arraign before the tribunal of his country for
high treason?
No, that is not my pastime, sir. I have you in my power, it is
true, but I do not wish to take any undue advantage of it.
Pray, sir, what do you call undue advantage? You have set
the price of those papers, which is the price of my life and honor, to
the very last dollar I am worth in the world.
I know that, sir. I know exactly how much you can pay me
without utter ruin. To that outside limit have I set my price.
And I have offered it to you. I offered it to you when last we
had our interview. You then said you would give me an answer
in a week. But three days before the week expires I see you
voluntarily
at my house. Have I not just reason to hope that you
have called to close with my offer?
It is true that my object in visiting you to-night and at this late
hour, Colonel Harwood, touches the affair of the treasonable papers.
But I have not come to accept the five thousand dollars.
You have not? Then what in the devil, sir, have you called upon
me for? I will remind you, Mr. Satchell, that there is a limit to all
human patience and forbearance. I will hint to you that you may
overshoot your mark, and by aiming too high lose all. I already begin
to think that I had better defy you at once to do your worst, and
take the infamy that will follow.
You have your option, sir, coolly replied Satchell.
Will you drive me mad, sir? I have not my option. I cannot,
you know I cannot bear to be held up to the eyes of my country
and the world as a traitor. You know, sir, that I have too keen a
sense of honor,that I will die first.
I know it, sir. I know that you would give me not only all to
the last cent you are worth, but that you would kneel and lick my
hand rather than be thus dishonored.
I would not, sir. I would blow out my brains before I would
thus demean myself. Yet, God knows I would do much for my
dear family's sake to avert the disgrace. Oh, what fiend possessed
the man to single you out as the agent of his revenge!
Because revenge is sweet, sir. He
knew
me, and he knew that
I would see that the whole talley was scored. I paid him his price
for the papers. I hold them, sir, to your confusion, and to my
profit. Hear me, Colonel Harwood. In purchasing these papers
from the deserter whom you so severely punished, I intended only
to make out of them, through your fears, a pecuniary gain. When
I called upon you three months ago and told you that I had these
papers, and convinced you too that I had them, by showing you
one of the letters in your own hand-writing to the British General,
you offered me promptly one thousand dollars for them. This I
refused, giving you a month to do better. At the end of a week
you came and doubled the offer. This I refused, and the next
week you increased your offer. But I knew the power I possessed,
and resolved to make the affair in hand a source of profit. So I
took measures to ascertain just how much blood you could bear
letting, that is, how much you were worth. I then laid my
maximum
at five thousand dollars.
And this I offered you, but you hesitated.
Because I did not wish to resign my power at once, and I hoped
to be able to get something more.
Sir, you are a monster!
You have tried your tongue before at calling bad names,
Colonel
,
but you see that I don't mind them. They are but breath,
they can't hurt me. I laugh, having the game.
Will you tell me, sir, why you are here to-night?
I will. I began to do so, but you have interrupted me.
You need not expect me to give you one dollar over what I
have offered you. It will beggar me and my family to do this. I
will blow out my brains and end the matter before I oblige you any
farther.
Colonel, I am your friend. If any other man had got possession
of this correspondence, in which you offer to surrender an important
fortress to the British during the war, they would not have thought
of making money out of it, but would at once have published it to
the world, and by this time you would have had the honor of dying
twelve feet distant from a dozen muskets loaded with ball. But I
came to you in a friendly way, and offered for a
consideration
,
(money for honor and life,) to surrender the mischievous papers
into your hands. Had your friend, Judge Manning, got the papers
into his hands, believe me he would have communicated them to
the Government. As a man of honor he would have felt himself
bound to do so; and so to a sense of duty he would have sacrificed
friendship. An enemy to you would have made a similar use of
them. But
I
come to you and propose a compromise. What could
be more suited to your views and wishes?
I do not find fault with you. What you say is very likely to
have proved true. I had rather they had fallen into your hands
than in those of friend or foe. Will you surrender them to me for
five thousand dollars?
`No, not for
money
, he answered with emphasis.
How, then? If not for money, in what manner? demanded
the Colonel with amazement.
I will tell you, replied Satchell, reaching out and moving the
candle a little nearer Colonel Harwood, as if he would darken his
own features and lighten up his more fully while he addressed him,
at the same time he looked carefully about the room to see that the
doors were all closed.
`Pray, do tell me? cried Colonel Harwood. Indeed I am
unable to guess what you mean. Not money?
Not money. Circumstances have led me to change my
resolution
.
Money is as valuable to me perhaps as to most men. But it
is
not
money.
Colonel Harwood looked perplexed and distressed as much at the
manner as the words of Satchell. If it was not money he feared,
he knew not what. Something indefinable, more dreadful than
impoverishing him. What could it be? But he did not put the
question. He waited in painful silence until Satchell should explain
his meaning.
There are in this world some things, Colonel Harwood, more
valuable to a man than honor, said Satchell, in a grave manner;
for instance your honor is dearer to you than money.
It is.
Revenge is often dearer to men than money. It may not be so
to you, but it is to me.
Here Satchell paused and seemed to be uncertain how to go on.
Colonel Harwood regarded him in pale silence.
A man sometimes considers fame, which is a breath, dearer
than money, resumed Satchell. Others
love
.
Well, sir, observed or rather interlocuted Colonel Harwood,
hardly knowing what to say, but seeing that he paused and gazed
on him, he saidWell, sir. He was more and more perplexed
to guess how this would end.
Love
, remarked Satchell, with emphasis upon the word,
love, as I said, men often, very often, regard as more valuable
than silver and gold.
Yes, I believe so.
I know so, Colonel Harwood. To speak more to the point, I
feel that it is so. For instance, I can by giving you the papers
which like a cloud hangs over your life, this very night receive
from you all your estate.
Five thousand dollars, Mr. Satchell. This was my proposal.
You would give me
all
your estate, and you know it. You
would beggar yourself to have in your power the secret which I
hold. So do not interrupt me if you please, Colonel. I repeat that
your fortune is at my command, on condition that I surrender to
you the papers. But I have come here to-night ready to surrender
them to you, and take nothing from younot a dollar.
Give
them to me! exclaimed Colonel Harwood, with a cheek
glowing with hope and joy, yet his eye wavering with doubt and
incredulity.
Not give them, Colonel. I shall expect in return a value equal
to the proposal you offered. What I ask I am willing to take in
lieu of the money, for it will be as valuable to
me
. To you it may
not be so.
What do you speak of? You are inexplicable.
I will be clearer then. Be calm and take what you hear
composedly
.
Nothing can be gained by excited words and loss of
equanimity
.
I have no doubt when you think upon my terms you will
embrace them. It will be better for you to do so, than to
impoverish
your wife and five lovely children. I have hinted to your that
men have held love to be as valuable as gold. It is so in my
estimation
.
You have, Colonel Harwood, a lovely daughter, born out
of wedlock, if rumor says true. I am willing to take her instead of
the five thousand dollars, and give you up the papers.
Colonel Harwood grew as pale as the face of the dead when he
named his daughter. Alarm, surprise, anger struggled in his
countenance
.
The quick blood rushed to his brows. He gazed upon
the speaker with trembling lips.
How do you know she is my daughter?
I discovered it by accident. With the world she passes as
your niece. It is on your tongue to assert to me that she is your
niece. You need not. I
know
she is your daughter, born two
years before you wedded your present wife. I know she is your
daughter, though you have not educated her at home, and now,
although she is at the age of nineteen, you keep her boarded at a
boarding-school, on the plea that she is to learn French and Music,
and finish her education. In the meanwhile you are looking out
for a suitable match for her. I am here ready to take her off your
hands. Consent to use your influence with her to marry me, and
the papers are yours if you succeed. Otherwise, you shall have
them at
no price!
I will communicate them to the Government,
and fill your cup to the brim by acquainting your daughter with
the stain upon her birth, and making known to your wife that she
is
not
your niece.
CHAPTER XI.
THE SACRIFICE.
The
amazement and terror depicted on the countenance of Colonel
Harwood it would be impossible to describe. He fixed his eyes upon
the countenance of Satchell with that look of horrified hatred and
impotency with which he would regard a demon.
Satchell met his look with an expression cool, deliberate
indifference
and conscious power. From horror the face of his victim
assumed an aspect of the most painful, pitiable, distressing
supplication
.
As pale as marble and with a trembling tongue Colonel
Harwood bent towards him. For a moment he looked as if he
would sink from his chair to his knees and thus realize Satchell's
assertion. But he did not kneel, with his knees, but it was plain
that he did so with his spirit. Humiliation and the most imploring
deprecation marked his manner.
Mr. Satchell, my good friend, Mr. Satchell! he gasped. He
tried to say more but his emotions checked his utterance. With his
hands clasped together he stretched forth his face and neck towards
him as if begging for life.
Well, Colonel Harwood! answered Satchell, who could not
look upon him without wonder at his agitation. You seem to be
alarmed! I have proposed nothing that should produce in you
such horror and fear. I am a man and not a monster. I shall
make your daughter a good husband! Think of it calmly sir. Five
thousand dollars and poverty or your daughter to me and your
present competence. Nay, I repeat that I will give you the papers
for no other price than your daughter's hand!
You shall not have it! gasped the Colonel faintly.
Very well, you shall not have the papers, responded Satchell
preparing to rise from his seat. To-morrow I shall transmit them
to the government. Let the evil be on your own head!
Stay, sir, stay. I will talk with you calmly.
It were best to do so!
Will you inform me how you learned the fact that Caroline
Kent is my daughter?
It matters not. It was by accident in the way of my business
in looking up old papers. Let it suffice that I know the fact!
You seem to be my evil genius. You have me in your power
in every way. Sir, you will drive me mad! I shall take my life!
I do not fear it. There is no difficulty so great that man
cannot
overcome it with nerve. There is not a madman who has let
his reason fly in reverses, who if he had guarded it with equanimity
might have arisen out of his troubles. There is not a suicide who if
he had lived might not have redeemed fortune and character. While
there is life all things are possible to a man. None but cowards die
and go mad! Listen to me with composure. Hear the whole
matter
between us. I hold treasonable papers written by you to the
enemy that are snifficient to hang you. I offer them to you for your
daughter's hand! That daughter passes to the world as your niece.
Your wife believes her to be your niece, the daughter of a sister
who died years ago in Brazil, at the consulate of her husband. But
you know and I know that sister died childless!
You seem to be in league with Lucifer!
I have not the honor of this shadowy gentleman's acquaintance.
I find devils enough in the world without going into hell after such
fanciful acquaintances. I propose that you give me your daughter
for your honor. I threaten if you refuse not only to place the papers
at the disposal of the government at Washington, but to divulge
both to your daughter and to your wife the secret you have so
carefully
guarded. Now, Colonel Harwood you have the whole matter
plainly presented. The hour grows late, added Satchell,
looking
at his huge silver watch, I should like a reply at once!
At
once?
repeated his distressed victim.
Yes, Colonel Harwood. You can decide now as well as at
another time. You know at this moment as well as tomorrow
whether you will consent for me to mail the treasonable papers to
Washington in the morning.
IIneed a little while to think of it.
I will give you five minutes by my watch.
Sir, my daughter is very beautiful, he said with emotion.
I know it, sir.
She is young, scarcely nineteen, accomplished with every grace,
and I dearly love her. To me she is also fondly attached.
As my wife you can still love hershe fondly loves you. I
wish to break no ties of affection.
But consider the disparity Mr. Satchell. You are at least
forty-eight and
Ugly as she is lovely, I dare say.
No I did not
say
so. But, Mr. Satchell, suppose you have
my
consent. You cannot have hers.
How do you know?
I cannot think that she would consent to marry you without
compulsion.
We can't tell what a young woman will do. Matches, with
more disparity of ages have often taken place.
But she has never seen you.
No, perhaps not.
There is an insuperable objection, if I must speak my mind,
Mr. Satchell, said Colonel Harwood, coloring.
Speak freely.
Your character among men. You know, sir, that you are a
disgraced man. That you hold no enviable position in the opinion
of the world.
I understand you. I am the Rogue's lawyer. But, sir, your
daughter is a natural child. So that it is a fair offset. No
honorable
man would wed her. She must either be the wife of a man who
cares little for the opinions and prejudices of society, or else
Else what, sir.
Else some honorable man's mistress.
Villain!
Keep your temper, Colonel. I speak out what you think but
dare not utter; what the world would both think and say, if they
knew the truth. It remains for you to choose what you will do.
I did not intend that the secret of her birth should ever
transpire
,
sir. It was my intention to marry her to some suitable person
as my daughter. This I could now do.
No sir, you cannot. If you refuse her to me, she shall know
the secret. And should she keep it and marry an honest gentleman
I would betray the truth to him. Sir, there is no use in farther
prolonging this interview.
It is quite as unpleasant to me as it can be to you, said the
poor man, the sweat standing in drops upon his brow. But I
can't let you leave without arranging upon some plan for possession
of those damning proofs of treason you hold against me.
You know my price, responded Satchell with the most
provoking
firmness.
Colonel Harwood rose from his chair and walked once across the
apartment and back again, slowly and thoughtfully. His
countenance
was destitute of all color save ashy paleness. He seemed
possessed with the deepest anguish. He presented the painful
spectacle
of one man in the moral power of his fellow, and that
fellow-being
without mercy, principle or justice.
Stopping in front of the man who had his destiny and that of his
beloved wife and children in his hands, he said, in a voice that
seemed to come from the sepulchre, it sounded so hollow and
deep,
Mr. Satchell, I yield. Take her
if
she will consent to be
yours. But mark me, sir. I shall not lift a finger towards
compelling
her. So far as I am concerned, I give my consent that she
shall be your wife. I will use no influence either one way or the
other. Now that the secret of her birth, which I thought was
sealed forever in my own bosom, is revealed, I give up my hopes
for her. What you have said respecting her is too true. I would
rather, if it must be, that she were even wedded to you than become
that you suggest. Yet, I do not know that I would. Once for all,
I say take her,
if
she will take you. I make this sacrifice not to
save the five thousand dollars, for I will give it to you now instead,
but to save the anguish and infamy my dishonor will bring upon
my family.
I refuse money, Colonel Harwood.
I know it. I see that it is useless for me to struggle against my
fate. Give me the papers and take her. But remember, sir, that I
am not to be responsible if she refuses you.
That is understood. I will not hold you responsible. But I
shall expect you to see her to-morrow, and make known to her that
it is necessary for your safety and honor that she should become
my wife.
I will do it, sir, gasped Mr. Harwood.
You will after seeing her call at my office and let me know that
you have done it, and then write me a note introducing me to her
as her future husband.
I will do it, sir, he articulated faintly.
I will then place in your hands the papers that so nearly touch
your life and honor and happiness.
Once they are in my possession, I shall drop on my knees and
devoutly thank God.
You will have reason to, sir; for though seven years have
elapsed since the peace of 1815, yet treason is never out-lawed by
statute, unless by special enactment. The fall of the fortress you
commanded, though apparently an accident of war, was, you well
know, brought about by your treasonable understanding with the
enemy. This the letters and plans in my possession clearly prove;
but so artfully did you manage that although the country were
surprised
at the surrender, when it was supposed the place was
impregnable
,
yet no suspicion, beyond mere expressions of
astonishment
,
fell upon you.
Do not speak of it, sir.
I do not wish to further. It is understood that you see your
daughter to-morrow.
Yes.
When shall I see you at my office?
At two o'clock.
Earlier, if possible, as I have an engagement at that hour.
Then at twelve.
I will be there in waiting.
And to deliver to me the papers?
All of them.
It will be a happy hour. But, Mr. Satchell, I must express my
surprise at your willingness to surrender the papers upon my mere
consent to give you my daughter. Is it possible you have already
seen her and
know
that she will marry you?
No, sir, I have not seen her.
Then you must have great confidence in my influence over her,
or else great faith in your power of persuasion; for remember, sir,
there shall be no force used. Though I am in your power, and
would sacrifice much, very much to free myself, yet I will be no
party to coercion where my child is concerned. Dare, sir, to lay a
hand upon her in sternness and I will take your life! I have not
yet forgotten how to use a sword.
Satchell smiled, and said, rising from his chair,
Colonel, do not let us quarrel now, we have brought matters to
so favorable a crisis. I have no intention of using coercion. If she
does not comply willingly, then you are released from all
responsibility
.
But remember that if
you
dare to use a word to urge her to
refuse, I will divulge to her the secret of her birth.
The knowledge of it will scarce degrade her if she becomes your
wife. She will think it a lesser evil.
I am a philosopher. Your words do not, cannot anger me,
Colonel. Now we understand one another? Tomorrow at
twelve?
Yes.
Good night, sir.
The response of Colonel Harwood was scarcely heard; it moved
the lips but did not stir the air. Indeed he seemed scarcely able to
speak at all.
He took the candle and showed his visitor to the outer door. He
closed it after him, and then staggered through the hall to re-enter
the room. Before he crossed the threshold of the sitting-room door
he fell forward, the light flew far from his hand, and he lay upon
his face nearly insensible and in darkness.
Poor man! poor, erring, unhappy gentleman! How bitterly was
retribution coming upon him for youthful excesses, and for the
treason of riper years!
He was not wholly insensible; he was conscious of his misery,
and from time to time groaned heavily. He was completely
overcome
by the scene he had passed through. His heart was in that
child! that beautiful, spirited, loving girl, who owed to him life,
but life with dishonor. He loved her more for the wrong he felt he
had done her. Sacredly for
her
sake he kept the secret of her birth.
Since that event he had become a husband and a father. New
affections, new bonds of love were fastened about his heart; yet he
loved most the child of his first erring passion. He lavished upon
her all that could make her happy, that could render her an
ornament
to that society in which he looked forward to see her more
worshipped and caressed.
But now all his hopes had perished; at one fell swoop they had
been swept away!
Oh God! he moaned in the silence and darkness where he
lay, my punishment is greater than I can bear. Who could have
told this fearful, evil man this? But it is known. I must abide
the fate that is before me. Life, honor, happiness, hers and mine,
all are cast into the scale, and she only can turn it and save me.
I will see her to-morrow; I will throw myself upon her mercy. I
will tell her all,
all
that I
dare
to tell her. From
my
lips she
shall never know that I am her father.
Such were the thoughts, some of them uttered in broken words,
that passed through his mind. Slowly he rose to his feet, found his
way to the sofa, and sunk upon it powerless with grief.
CHAPTER XII.
THE CONFESSION.
The
reader will perhaps by this time be inquisitive to know how
the proposed union of Satchell with the daughter of his victim, was
to contribute to his plan of revenge against Judge Manning in the
person of his son; or why he should forego a certainty of five
thousand dollars with the mere prospect, and an uncertain one, of
winning the hand of the maiden. But these things will be made
clear in the progress of the story, and Satchell shown to be perfectly
consistent with
himself
.
The ensuing morning Colonel Harwood rose, pale and haggard,
after a sleepless night. To the inquiries and anxious solicitude of
his wife and four sweet children, his eldest, a lad of sixteen, being
a midshipman in the Navy and at sea, he replied cheerfully and
with a forced smile that he was well. Soon after breakfast he
went out, and took his way up Hanover street in the direction of
Tremont. He came in front of a large, handsome edifice, standing
back some distance from the street. A spacious lawn stretched in
front, shaded with a number of stately sycamores. It was just nine
o'clock, and as he stood by the spacious arched gateway to the
mansion, troops of young girls passed him and went in, some with
books in their hands busily studying their morning lesson, others
affectionately locked arm in arm like twin flowers, and lovingly
whispering as they slowly stepped along; others romping and
laughing, and filling the air with music that enlivened that of the
birds in the branches of the trees above their heads. Several of
them smiled, and prettily and respectively spoke to him as they
passed, for they had seen him often come there to visit his niece,
the beautiful Carolina, or Linny Kent, as they called her, with
school-girl-like change of her name.
As they passed in and their bright happy faces flitted past him,
he sighed at the contrast with his own wretchedness.
Good morning, Colonel Harwood, said a pair of blooming girls
of seventeen or eighteen, one of them with her sun-hat carelessly
hanging back over her shoulders, and her cheeks rich with the hue
of health and tone of beauty.
Good day, Fanny, good day, Miss Kate, responded the
Colonel
,
his face in spite of his sorrows reflecting their smile.
You are just the person above all others, dear Colonel, cried
Kate, laying her white hand on his arm; we are going to Jamaica
Plains this afternoon, and Linny must go. Will you let her?
Yes, Colonel, don't refuse, cried the other, gracefully swinging
her straw hat by the string wound about her fore-finger. There
is uncle John, and both of aunt, and father and cousin Dick going,
and we
must
have Linny.
I am sorry to say that she is engaged to-day, answered the
Colonel, almost suffocating with emotion. The tears came into his
eyes and they saw them.
You are ill, sir, she said sympathizingly. I thought you
looked ill.
I am not well.
How sorry Caroline will be, said Kate, looking sadly herself.
It is nothing. I shall feel better by and by.
I hope so, sir, answered Fanny, with that tone of gentle
sympathy
that renders a lovely girl, when pity is moving her young
and pure heart, so like an angel.
As they conversed they slowly approached the noble villa-like
mansion, which was occupied as a boarding-school.
I will run in and tell Caro you are here, sir, cried Kate; and
she bounded forward up the steps and disappeared in the hall.
In a small but elegant chamber on the south side of the house sat
a young girl of nineteen. She was writing off music for a guitar
which leaned against the table. Upon the table stood a vase of
fresh flowers with the dew upon them, the fragrance of which
combined
with that from some blooming plants in the window filled the
apartment. Every article of furniture betrayed the taste and
accomplishments
of the fair occupants. Costly annuals, drawings,
paintings from her own pencil, French and Italian poets, a guitar,
a harp,all bore testimony to the elegant cultivation of the
presiding
mind.
The maiden, who was Caroline Kent, the natural daughter of
Colonel Harwood, was a brunette, but of the most delicate tone of
complexion. Her figure though slight was developed with that
chaste voluptuousness of contour which Raphl loved to portray
in his beautiful women. She was dressed in a white morning robe,
which displayed the fine outline of her faultless shoulders with
charming effect. Her arm and hand were of admirable beauty for
shape and whiteness and for the rosy loveliness of the finger-tips.
Her face was oval, like the faces of Venician maidens, and her
eye-brows
dark and pencilled like those of a daughter of Araby.
Beneath
them were eyes that in the pride and glory of their splendor
it was dangerous to look upon, much more to gaze into. They
were large, exceedingly dark and eloquently expressive of a soul
full of strong passion and deep feeling. They would now expand
with animation, now fall with softened power, the long dark lashes
letting the eyes beam through them like midnight stars seen through
the shadowy trees. Their expression was now grave, and perhaps
a shade of sadness dwelt about her beautiful mouth. Upon it she
had just laid her fore-finger as if to listen, and raised her eyes from
the music she was copying, with an air of attention, when her door
was assailed by a noisy rap.
Come in, she answered in a rich-keyed voice, that once heard
would linger upon the ear and live in the memory like music.
The door opened, and the little maiden Kate, we don't know
who
, bounded in, yet with an air of deference, for Caroline Kent
was her senior by a couple of years. Her face, however, was
sparkling with her news.
Your uncle has come, Linny, and is in the hall.
I was listening as you came to the door, for I thought I heard
his voice. You are very kind to come and tell me.
She laid the pen down, and rose with a glad look to go and meet
him.
He looks ill, but he says it is nothing, said Kate, as they went
out. But I shouldn't wonder as it is Wednesday if he came to
take you home. I asked him if you might go with us to Jamaica
Plains, and he said you were engaged. Did you know it?
They had now reached the hall.
No, indeed, she answered, smiling. She then saw Colonel
Harwood. My dear uncle! she cried, almost embracing him in
the presence of the others. You have been four days away. You
do
look pale! I hope you are not sick, sir?
It is nothing, Caro.
Will you walk into the drawing-room or up stairs into my
room?
I will go up stairs. But have you no recitation?
No. I have pretty much my own hours now. Madame Delano
scarcely looks upon me as a pupil. I wish you had come to say
that you had decided to let me make it my home with you. I am
getting to be quite a venerable pupil, sir, at nineteen.
She looked at him with solicitude, as she saw that his eyes did
not reflect the smile that sparkled in her own while she spoke.
We will go up stairs to your room. he said, with agitation that
he tried in vain to conceal.
She saw that something painful was upon his mind, and without
asking any questions she preceded him to her room.
After he had taken a chair and she had seated herself by him, he
for some moments sat with his brow resting upon his hand in silence.
She regarded him with deep concern. Taking up her guitar she
struck a few chords, and said,
Shall I sing, dear uncle? You are sad, and music always
soothes and cheers.
No, my child, I can't bear it now. I shall be composed soon.
What has occurred? she asked, laying her hand gently upon
his arm. Something distresses you. What concerns you is of
the deepest interest to me. You know, my dear uncle, that I know
no difference between you and a father. As a father you have
always been to me. From me you have a child's love and
gratitude
!
she kissed him affectionately as she said this.
Every word she uttered pierced his heart.
I will, if I can, tell you what weighs upon my mind, my dear
niece, he said, more composed. You need not be told how
much my heart is wrapped up in you. You are indeed to me as
my own child. But I fear you will cease to love me. I fear you
will hate me when you hear what I have to say.
I cannot hate you. Do not talk thus! she cried with emotion.
What is the meaning of this mystery in your words and looks!
You
must
hear. I will not torture you with suspense. Listen
to me, my child.
He took her hand in his, and after an effort to command his
feelings he thus began, while she listened with the deepest and at
times the most painful attention.
You are aware, my dear niece, that during the last war with
Great Britain I was placed in command of a fortress on Lake .
I know it, sir. It was when you were taken prisoner, being
compelled to surrender to the enemy.
Yes, he answered with a faint affirmative. Now learn my
dishonor from my own lips.
No one can couple your name with dishonor, she cried, with
the indignant sensibility of that quick affection which scorns the
thought of infamy touching a loved name.
It is a painful task I have to do to reverse your opinion of me,
dear Caroline. But there are mitigating circumstances. The
command
of fort  was given to me to maintain against the forces
of General Leslie which were investing it. I knew General Leslie
intimately. When I was to Eton school in England we were
classmates
and as intimate as twin brothers. That intimacy continued
through the university so unbroken, that we were called by our
friends Damon and Pythias. The designation was prophetic, as
you will see. A few days after I was to leave Oxford and England,
I was involved in a duel with an unprincipled party, who used foul
play and would have assassinated me but for Leslie's presence of
mind. I owed my life to his presence and decision. Twice before
I had saved his life. When I left Oxford to go to Portsmouth to
embark for the United States, he accompanied me to that port.
When we parted we swore eternal friendship. I pledged myself
never to refuse any favor he should ask of me, and he on his part
made the same pledge.
This was many years before the war broke out between our
respective governments. I drew the sword for my country and took
the field. He had previously entered the army, and the last year
of the war a regiment was given him. The command of fort
was bestowed upon me when it was threatened by his forces; for
after his arrival in America he was made a Brigadier General, and
menaced at the head of eighteen hundred men the position I held.
We were in all four hundred and eighty men, our position strong,
we had plenty of water, provisions, and ammunition to stand a six
months' siege.
Yet the place fell into General Leslie's hands, sir, if I recollect
right, on the tenth day after he came before it.
Yes, answered Colonel Harwood, with a deep sigh. The
evening of the first day a flag of truce was sent to the fortress from
the British army. I received it. The bearer, a captain, handed
5
me a sealed letter, marked `Private, C. L.' I knew the initials to
be those of my friend. I retired to my quarters and opening it,
read as follows:
`
My dear Harwood
,I regret as much as you can that our
second meeting should be in the attitude of foes. At heart we are
friends, at least I answer for my own heart. I do not mistrust you.
I am commanded by the General-in-chief to take the fortress you
hold, if at the sacrifice of every man in my three regiments. The
fortress
must
fall sooner or later. The American armies have
enough to employ them, without weakening their operations by
coming to your aid. Now is the time for you to redeem your
pledge to me. I call upon you to surrender the fortress to me in
the spirit of this pledge. I am sincere. Had you anticipated me,
and first sent to me to retire from the fortress I should have
obeyed
.
What less can you do? Let me hear whether your friendship
bears the test that I now apply to it! The surrender can be made
without affecting your honor. It shall be as if by the chance of
war. Send me a
plan
of all the approaches and the position of the
aqueduct by which water is supplied from the lake, and I will cut
off the water and manage to get my men within your posts by
means of your plan, so that there will be no alternative between
surrender or carnage. Let me have a line from you whether I can
trust to you to fulfil your pledge.'
And
did
you listen to him, uncle? cried Caroline, with fear
and trembling, her eyes at the same time expressing by their fire
her strong feeling of resentment at the unblushing audacity of the
demand. Surely you will say you shunned the application which
was as insulting to you as dishonorable to him.
Would to God I had done so, Caroline! No, I listened. I
thought more of my personal honor with a man who was now my
national foe, than of my country's welfare or of my national honor.
I replied to him that I was ready to redeem my pledge.
And did you not feel that he was unworthy of your friendship,
thus to demand its fulfilment?
I did not
then;
I did afterwards, as you shall hear. I replied
to his letter, and he again to mine. A secret correspondence was
kept up between us for three days. I wrote him at least fifteen
letters, and also sent him in sealed packages plans of all the
approaches
to the fort, and information where he could cut off the
supply of water.
Oh! uncle, what treachery! what infamy and dishonor! she
cried, covering her face with her hands.
I shall not be surprised if you curse me.
Were you mad, sir? Had you your reason, sir? she earnestly
demanded, fixing upon him her rigid gaze.
I was blinded by a romantic, mad notion of friendship. I
defended
my conduct by recollecting the devotion of Damon and
Pythias.
But Damon only risked life; you
honor!
Do not sharpen by your cutting words the bitter anguish of my
soul, he cried with emotion. Listen and hear all, and then if you
scorn me I shall feel that I deserve not only your contempt, but that
of every honest man.
CHAPTER XIII.
THE FATHER AND NIECE.
Colonel Harwood
, after a few moment's silence to control his
feelings
,
thus resumed his narrative to his daughter:
The negociations between us continued as I have said for three
days, at the expiration of which time General Leslie had possession
of all the information necessary for him to take possession of the
fortress. His first act was to cut off the supply of water. At the
end of three days more the garrison was in the utmost distress for
want of water, and all ignorant of the cause which prevented its
flow into the fortress as formerly. Taking advantage of this
distress
,
General Leslie made his approaches night after night nearer
and nearer the walls where they were weakest, as I had pointed
out to him in my plans. At length on the night of the tenth day a
general attack was made, and the garrison finding resistance
madness
,
with the enemy five times their number within the defences,
yielded without striking a blow. I and a few of my officers made
a stand until we were taken prisoners. The resistance of my
officers
was real; that on my part only feigned.
Oh! my dear, wretched uncle!
Do not yet condemn me. I was under an illusion of madness,
I verily believe. I became General Leslie's prisoner. No one
suspected
my agency in the fall of the fortress. No one could have
expected us to hold out, with our daily supply of water cut off. Not
a breath censured me. It was `the fortune of war,' so called.
Oh, what treachery! muttered the young girl, in the low tone
of deep amazement and indignation.
Hear me to the end, continued Colonel Harwood, looking as
if he would sink under her proud glance of scornful surprise. I
was not wholly lost. I was soon awakened to a full sense of my
folly and madness by the conduct of Leslie himself. The day after
the surrender I had made of the fortress, and also of my honor, he
invited me to dine with him alone. After dinner we were walking
in a grove, when he discovered to me as we conversed the falsity
of his true character. Said he to me,
`Harwood, do you know that I had not the least idea you
would treat my proposition, for you to give up the fort in
accordance
to the terms of our old pledge, with seriousness; much more
go to work so systematically.' He then laughed as if laughing at
my weakness.
`Would
you
not have done so?' I asked with surprise.
`I? no, no. I am not quite so Quixotic, my dear Harwood!
My King and country and national honor I always put before
private
friendship. Nevertheless, I am under the greatest obligations
to you.' This was spoken coolly and with an insulting air.
`You are a villain!' I exclaimed. `I have been a fool; but I
will do what I can to redeem my own self-respect. Draw and
defend yourself?'
Although a prisoner I retained my sword. He wore his at his
side. He stared at me to see if I was in earnest. I replied by
pressing the point of my sword against his breast and calling upon
him to defend his life. He turned deadly white but drew his sword,
and endeavored to cut me down with the same motion as it flew
out of its sheath. I parried at the thrust. We fought for a few
seconds, and my sword passed through his body. He fell dead
almost instantly. I looked around and seeing that the combat had
not been witnessed, for we were together in a little clump of trees
in the rear of his tent, I stooped down to search him for the letters
which I had written to him. But they were not upon his person.
I then took from his finger his signet ring, and hastening to the
tent which I had to pass through to escape, I presented it to the
sentinel in front, saying that I was going by permission of General
Leslie. I was beyond the limits of the
British
camp and effected
my escape to the American lines before the alarm was given.
I have heard that General Leslie was slain, but it was supposed
by an assassin who waylaid him. Could it have been by your
hand that he fell?
Yes, and in the manner stated. I was not suspected of having
slain him, as no one knew that I had dined with him in private
save his sentinel and servant; and when I went out with him after
dinner it was to go to my own quarters, which lay in an opposite
direction from the spot where he was found. My escape was
attributed
to the confusion caused by his death, as I was on parole to
him only, and it was supposed that looking upon his death as a
termination of the parole, that I resolved to leave the camp. From
that hour to this I have never been suspected, save in one instance,
of having been a traitor. In slaying the base Leslie I had removed
the witness of my guilt. But he brought his death upon himself.
And why, my dear uncle, have you unfolded to me all this
painful story? Would to God you had kept the secret in your own
breast! It overwhelms me with grief and fills my bosom with
strange feelings towards you, that I would never had found place
there. I would rather have died than known that one whom I
believed the very mirror of honor, a proper pattern of an upright
gentleman, a patriotic and brave soldier, should thus be proven to
have fallen so low. How,oh! how can I esteem you as I have
done? I have loved you, because I believed you all that was good
and noble. My dear uncle, this revelation almost breaks my heart.
Oh! why have you revealed this to me?
God knows I would have kept the secret forever sealed,
Caroline.
You were mad,you were mad, sir, to listen to Leslie! Do I
gaze on a traitor? Sir, if I had read in a book of history the story
of an American officer who had thus betrayed his country, I should
have scorned him. But I will not hate
you
, I cannot hate you, my
dear uncle. I will forgive you.
Will you? he cried, with joyful emotion.
I will
try
to, I will try to forget. Oh, that I had never heard!
My uncle, so beloved and honored, a traitor!
Alas! you can neither forgive nor forget, though your heart
prompts you to. Your proud spirit, Caroline, will bend your
affection
to it. I do not look for your love; and I fear that my object
in unfolding to you this humiliating confession will not be attained;
it is only
to your love
, your deep, faithful affection for me, that I look
for success.
Uncle, what can
I
do do for you? What is there that I can do
that can weigh against this painful relation with which you preface
your request?
I dare not speak. You look coldly upon me.
Nay, I
will
forget, my dear uncle. I love you still! she cried,
throwing her arms about him. Though you have been false to
your country, you have been true and good ever to me.
Noble girl! he cried, almost overcome with his grateful
emotions.
Now let me hear what you wish me to do? she said, with a
winning smile; though I cannot conceive what I have in my
poor power to perform, that can parallel with the dreadful confession
you have felt it necessary to make before asking me.
I will, I
must
say what I came here to say, Caroline.
Speak freely, sir, she said, with frank sincerity.
The correspondence which passed between me and Leslie has
come to light.
How? I trembled for this.
I do not know
how
. But every letter that I wrote to General
Leslie, with all the plans enclosed and all the damning proofs of my
treason, are in the hands of a man in this city.
Then you are lost! cried Caroline Kent, with almost a
shriek.
I am glad that you fear for me and feel for me. It leads me to
hope that you will resolve to save me.
Save you! Can I save you?
You can; it is in your power to make me a happy man; it is
in your power, Caroline, to dissipate the horrible fears that for some
weeks past have weighed upon my mind, and almost driven me to
suicide.
Speak, sir! I will do it.
I ask of you no promise until you have heard what I require of
you. The papers which are held by this person are in themselves
sufficient to bring me to an ignominious death; to brand my name
to the world with infamy; to destroy the hopes of my children; to
cause the finger of scorn to be pointed at my dear boy, who is now
in his country's service; in a word to wreck all that I am and all
who have any connection with me.
And how can this be averted? What can one so insignificant
as
I
do, sir?
You shall hear, though I would rather my tongue were
paralyzed
than it should utter the words. The man who holds these fatal
papers is a lawyer, and though a person of extraordinary talents, a
man wholly destitute of principle. You see I describe to you his
character fairly, for you shall do nothing blindly; and in the end it
depends upon you to refuse or assent. His name is Simmins
Satchell.
I have heard of him. I have seen him pass the gate. Once he
looked at me so fixedly that I was alarmed, and inquired of one of
the young girls who he was, and they said it was the person you
have named. He looks to me, sir, like an evil man; his
countenance
was dark and sinister; his very glance which met mine made
me shudder instinctively.
And well it might, poor child, if you knew all. When did you
see him? asked Colonel Harwood, eagerly.
But ten days ago; it was as I was just coming in from a walk
upon the common.
He did not speak?
No, sir; he looked at me in the most close and scrutinizing
way, and with a boldness that offended me, while it excited
alarm.
Already prejudiced, said the Colonel, in a half-tone to himself.
He has no hope; but I will do my duty, and the responsibility
will remain with him. This Satchell, resumed the Colonel,
came to me some weeks ago and desired an interview. He was
then a perfect stranger to me. He made known to me that he had
come to the knowledge that I had betrayed the fortress which had
fallen into General Leslie's hands, and stated that he held the proofs
in the correspondence which passed between us at the time. Judge
my feelings! He refused to tell me how he came by it. At length
he offered to place it at my disposal for a sum of money. I have
offered him from time to time an amount that at length reached five
thousand dollars,all I am worth save the house I live in. Last
week he gave me to understand that he would accept this sum. I
hoped he would, for I was ready to make any sacrifice rather than be
branded as a traitor.
Yes, yes, she said, with intense eagerness.
Last night he came to see me. When he entered I supposed it
was to bring the fatal packet of letters and receive the five thousand
dollars. But alas, my dear niece, he now took a new position
altogether; hitherto he had seemed to me to be governed by an
avaricious desire to make as much money out of my fears as he
could by his bargain; for he confessed he had bought the letters of
a person to speculate upon; but now his attitude and terms
changed.
Did he demand more, sir?
More? He demanded what could not be compared with money;
he demanded what I had not the power to grant; and in case of
my refusal he said that he would at once communicate the papers
to the Government.
To the Government! repeated Caroline Kent, with surprise
and alarm agitating her fine face.
Yes. Once in the hands of the President, my condemnation,
my
death
would be inevitable.
What did he ask? she cried, clasping her hands together in
agony.
That which is beyond price, and without which he will accept
nothing.
Name it, sir?
Your hand.
My
hand! she gasped, with horror in her looks.
Yes. It is said at last, Caroline. He demands your hand in
marriage. Without it he swears,and he is a man who will keep
his oath,that the Government shall be informed of my treason.
This is fearful! What can he mean? My hand in marriage!
No, no! he could not have placed your honor and happiness,your
life too,on that condition.
It was his only condition. He said that if I would give my
consent, and say
to you
that I had done so, he would be satisfied;
he would make me no further responsible for the manner you might
receive him, but at once surrender me the papers.
And you gave your consent?
What could I do, Caroline? My consent does not involve
yours. You are free to act as you will.
The young lady rose up and paced the room for some time in
silence, with a flushed cheek and flashing eye.
CHAPTER XIV.
THE DECISION.
Colonel Harwood
, after having made a full revelation of the
subject which had brought him to seek the interview with his
daughter, remained silently watching her face as she walked quickly
up and down the room. He could not tell how she received his
words, whether her flashing eyes were for himself, or caused by
Satchell's audacity.
At length she sat down by him. Her features were stern, and
their rigid expression contrasted strangely with their delicate
contour
.
Sir , she said in a tone that startled him, for the voice
did not seem to be hers. Other words she tried to articulate, but a
shower of tears burst from her eyes, and dropping her face upon her
father's hand she wept like a child. He could not witness such
powerful emotion unmoved; his chest heaved convulsively, and he
seemed overcome; his strong frame was shaken like an aspen leaf
in the breeze.
Look up, my child! look up, dear niece, he said. Do not
break my heart. I recall all that I have said; I will let him do his
worst; I will bear my own shame and not involve your happiness.
You shall not wreck yourself for me. Come, I will go to him! I
will defy him!
No,
no!
she cried' grasping his arm and pressing him back
into his chair; no, it will not do. You must not let this infamy
fall upon you; nay, it is life and death, sir. I will do as you
command
.
Send him hither.
No; you speak as if you were ready to die with the idea of
being united to this man.
I have made up my mind what I will do; send him hither,
she said, scarcely stirring her lips; for her voice seemed to come
from her very soul.
You know that it depends on yourself, my dear Caroline.
I
have done
my
part. The papers he will place in my possession
within this hour. There is no doubt that he will call to see you.
Send him; I do not fear to meet him, she said, with a
calmness
that amazed him.
You do not think of consenting to wed him! he exclaimed,
with surprise.
Will he be content with less, sir, do you hope? Was it not the
condition?
Not exactly the condition. He said that if I gave my consent
and told you that I had given him my consent, it was enough; the
correspondence should be delivered into my hands. I know not
why he made such singular conditions; it surprised me, and I
believed
he must have seen you, and got some hope from you that
made him sanguine of success.
Hope from me?
You do not understand my idea, Caroline. I feared from his
seeming confidence that he should have no difficulty with you if he
got my consent and influence; that he might have in some way
possessed a power over you, as he has over me. He is a singular,
a dangerous man; and he seems to come at the knowledge of things
in a way perfectly unaccountable. I therefore feared he might
know
that you dared not refuse him, having you in his power.
Heaven forbid! You make me horrified, sir! He has no
power over me.
I
have never done any thing that could give him
power over me. He can have no such mysterious influence as you
suspect.
It is very extraordinary, more and more so. I do not
understand
him. One thing is very clear, he would not say he would
surrender the papers without feeling confident that the condition he
named would be feasible. He would not surrender them upon an
uncertainty.
He has not yet given them up?
No.
Nor do I think he will till I give him my consent.
He solemnly promised to do so, so soon as I returned to the office
and told him that I had seen and told you that on your marrying
him hung my life and honor.
And will he take your word?
Yes, answered Colonel Harwood, coloring quickly.
Do you
know
that he will?
I believe when he says a thing he will do it, he responded,
conscious that Satchell still would hold a rein over him, should he
deceive him, in the secret he possessed of his daughter's illegitimate
birth.
It may be so. My dear uncle, what you expect of me is a
sacrifice that is greater than that of my life. But how can I refuse
to save you even at the sacrifice of myself? To you I owe all my
nurture, my education, my enjoyments and privileges; to you I
owe all but life, and had you been my father you could not have
been more kind to me. I feel called upon to surrender all I am to
save you, for what I am I owe to you. But perhaps this dreadful
sacrifice need not take place. I wish to see this man; I do not fear
him. There is nothing in an evil man for the innocent to fear.
Say not a word. Your danger is imminent; I will save you.
Kind, good, noble creature! I seem to be a demon in your
presence
.
I cannot consent; I will go to his office; I shall find him
alone; I will seize him by the throat; I will tear the papers from
his heart, if he should have hid them there; I will take his life!
It is better he should die than you be sacrificed to a man you can
never love,nay, must despise and scorn, and to bear whose name
would be infamy.
Hist, my dear uncle; be calm, I beseech you; do not act
rashly
;
do not add to treason murder. Nothing can save you but my
sacrifice, or, what I trust most to, my influence with that fearful
man. I pray you, compose yourself. I do not condemn you for
coming to me at this crisis. It is not your fault that he made me
the instrument of the condition he named; your error, alas! is of
older date; it lay in your treason at the outset. Thus, you see,
my dear uncle, how wrong done at some former period mars, like a
crack in a vase, the whole symmetry of life.
I feel it, my dear CarolineI feel the truth of it in my inmost
heart.
Leave the matter now with me. When shall I see this man?
To-day; but I will let you know in half an hour. Will you
see him here and alone?
Yes. I do not fear him.
Poor, dear, noble child of my heart! How can I, knowing this
evil man, expose you to his presence!
There is no alternative, my dear uncle, she said, with sad
firmness, rising up. Do not lengthen the time. The sooner I
see him the sooner your mind and my own will be relieved; for I
have the deepest curiosity, if I may call the feeling I experience by
so light a term, to know on what he has based his confidence
respecting
me.
I will send you word as soon as I see him when he will come.
And also whether you have received those fatal papers from
him; but I fear that you will find, sir, that this event will depend
upon the issue of his interview with me.
Were this Mr. Satchell a few years younger, and were he not
the notoriously infamous character that he is, it would not be so
great a sacrifice to a young girl to wed him, as he is a man of
superior
talents, and has property.
That is, if he were any other person than Mr. Satchell, he
wouldn't be Mr. Satchell, uncle.
You have explained my words very sensibly. As he is, for he
is near fifty, rude in his manners and coarse in his person, you
could only look upon him with repulsion, though he bore an honest
name among men. But were he an Adonis in person, I do not
suppose
,
my sweet girl, that you would love him, if you still recollect
Edward Manning.
Recollect Edward Manning, sir! she repeated, deeply
confused
,
and looking as if suddenly grief-stricken by his words. O,
how can the heart forget! No, sir, I can never forget him; I can
never cease to love him, though wedded to another. To me he is
still the same. I shall cease to love him when my heart ceases to
beat; I shall forget him when memory and the spirit and the soul
die.
I am sorry for you, Caroline. I have felt deeply your
disappointment
since by accident I discovered that he was the object of
your attachment.
Attachment! it is a cold word, sir; passion! she cried, with
animation almost wildly eloquent, deep, heart-burning
passion
, is
the word to express what I feltnay, what I
feel!
He is married,
more's the pity! she said, touchingly. If there is a woman I
love because she loves him, yet hate because he loves her, it is his
beautiful wife. Oh, dear uncle, in alluding to
him
you have struck
a chord that for weeks I have dared not stir, even in the loneliness
of my chamber, lest its broken notes should drive me wild. I have
tried hard to keep my heart down and teach it to submit. Go, sir!
I must be alone; I have need to compose my spirits.
Forgive me, Caroline?
Yes, I forgive. Do not stay; leave me to myself, dear uncle,
she cried passionately.
He hesitated whether it were safe to do so, she seemed so
strangely excited. But she waved her hand nervously and rapidly
for him to depart. He closed the door, and descended the stairs
with a slow step and a heavy heart, listening as he went, expecting
each moment to hear a shriek of anguish from the room.
Poor girl! as if I had not torn her heart enough, he said sadly,
but I must allude to her unfortunate attachment to Edward
Manning
,
and open again the fountains of her grief. But she will soon
be calm, she has such wonderful self-possession. I will now hasten
on my errand. Is it possible that I am at last so near the possession
of those long wished for papers, that hang, like the sword of
Diogenes
,
above my head! he exclaimed, as he hurried to the
street-gate
,
his bosom glowing with that selfish joy which irresistibly at
such a time would be experienced by the most disinterested. For
a few moments, in the contemplation of his own happy success, he
forgot the sacrifice at which he was about to obtain it. Such is
human nature. The noblest emotions of gratitude ultimately
resolve
themselves into a man's own
proprium
, and lose their
individuality
in his.
But ere Colonel Harwood reached the alley in which Satchell's
office stood, his thoughts were again upon his daughter; and more
than once his step faltered, and he half-turned, as if resolved not to
put her to the trial. But when he reflected how all else depended
upon it and that it must be done, he moved onward again. As he
came into the alley the clock of the Old South struck twelve.
It is just the hour I appointed to meet him, he exclaimed,
hastening up the alley, his heart throbbing with mingled hope and
fear, as the probability of getting or not getting his papers rose and
fell in his agitated mind.
As he came to the door, in his absence of mind he stepped into a
pool of soft mud and water which was directly under the window
of Handy, the boot black's room. Whether Handy kept that
particular
puddle of water there for the purpose of muddying the boots
of gentlemen who were passing, (as the alley was a great
thoroughfare
,)
and thus get custom, is a question that we will not answer,
as we do not wish to record any thing against Handy, that would
lessen the consideration the discriminating reader may have already
entertained for him. The fact is, however, that every day, during
the dryest weather particularly, this little dirty puddle was there;
and upon an average seven gentlemen
per diem
irretrievably soiled
their boots therein, and Handy being at home, after the example of
surgeons who are ever ready at hand when side-walks are slippery,
got the polishing of them. This little pond was a source of great
revenue to Handy, much more so indeed than the Frog Pond ever
promises to be to the Corporation.
Massa, you hab muddy you boot, cried Handy, to Colonel
Harwood; and springing forward with his brush in his hand, the
sable African caught the Colonel by the ancle and held him fast,
while he began to rub his boot with the most praise worthy zeal.
The Colonel, however was in no mood at such a time to be
detained
;
so unceremoniously overthrowing the astonished Handy
with a thrust of his foot, he hastened into the entry and up the
tottering stair-way to Satchell's office.
That am a berry independum gemman, Kaleb, said Handy,
picking himself up and then gathering his brushes from the ground.
He 'pear berry much in a hurry.
You lose you sixpence dat time, neighbor Handy,,' said Kaleb
the cobler, who sat with his door open upon his bench hammering
out a piece of sole leather upon his lap-stone. If I was the
gentlemen
that step in your puddle there, I would give you a rap over
the head.
You ain't no gen'leman, Master Kaleb Kemp, and derefore you
don't do 'em, answered Handy, with ineffable dignity.
If I was the town I would make you pay taxes on your
duckpond
,
continued Kaleb, good naturedly.
Don't you say nothin', Mas' Kaleb. Don't I bring you custom?
How many boot you tink I
rip
when I clean 'em, and recommen'
gen'lemen to paternise you.
It is very true, Handy, responded the little cobbler, laughing,
and giving a rap, a-tap, rap upon his sole-leather. How is your
Rosy since you saw her last, Handy?
She berry well, Mr. Kemp. How am you' lady? interrogated
Handy, in his turn. And the two gentlemen then proceeded to
converse upon the respective merits of calf-skin and morrocco for
boots.
CHAPTER XV.
THE SURRENDER OF THE PAPERS.
Satchell
was in his dingy office seated at his table in the
armchair
,
when a rap at his door caused him to lay down several papers
which he was examining, and look at his watch.
It is two minutes past twelve, he mumbled. It must be
Harwood.
He rose and proceeded to the door of his office-and let in Colonel
Harwood, saying, in a bland manner,
Glad to see you, my dear sir. From your looks you have
succeeded
with your daughter.
My
niece
, Mr. Satchell! cried Colonel Harwood, with alarm.
Do not forget yourself again.
I did forget. Be seated, sir, he added, as he re-locked his
door.
Colonel Harwood bowed and remained standing; for his former
experience had told him that Satchell's chairs were not to be
trusted.
I have seen my niece, sir, observed the Colonel, his voice
agitated in spite of his effort to control its tremulous cadences.
And what said she? Did you make known to her that your
life and honor were in her hands? demanded Satchell, with a
keen observing glance from his brow-shadowed eyes.
Yes, sir, I made known to her so much of the facts as was
necessary, and as I had promised you I would do.
And she said what?
That she was ready to sacrifice herself, if needful for me.
Sacrifice?
Was that her word?
To speak frankly with you, it was.
Very well; I like her no less. No doubt she will look upon it
as a sacrifice to marry an elderly, middle-aged gentleman like
myself
.
I am very glad she thinks it will be a sacrifice.
You are?
Yes, sir, I am pleased with her remark; but I am surprised at
her readiness.
If you had been present, sir, at our trying interview you would
not have termed it readiness. I thought at one moment she would
have spurned me with scorn and indignation.
Yes, she is a spirited girl; that is clear from her eyes. So she
was reluctant at first?
No person could have been more so.
But she finally yielded?
That I cannot, will not say. I performed faithfully my part.
I have now come, sir, to see if you are ready to perform yours.
One question more. Do you think she will consent to marry
me?
I do not know, sir; she would only do it in the last extremity.
That is what I expected. Yet you still think that she
might
be driven to consent to be Mrs. Satchell? Speak plainly, Colonel.
I believe she would prefer death to such a marriage, answered
Colonel Harwood, firmly and plainly. I would rather die than
compel her to it. But I am not alone; there is my wife and
children
,
who will fall with me if I am arraigned and executed as a
traitor. Were I a bacheloralone in the world, sir, I would not
take these steps to keep you from doing your worst with those
documents. But if I can save my familymy spirited boyfrom
disgrace by this marriage, and she is readynay, insists, now that
she knows all, that she shall be made the victim, not me, I can only
let it take its course. It is humiliating; but it is the decree of
fate.
Her repugnance to me you think was very positive?
I do. But you seem to be pleased at this.
I am; I shall, you see, have the greater satisfaction in
overcoming
it.
You are a very extraordinary person. You seem to rejoice in
what threatens to ensure your defeat.
No, I shall not be defeated. The more repugnance she has to
me the better.
Have you any secret power over my daughter, sir, as you have
over me? asked Colonel Harwood, with amazement and alarm.
No, sir, responded Satchell, smiling, with a sinister movement
of the muscles of his lip. Where is your daughteryour
niece
, I
would say?
At Madame Delano's.
Did you tell her I would wait upon her?
Yes.
And what said she to that?
That she would see you.
How did she appear when she said this?
Pale, sir, but firm.
Did she say that she should accept my proposals to her?
She said, sir, that she was prepared to take any step to save
me.
Even to the dreaded one of marrying me? added Satchell,
sarcastically.
Yes, answered the Colonel, agitated with indignant grief at
the painful situation into which his conduct had placed his child.
He looked upon Satchell with the deepest hatred, while he feared
him, as having in his hands the power over his life and honor, and
the happiness of his family. He felt that he could spring upon him
there as he stood before him, and not only wrest the papers from
his hand, which held them in its grasp, but take his life and rid
society of a monster. But Satchell was a man of a more powerful
frame and younger than himself, and the issue he feared might go
against him, when he felt that his fate would be sealed; that, after
such an unsuccessful attempt to gain possession of the papers, no
power on earth would induce him to withhold them from the
Government
at Washington. He therefore said as calmly as he could,
I hope, sir, that you will now surrender to me those letters and
plans, as you promised.
I promised that you should have them, and you shall. There,
sir, he added, extending to him the package of papers, you will
find them all there, I believe.
Colonel Harwood almost bounded towards him in his eagerness
to get the fatal papers in his hands. He grasped them with a
strange cry of mixed joy and triumph, and with trembling fingers
examined them one by one by the light of the candle, his whole
frame shaking so with emotion that the floor vibrated, as it often
did when a heavily loaded dray thundered past in the adjacent
street.
Satchell stood by looking at him with a look of seeming
indifference
,
though a slight smile moved across his face at witnessing the
extraordinary agitation of his late victim.
You find them all right, sir, I believe, he said quietly, after
the last document had been opened and glanced at.
Yes, yes,
all are
here. Mr. Satchell, this moment is the
happiest
of my life! If ever I felt grateful to Almighty God it is at this
moment. I hold in my hand the cause of more wretchedness to me
than ever lay at a man's heart. These papers that I now grasp
have caused me days of misery and wakeful nights of horror.
Thank God, I have them now! and I can even thank you. I feel
as if I could embrace you for delivering them into my possession.
There is my hand, sir. I forgive and forget all that is past.
I never shake any man by the hand, Colonel, answered
Satchell.
Very well, let it pass. I am so overjoyed that I could not only
take by the hand but hug to my heart every beggar I meet in the
street. Can I realize that I hold these fatal letters in my hand? Oh,
joy! joy!
You seem to forget at
what price
you have got them back, sir,
observed Satchell, with deliberate and malicious desire to darken
his felicity.
A cloud instantly passed across his face. He sighed heavily, and
ejaculated with anguish,
Poor Caroline! My dear victimized child!
One would think I were a very respectable devil, Colonel, the
way you regard a woman's marriage with me.
When I
know
WHAT you are, sir, is there any surprise that I
should feel as I do? But the sacrifice is made! But these papers
shall never more rise in judgment against me! as he spoke he
approached the fire, and deliberately placed upon the blaze the
letters, one after another, and watched with intense attention each
as it consumed to ashes. When he had in this manner destroyed
the last vestige of his treason he rose up, and turned upon Satchell
a countenance that fairly shone with serene happiness. He seemed
to be another man altogether. Joy, peace, composure all at once had
returned to his features, from which they had so long been exiled.
Satchell marked with surprise the change.
You seem to be a happy man, Colonel Harwood.
I am, sir. There is but one cloud that casts its shadow over
my peace. It is the reflection of my poor child's fate.
Do not tremble for her.
I do not mean to, sir. I still feel that I am her father, and I
shall watch over her with a father's eye.
You need not fear for your daughter, Colonel Harwood. I
swear to you, she shall not marry me without her free consent.
You do?
Yes.
Then you have surrendered to me those papers! cried the
Colonel, as he looked with an air of satisfaction at the heap of white
ashes where he had consumed them. You have put out of your
hands those papers without recompense; for she will never consent
to become your wife.
Very well. I can but try, he answered carelessly.
Mr. Satchell, from your confident manner, I feel confident you
possess some secret power over hersome hold upon her fears.
No, sir; I have never spoken to her. The first time I ever
knew you had such a child, or that she was in existence, was some
three months ago, in the second interview which I had with you.
And in what way then?
From your own lips. When I demanded a high price for the
letters, you said that you could not pay it, unless your
niece
was so
fortunate as to marry a rich young man to whom she was tenderly
attached. Upon my questioning you closely, you told me that it
was Mr. Edward Manning, the son of Judge Manning. You added
that you hoped the marriage would take place, in which case you
knew that your
niece
would place the money at your disposal.
This was my first knowledge of your child, whom you then called,
not your daughter, but your
niece
. Upon my asking you what
hope there was of the union, for I wanted to know what probability
there was of my getting the sum I at first demanded, your account
led me to see at once that there was no hope for it; for he already
was betrothed to another, (whom he has married a few weeks
since,) and that the passion was a romantic one wholly on her side.
No, sir, I hold no secret talisman over your child. I depend only
upon natural circumstances for a successful interview with her.
Please inform her that I will call upon her at seven this evening.
Not before?
No; I have engagements all the afternoon. You seem to be in
haste, he said, with a keen glance.
Yes, I am desirous and so is she of having the interview over.
In good time. Now that you have got the possession of the
mischievous papers, the matter rests with me and her.
How you could give me those documents so freely on an
uncertainty
,
after having refused five thousand dollars, I cannot
understand
,
sir.
Perhaps you will, one of these days.
Will you tell me, before I leave,
how
those papers came into
your possession?
Willingly. I was called upon to give advice to a couple of
criminals in jail. They had been guilty of robbery and murder.
One of them had been a soldier in the war, and in your garrison.
For some offence you had him severely whipped at the drum-head.
He deserted, and fled to the British camp. He became a servant
of General Leslie's, and in his services as valet became a ware of the
correspondence, by finding the letters in the General's pocket. One
day he took his opportunity to secrete them, resolved to escape and
in revenge lay them before the United States Government. This
was the very day General Leslie was killed; and as he fled about
the moment of that event, he was supposed to have been the
murderer
.
Fearing, therefore, that he would be arrested for it, he
changed his name and made his way to a sea-port. He had not
money to reach Washington, and so he shipped for a voyage to get
funds. He was shipwrecked and met with various adventures, but
always kept these papers, they being in a belt about his body; for
revenge always takes good care of the instruments by which it is
to be achieved. At length, several years after the war, he found
his way here again, and committed a robbery and murder.
Finding
I could not do any thing with his case, and that he would
without
doubt be convicted, I told him so, and advised him to make up
his mind to die. He then told me he had these papers and their
history, and asked me if I would see that the Government had
them. He offered them to me for twenty dollars; I paid it to him,
for I saw at a glance their
value
. The man was in a month
afterwards
executed; the papers
are there
in their ashes.
CHAPTER XVI.
THE UNCLE AND NIECE.
When
Satchell had concluded his account of the mode in which the
papers had come into his possession, Colonel Harwood, who had
listened with deep attention, said,
I remember distinctly the man and for what I had him so
severely
flogged; I also recollect his desertion. How extraordinary
that he should have been so mysteriously the instrument of my
subsequent sufferings and my present anxiety; for now that I am
relieved respecting myself, through the destruction of this
treasonable
correspondence, I begin to feel fearfully for my dear child.
Would to God, Mr. Satchell, you would forego this thing. Be a
generous man, sir. Have pity upon her. Would you wed one
who loathes you?
You need not make any appeal to me, Colonel Harwood. The
price has been paid you. Your daughter is mine.
But only of her free will.
I repeat
only
of her free will.
Then she is safe. But suppose she refuses you, what equivalent
have you for the loss of the five thousand dollars which you might
have obtained for those papers?
6
I have no fears of losing, sir. Good morning, Colonel. I have
an engagement abroad at this hour.
Good morning, sir, answered Colonel Harwood, with difficulty
repressing his anger at this cavalier mode of terminating the
interview
.
Remember, Mr. Satchell, he said, as he went out, that
I no longer stand in fear of you; you are no longer my tyrant; and
I give you fair warning that I shall protect my child against any
force or machinations which you may attempt to bring to your
aid.
Do not fear, sir. But I would inform you, Colonel Harwood,
that you forget that I still have power over you. You know that I
hold a secret almost as dear to you as that I have but now
resigned
.
True, true! cried the poor man. When shall I be free from
your clutches and evil power? he groaned out.
When I have accomplished my revenge.
Revenge! Against me?
No.
Against my daughter?
No, sir.
Then whom?
It is not discreet to tell one's secret, answered Satchell, but
it is a man I do not love, he added, with the deepest intonation
of hatred.
But what connection can this person who has incurred your
hatred have with me or my daughter, that you couple our names?
Did I couple your names?
You said your evil power over me would only terminate when
your vengeance terminates; yet you say your vengeance is not
against me nor my daughter.
You repeat only that which is the truth.
Yet, one would think,
I
must think, sir, that you hate my
child, in that you are willing to render her miserable. Could you
not have devised any other condition for the surrender of the
papers?
It is too late now to complain, sir, answered Satchell, closing
the door and locking it after him.
Colonel Harwood finding himself in the narrow entry went down
stairs and out of the house, Satchell following him. As they went
out of the alley-door, Satchell said,
You will notify your
niece
, sir, that I will see her at seven this
evening. With these parting words he turned down the alley.
Colonel Harwood walked slowly up the alley in the opposite
direction. He had now achieved the great object of his desires;
he had got possession of papers which would have hanged him; he
had burned them, one by one, and seen them consume to ashes. A
heavy load that nearly sunk him into the grave was all at once
lifted from his heart. He had received a reprieve like a criminal
condemned to die, and pardoned at the moment of execution. Yet,
now, that the first emotion of joy was passed, he seemed, when he
thought upon poor Caroline, to have purchased his reprieve at
a price far higher than it was worth; for, always, things ardently
longed for, when possessed seem valueless.
He took his way towards the boarding-school, thinking it better
to see his daughter in person than write her a note.
He found her alone in her room; her face was very pale, but she
met him with a smile. He thought that her manner was
constrained
:
it might have been so; for when one has loved what was
believed to be good, when it finds it has loved what is false, it may
still strive to yield as before the homage of the heart; but the heart
will slowly obey. Caroline could not forget the kindness she had
for years received from him, how he had watched over her, educated
her, supported her, and out of his narrow income giving her the
highest advantages of mental and personal cultivation. She loved
him for all this; she could never forget his kindness. But she had
been greatly, painfully disappointed to learn that her
uncle
was a
traitor. She might still love him indeed, but she felt she could never
respect him. She could no longer see in him the brave soldier, as
she gazed upon his gray hair, and fine, military countenance, and
martial figure, but the traitor! Still, still he was her uncle, she
would exclaim, as she sat by her window after he left her, sadly
reflecting upon the scene she had passed through with him. She
was a proud, sensitive, high-minded girl, and she felt keenly her
uncle's degradation; for in her mind he was degraded; to her
idolized love he had fallen. She could never look upon him in the
same light she had done. Perhaps she thought more heavily of his
treason than of her own painful situation with reference to Satchell.
Have you seen him, sir? she asked, as Colonel Harwood
entered
and seated himself.
I have, Caroline.
And those dreadful papers?
He gave them into my hands.
Allall of them?
Yes. I am free! I burned them up one by one before I quitted
his office; I saw them in their ashes.
And you have nothing more to fear then from that unhappy
affair? she continued, in the same rapid tone of interrogation.
Nothing, my dear girl.
Then my heart is light again! she cried, with joyful smiles;
now that this fearful danger no longer hangs over you, I am
happy. Your life, your honor, your family are saved.
But you forget the price, my dear Caroline, he said sadly, and
taking her hand.
No, I do not, she answered with emotion, but firmly. What
said this man? Did he freely give the papers?
Yes.
Only upon your assertion that you had seen me?
Yes, strange as it is, he surrendered them at once.
And yet was not certain that I would consent to be made the
price; it is extraordinary!
To me unexplicable. He is one of the most singular men I
ever knew; his conduct seems inconsistent, but I know that he is
not a man who will do things unadvisedly. He has some deep
motive; in a word, he
knows
that you will consent to be his wife.
How can he know it, sir? she exclaimed, with flashing eyes.
I do not say he knows it.
No, no; he cannot know what is not nor cannot be.
Has he not ever seen you except at the time you saw him at
the gate?
Not to my knowledge.
Can he have any power over you from any act of your life
unknown
to me?
No sir, she answered, deeply coloring at the inquiry; but it
was the rich hue of angry surprise at a question that involved the
inference of her having done some wrong in her life; no, sir, she
repeated, firmly.
I am then wholly at a loss.
When am I to see this extraordinary man, uncle? she asked,
with composure.
He says he will call here at seven o'clock this evening. Till
then he has engagements.
I will see him; I do not fear him; it is in my power to act
freely and independently, now you are no longer in his hands, dear
uncle.
Then you will refuse to wed him?
I do, most positively.
Thank Heaven! But I tremble for the consequences.
I am indifferent to them. He cannot force me to consent. I
wish to see him; I have firmness and character enough to carry
me through with the interview. Were your life and honor to depend
upon its issue, I should feel differently and tremble. But now that
he has surrendered the papers to you on his own expressed
conditions
,
I am at liberty to do as I please.
You are. I breathe more freely again, said the Colonel, with
animation. I think that, shrewd as he is, he has this time
overreached
himself. I will now bid you good morning. I left home
in such agitation and have been out so long, that they will be
alarmed if I am not there at dinner. Try and keep your mind
composed. I see that you nor I are in his power now. I will speak
to Madame Delano as I go down, and tell her that a gentleman will
call and see you on business this evening. I have the greatest
confidence
in your discretion and judgment; your mind is equal to his,
and I dare say he will find that though you are young, you are not
a weak young girl to be intimidated into a hateful union.
Doubtless
he hopes to work upon your fears, and in this places his chief
confidence of success; this must be his dependence. He regards
you as a young, timid school-girl, who will yield from alarm, whom
he can brow-beat. It is likely, when he saw you, that he took a
fancy to your face; for the idea that he has fallen in love, is
absurd.
Do not speak of it, sir. I shall not become his wife, he may be
assured.
Do you know that he is aware of your attachment to Edward
Manning?
How should he know it? she asked, with deep blushes and a
sparkling eye.
I told him of it.
In hopes to divert him from his purpose?
It was mentioned in our conversations, answered Colonel
Harwood
,
who thought it best not to inform her of the particulars, lest
she should in truth heartily despise him; for he knew she would
look with haughty repugnance upon the very idea of his pre-planning
advantages from her possible union with Manning.
What did he say?
He made no remark. But the hour of dinner is already at hand.
He will be here at seven. I shall be most anxious to learn the issue
of his interview; if I will send up my man Henry, will you
despatch a line or two to me stating the result?
I will, sir. Be assured that it will be favorable. Mr. Satchell
will retire from the contest with confusion; for now that he has
no power over you, he can hold none over me.
Colonel Harwood left the house, and as he walked along towards
his own abode, the last words she had spoken still echoed in his
ear:
Now that he has no power over you, he can hold none over
me.
They seemed to be repeated by a hundred inward voices. They
made a painful and still deeper impression upon him. He could
not help repeating the words aloud.
Yes,
if
it were true; if the words were
true
, he added, after
saying them over for the fifth time. He
still
has power over me,
though she knows it not. Alas, she is the object and instrument of
that power! he has a fearful power still. I would rather die than
have that sweet, proud girl know that she is my natural daughter;
it would either drive her to madness or to the most reckless
abandonment
of life and character. Caroline, in such case, could know
no half-way. Only by unfolding to her the secret of her birth,
could he have any influence with her. Dare he contemplate this?
if I thought so, he should not live an hour. But he solemnly
promised
secresy. He fulfilled his promise about the papers, and
promptly surrendered them. Doubtless he will do so now. If
possible
I fear more anxiety about this than about the discovery of my
treason. No, he will not tell her; if I believed he wouldif I
suspected
he wouldI would either slay him, or remove her beyond
his power. But I will trust him. He can have no motive in
betraying
the secret; it would rather defeat than secure his object.
In this manner reflecting upon the coming interview between his
daughter and Satchell, he reached home, and entered his dwelling
with a heart quite as heavy and a countenance as sad as when he
left it, though from a different cause. Sorrow and anxiety always
fill the heart, from whatever source they spring. We think any
other grief preferable to the existing one; but each woe, as the ball
the cup, fits and fills up the whole heart.
CHAPTER XVII.
THE SEALS OF THE PAPERS.
The
clock in the Park street tower was just tolling seven o'clock,
on the evening of the day in which the events related in the
preceding
chapter transpired, when Simmins Satchell entered the gate
that led to Madame Delano's. It was a bright moonlight night,
and upon the lawn within the street enclosure were walking or
sporting several of the young girls of the boarding school. Satchell
in his snuff-colored clothes and stout stick, his eyes shaded by his
broad-brimmed, greasy hat, took his way towards the portico without
noticing them. His heart had no sympathy with innocence and
beauty; their musical laughter he had no ear for, nor an eye for
their sweet faces, softened in the beams of the moonlight to still
greater loveliness. As he passed near them and they saw who he
was, for he was known to them all, as any marked, bad man in a
town is known to all the young folks, they shrunk back and let
him pass. There was no pleasant greeting such as welcomed
Colonel Harwood, no grouping about him for a pleasant word;
they avoided him and stood off aloof, and silently gazed at him as
he advanced to the door. They then whispered to each other with
looks of fear, and did not resume their sports until he had been
admitted
into the hall by the servant.
I wish to see Miss Kent, he said, addressing Madame Delano,
who came out of the drawing-room.
Yes, oh, yes, Colonel Harwood said a gentleman would be
here, answered the lady, to whom Satchell's person was strange.
Show the gentleman to Miss Kent's parlor, she added, to the
gray-headed footman in attendance.
Satchell followed the old man up the carpeted stairs, and was
conducted by him to the door of Caroline Kent's room, not the
private boudoir in which her father had had his interviews with
her, but a small parlor adjoining, and communicating with it. The
room though not so elegant as the one she commonly occupied as a
sleeping-room and where she had received Colonel Harwood, was
still neatly furnished. Upon a centre table stood a small astral
lamp, and a few books strewn upon it with a writing desk, showed
the literary taste of the occupier.
The quick ear of the young girl had caught the sound of a strange
foot-step in the hall, and she knew that it was the lawyer who had
demanded the interview that was now approaching. She was in
her boudoir when his foot-fall was heard upon the stairs ascending.
Her heart throbbed almost audibly with every tread that fell upon
her ear. She approached her glass, not from vanity, beautiful as
she was, (for she did not wish to adorn herself for sacrifice,) but to
see if her face was calm. In her hand she held a book, and
entering
the little parlor she seated herself by the table and commenced
reading, or rather the appearance of reading. This, however, was
only to give him the idea of her composure as he came in. Her
cheek was pale; her lips compressed; her eyes dark and fixed.
She looked like one who was expecting the entrance of the
messenger
to announce to her that her death-hour had come.
The footman knocked upon the door. In spite of herself she
started, and the color deepened upon her cheeks; but she composed
herself, and responded in a firm voice,
Come in.
A gentleman to see you, Miss Kent, said the old servitor,
bowing, and ushering Satchell in.
Very well, Andrew; you may go, she answered in an even
tone, and with a manner perfectly self-possessed.
Andrew closed the door. Satchell remained standing. She cast
her eyes towards him, and said politely,
Mr. Satchell, I believe, sir?
Yes, at your service, miss, he said, fairly embarrassed by her
self-possession.
Be seated, sir.
Satchell took a seat upon the sofa. Caroline re-seated herself by
the centre-table opposite to him, facing him. There was a space
of about five feet between their positions. Satchell held his hat
between his knees, rolling up the brim with an awkward hesitation
extraordinary in a man of his consummate audacity. Caroline
Kent held the book open between her fingers and thumb, and
quietly resting upon the table, looked firmly in his dark, sinister
countenance.
He saw that she waited for him to speak, and he now prepared
himself to enter upon the business which brought him there.
Miss Kent, you are probably aware of the object of my visit,
he said, all at once assuming his confidence and decision; and he
planted his deep, dark orbs upon her face with a gleam that she
shrunk from meeting.
I am not, sir.
Not? Have you not seen Colonel Harwood? has he not been
here? has the man deceived me?
He has been here, sir; he told me that I might expect a visit
from you at this hour; he even told me that your object in coming
was to do me the honor to propose for my hand. But as I have no
doubt he was in a jesting humor, I am at liberty to suppose that
you have come to see me on some other subject. One to look at
you, sir, would hardly be likely to associate so joyful a thing as a
marriage with the sight of you.
Indeed! he exclaimed with surprise. You are very much
disposed to be witty.
No, sir, I have never had the reputation of a wit; if I happen
to be so now it is wholly to be referred to the inspiration of your
agreeable presence.
Ho, hoh! You are inclined to be merry at my expense.
Pardon me, sir; I have always been taught from my youth up,
to reverence old age.
This is extremely pleasant. You are fond of amusement; you
are disposed to laugh.
I assure you, sir, I was never more disposed to be serious in
my life. They say one must never laugh when they see the devil
or a death's head!
I do not know how to take you, he cried, vexed and amazed
at such a reception, when he expected to find a young, trembling
girl, ready to fall at his feet and implore his mercy. As he gazed
on her he thought he had never seen a person so beautiful and
spirited in eye and air. He found that her wit and intellect were
equal with his own; and that he must pursue an entirely different
course of tactics from those he had meditated.
You had best not think of taking me at all, she answered to
his last remark.
This trifling, my pretty Miss, he said, sternly frowning upon
her, will not answer. You are in my power.
I? she repeated, with flashing eye.
Yes, you.
No, no, sir; I am not in your power. You cannot intimidate
me; I do not fear you. I know well your object in coming hither.
I know at what price you have surrendered the secret papers on
which were suspended my uncle's life and honor. But, sir, I am
no party to that contract; if you have yielded the papers, you have
lost them without an equivalent, as is just. My uncle faithfully
performed his part of the contract; he came to me; he told me his
whole story; he described to me the unrelenting character of the
man who held over him such fearful power, with which accident
had invested him. Before he mentioned your name, I hated you.
When he said that it was the noted Simmins Satchell, I only
wondered
that I had not guessed the name, so true was the likeness to
the most evil man in Boston. Sir, listen to me; hear all I have to
say. My uncle told me the condition, and felt that it was his duty
to urge me to accept your proposal of marriage. Sir, he did his
part honorably; he went to you and told you so. Strange as it is,
you gave him up, on his mere word, which he might have falsified
for so great a stake, the papers on which all dear to him depended.
The matter, therefore, now that my uncle has nothing to fear, rests
with you and me.
That is true, answered Satchell, looking at her with the same
steady, stern, brow-beating look. Now what does Madamoiselle
say?
That between you and me there remains nothing but that this
interview be at once terminated. She spoke with dignity and
an air of command, mingled with a look of proud contempt.
Then I am to understand that you refuse to endorse the
conditions
on which I was to surrender the papers.
There was no condition that has not been complied with, sir.
Do you suppose that I gave your uncle the papers
merely
on
the remote prospect that his
niece
would become my wife?
Pray, sir, on what ground did you have the presumption to
suppose that I would ever degrade myself in this manner?
There was an implied condition. Colonel Harwood was and
is bound to see it carried out; and you are bound to comply.
No, sir; I deny that you have any further power over him or
me. The papers which you have so long basely held over his head
to extort money from him, are no longer in existence; they were
the wand of your evil power; and, necromancer, your power is
crushed! I marvel greatly, sir, that one so shrewd and experienced
in years as you are, should have suffered yourself to be thus
defeated
in your objects. Sir, our interview is at an end. I desired
to see you, that you might from my own mouth hear my opinion
of you, and know that you are beneath my contempt. Marry you?
I would rather be torn in pieces on the rack!
You seem to have a very just appreciation of my merits,
answered
Satchell, sarcastically. I am very much obliged to you,
for this free and candid expression of your opinion of mevery!
But perhaps I shall be able to change it,
perhaps
I do not say
positively; for there is nothing positive in this world; but possibly,
I say, I
may
be able to make you sing out of the other side of your
mouth, pretty bird.
While he was uttering these words in a tone of peculiar secret
triumph, he was drawing from his deep pocket a small file of papers.
He took them in his hand, and laying his finger on the inscription,
said quietly and with a malicious leer, that made her heart stop
beating with suspense,
I hope, lady, that you will give me credit for more judgment
and discretion than you have just done. I knew better than to
trust Colonel Harwood too far; I had too much world's wisdom to
surrender on a mere probability of getting your consent, such
important
papers as I held. Oh, no! You must yet give me credit
for experience quite equal to my age. The package of papers
which I placed in Colonel Harwood's hands, and which he was too
happy to get to examine very closely, (though they would have
stood his severest and most deliberate scrutiny,) was nothing more
than an ingenious and skilful imitation of pen, ink and paper, fold,
blot and soil-marks of the original documents. Those I now hold
in my hand. No, no; I must yet have credit for sagacity from
even your sweet lips. I see by your looks that I have already
arisen again in your estimation. But, badinage aside, Miss Kent,
here are the
veritable
letters, and he struck the two fore-fingers of
his right hand upon the package which lay in the palm of his left,
these are the veritable letters on which hang your uncle's life and
honor, and the reputation and happiness of his wife and children;
nay, your own; for the shadow of his disgrace will reach even
you.
Caroline Kent started from her chair as he first announced to her
this terrible fact; and as he continued to speak on, she gazed upon
him with horror; and at the same time the most painful alarm for
her poor uncle filled her bosom, flushing her cheek and dimming
her eyes.
Suddenly, as he ceased speaking, she made a spring for the file
of papers; she caught them in her grasp, and bounded for the door.
In an instant she was in his grasp, and the documents forcibly
wrested from her small, firm-clenching fingers. She stood where
he stopped her, pale, panting, with flashing eyes and heaving
bosom. He turned the key in the door, and cast it to the back of
the room into a corner.
You are disappointed, Miss Kent, he said, re-arranging the
papers which had been loosened in the struggle. He spoke calmly
and with a quiet smile, as if nothing had occurred. Come, be
seated, and let us talk this matter over.
I am indeed disappointed, she answered, with deep emotion.
But, sir, I do not believe your story; if you would impose upon
my uncle, you would impose upon
me
. I do not believe these are
the genuine, but that you gave him the true papers.
Do you remember that your uncle had a peculiar seal some
years ago?
I do.
Perhaps you have notes or letters in your possession sealed
with it: it was a cross, with a sword above it, a dove perched upon
the sword.
I remember it. He lost it in the war.
True, so I have ascertained. He uses another and different
one now. Would you recognize the old stamp?
Yes, she answered, as if very reluctantly replying to any thing
he said.
There it is, he answered, showing her the seals upon several
of the letters. These are proofs that the letters are the true ones.
Upon those I gave your uncle there were no seals, for I could not
counterfeit the seal so well. They appeared torn off, and he
supposed
they were torn off. Here are the original papers, with the
seals as he sealed them.
CHAPTER XVIII.
THE ALTERNATIVE.
Caroline Kent
felt perfectly convinced that the words of the lawyer
were true. All her self-possession seemed ready to desert her. She
felt that she was indeed in his power, now that her uncle was
again. For him she felt the deepest sorrow and alarm. She
pictured
his joy and happy relief after burning the papers, and
remembered
how light-hearted he felt now that he was free. Yet it was
all a deception! He was still in the same danger, though ignorant
of it; the papers were still in Satchell's hands; at any moment the
storm might burst and overwhelm him with infamy.
Such were her painful reflections as she stood there before
Satchell
,
who steadily watched her countenance with an expression on
his face of quiet exultation. He seemed to divine her thoughts.
Miss Kent, he said, you have you perceive censured my
want of tact without good foundation. I am not a man likely to
throw up the cards with the game in my own hand. What I have
told you is the truth. Colonel Harwood is as much in my power
to-day as he was yesterday. I see you feel for him; you have it
in your power to save him. He is now happy; he believes that he
is safe. Are you willing to destroy this peace? are you willing
that he should be once more made a wretched slave to his fears?
are you willing to tell him the dreadful truth, and witness his
anguish
and despair?
No, no, she answered quickly and nervously; he must never
know how he has been deceived, and she wrung her hands.
Yet he must know it; if you refuse to save him, he
shall
know
it. And more than this, neither money nor any thing else earthly
shall get these papers. Tomorrow they shall be on their way to
the Government. No power shall save him.
Oh, most dreadful!
I am glad you feel his danger and sympathize with his
situation
;
it is in your power to keep the truth from him.
How? she cried almost fiercely.
How! By becoming mine. I offer you my hand.
Demon!
Very well; demon or angel, it is the same to me. Words are
but words, mere circles in the water made by a pebble thrown in.
It is true it is a great sacrifice. I am near fifty; I am rather ugly
of visage, and ungainly in person; I have not the best reputation
in the world, and have been in prison for forgery; indeed I am
known among men as the Rogues' Attorney. You see I have
attractions
for a young and blooming girl, and withal a high-spirited
one. I name over my merits, that you may have less repugnance
to me.
She gazed upon him with amazement visible in her beautiful but
angry face.
Sir, she said, you do but jest with me; your words show it.
If you wished me to wed you, you would not thus seek to make
yourself more hideous than you are. Tell me plainly, what is the
price at which these papers are to be purchased, and my poor uncle
freed from your power?
The price of your handnone less.
You surely do not seek to render a young girl who has never
injured you miserable for life. You cannot desire to make me your
wife, she cried, earnestly. Say that it is but a jest.
I never jest, lady. You know the terms at which your uncle's
life and honor are to be purchased. These papers, and believe me
I speak the truth, are sufficient to hang him; if they are placed by
me in the hands of the Government, he will be executed for treason
within three months; he knows it as well as I do. There remains
but little more to be said. You know the terms; if you regard his
life and honor, these papers shall be yours the very moment you
consent to become mine.
Consent?
At
the altar
, I mean.
O God! she cried, covering her face, this is fearful.
All at once she threw herself at his feet. She raised her face to
his streaming with tears; she supplicated him with clasped hands.
Save, oh!
save
my uncle, and spare, spare
me
.
Only on the condition already named, he answered, coldly.
Be mine and the papers are yours.
Marry you? she repeated with infinite scorn, rising to her
feet; no,
never
. I will perish first.
Very well, said Satchell, taking up his hat.
Tomorrow the
fate of your uncle is sealed
.
Stay
stay!
she cried, springing towards him and catching
him by the arm; come, cocomcome back, sir, she stuttered
out, in the most painful state of agitation.
Well, what do you say? You know that to be Satchell's
wife you will be honored with the appellation of the Rogues' Bride.
You will share my infamy; all my crimes and sins will serve as a
lens for people to look at you through. You will be Satchell's wife.
What an honor! can't you realize it? Then you will live in such
style! I shall perhaps purchase another chair, and another cup
and saucer and tea-spoon, for my dingy office in  alley; for
there you are to live with me. I keep no servant as I have but one
room, and you will be servant-maid, housekeeper and every thing
at which you can make yourself useful. You see that I make you
great offers.
I will not consent; I will die first! she exclaimed, filled with
terror at the picture he had drawn.
You forget your uncle's danger.
He must bear it, then. I cannot save him at a price like this.
Sir, rather than be your wife I would take my own life.
Then the question is settled.
His
fate also.
Is there no other condition?
None. You are in one scale, and his life in the other.
She stood a moment, looking the very statue of irresolute despair.
Her eyes wandered upon the papers. He saw their direction, and
buttoned them up in his breast-pocket.
I cannot save him,I cannot; he would not ask it, she cried,
in anguish.
Then good evening, Miss Kent, he said, stooping for the key
and going with it to the door; he placed it in the lock. She stood
trembling like a leaf following each movement. He turned towards
her; he approached her. I will give you one moment more to
reverse your decision.
Sir, have you no heartno humanity. Can you witness my
distress unmoved, when you have the power to remove it?
No, the power you have, not I. You have only to say `Yes,'
to save your uncle.
And sacrifice myself?
You know what a high crime treason is. Picture to yourself
your uncle dragged from his home and cast into prison; see him
arraigned before a tribunal of his country; witness his anguish and
the wretchedness of his family; see the blush of shame upon the
cheek of his eldest boy; hear the sentence of death! Place before
your eyes the scene of execution; the crowd; the gallows; the
fatal cart; the coffin; the drooping form of your uncle bound and
clad in the habiliments of the scaffold; see the
No more! no more! I
consent!
When?
Nowat any time, only save him; this very night. No,
tomorrow
tomorrow
I will be yours. Will you give me the papers then?
Yes, the moment the words pass your lips that make you mine.
Ha, ha, ha! Yes, I will be thine. You will not deceive me?
No.
You swear to give me the papers as soon as I have pronounced
the marriage vow?
Yes.
Oh, merry, merry marriage day! ha, ha, ha!
Miss Kent, be calm! Your reason is leaving you!
Calm? she repeated, fixing her eyes wildly upon him. Should
I not be calm when there is so much cause for joy? and she sung
thrillingly the line
Oh, merrily rings the marriage bell;
She stopped full at the last word, and said sadly
But to me it will be a funeral knell!
Satchell approached; his face assumed a look of sympathy.
Miss Kent, be composed. I will save you.
Save me! she shrieked, clasping him by the arm and looking
him intensely in the face.
Yes, be calm. Do not give way to such excitement.
You say you can save me, and my uncle too, cried the poor
girl, who had seemed for a moment about to lose her reason; but
who now appeared calm at the hope of safety held out.
Yes, both of you. There is a condition upon which you can
have the papers; and I have no doubt, seeing that you loathe me
as you do, that it will suit you better.
Name it,any thing but
that!
she shuddered as she spoke;
I can consent to any thing but that.
Even to become the mistress of Edward Manning! he
suggested
,
in a cool, deliberate way, that showed how deeply laid had
been his plan to reach this point.
Sir?
Nay, do not take such quick fire. Remember all depends on
your self-possession; it is a great stake we are playing for! I
repeat then what I first said, and I wish you to hear me calmly.
There is no alternative to the question; you must either become
the wife of the detested Simmins Satchell, or the mistress of Edward
Manning.
Sir, I do not know what to say to such wordsto such a
proposal
!
I cannot listen; you insult me!
I do not intend to. I speak plainly, because it is necessary we
should perfectly understand each other. The life and honor of your
uncle depended on your consent to become my wife. You treated
the proposition with as much contempt and horror as if it had been
proposed to you to wed Lucifer himself. Instead of forcing you to
this union with me, I take pity on you, and propose one that I
know will be far more agreeable to you. I know that you loved
Edward Manning before his marriage; I know that this event has
not diminished your passion; nay, I know that you would this
night, were he to come to you and swear undying fealty, that you
would fly with him to the world's end. This I know you would
do, for it is in your character. Love like yours for him can couple
therewith no dishonor, even though no altar hath consecrated it.
How is it that he reads my soul thus! she said, half aloud.
He has spoken aloud what has only been thought in the recesses
of my being. Oh! why has he mentioned this loved name to
torture
me?
You are silent, lady.
Sir, I know not what to say.
I will teach you words. Listen: I present you these two
alternatives
,
viz: be mine legally or his freely.
His freely then, if choose I must! But, sir, strange man! I
know not what to term you, how is this to reward
you
for the
surrender
of the papers? What are you to Edward Manning? How
can this strange compromise benefit you?
How can you tell but that Mr. Manning pays me a larger price
than I could realize otherwise? How can you say that when I find
that you will not be mine, that I choose to yield you to him, and
take much money instead of little or no love?
Has Mr. Manning sent you to me? she cried, her whole
manner
changing, and her looks full of love and the excitement of hope,
as if there was in the world none else but he whom she loved and
worshipped. But no, no! she answered herself, sadly. You
do only mock me, trifling with the knowledge of my deep love for
him. He has no heart for me; he thinks not of me; he has a
lovely wife, and she holds that high sacred place in his affections,
for which I have sighed in vain. Yet I thought he once loved me;
nay, I think he did till he found how madly I loved, and that he
discovered in me, perhaps, a recklessness of passion that alarmed
his chaste bosom. Oh! how have I lamented that fatal hour when
I let him know to what perfect abandonment I was ready to give
myself to him. But, alas! he fled; he saw me no more; he loves
me not; he despises me and pities me.
These words were uttered as if she had no listener. She seemed
to forget Satchell's presence, or heedless of itperhaps indifferent,
in her grief, whether her words fell upon his ears or not. He heard
them all.
Why do you speak to me of Edward Manning? she demanded
aloud. He is nothing to me.
Yet you are every thing to him.
I to him?
she repeated, half in joy, half with incredulity.
Yes, maiden, he loves you with the deepest passion,a passion
only equal to your own.
His wife? she gasped.
He loves her not. His heart is yours. He has found that
her
heart is another's.
Is this true?
Yes. Outwardly he carries the fair show of love; but he cares
nothing for her; and if the truth be told, nor she for him. This
mutual discovery, although they have been married but a few
weeks, has destroyed their happiness. He now sighs for you.
Oh, that I could believe you!
I have
proofs
.
When did you see him? how did you learn this? has he sent
you to me? did he desire you to see me? Speak, for my heart is
bursting! were her rapid interrogations.
Listen and you shall know all; and I trust that you will yet
thank Simmins Satchell for this night's visit to you.
CHAPTER XIX.
THE YOUNG CLERGYMAN IN HIS STUDY.
The
young girl bent forward in an attitude of the most eager
attention
,
her hands clasped, her eyes expanded, her body thrown
forward
,
and every faculty awakened by love.
I am sent here by Edward Manning, as you suspect. He
commissioned me to speak with you. He is to pay me a large sum
if I succeed, much larger than the five thousand dollars your uncle
offered me for the papers. You see, now, why I refused that sum.
I resolved to retain the papers to use to bring you to Edward
Manning's arms. I, therefore, first proposed that you should
become
my
wife, that I might drive you to him! You see what
my success has been. But I confess I was not prepared to find you
were so ready to chime in with my purposes! I did not account
so much on your love for him! I reckoned more on your hatred of
me! But now that you understand my object, it is too late for you
to recede; for unless you consent to become the mistress of
Manning
,
yon shall be my wife!
The first, the first! Does he love me?
Yes. When you have consented in a note to him to become
his, you shall have these papers!
Then tell me quickly what I shall write. But, sir, how am I
to believe all this? He is a young gentleman of honor, and piety,
a clergyman, and .
Were he an angel, it would make no less true that he loves you,
and wishes you to fly to him and make him happy. I said I had
proofs, here they are.
As he spoke he took from his pocket-book two letters, one of
them was addressed Simmins Satchell, Esq. He held it before
her and asked her if she knew the hand-writing. She started with
pleasurable recognition, exclaiming,
It is his!
Nay, look closely, for you may perhaps discover that it is a
forgery, he said ironically.
It is his, I am sure!
And whose is this? he demanded holding up before her eyes
the superscription of the other.
It is to me! she exclaimed joyfully, extending her hand for it.
But whose writing?
Edward Manning's.
Be positive! You will, perhaps, say I forged these letters,
unless you are satisfied perfectly of the writing.
I
am
satisfied! It
is
his!
Very well, now I will read to you the first, which is addressed
to me. Nay, don't be impatient, yours you shall see as soon as
this is read. He then opened the letter, the seal of which was
already broken, and thus read aloud to her, she approaching and
looking eagerly over the page:
My dear sir
,
I have at length decided, since my last interview with
you, to give up all hopes of being happy with a wife I cannot love.
My heart, as I told you is with the beautiful Caroline Kent. I dare
not see her until I know she still loves me; for I fear that her love
may have turned to hatred! But if you can, I wish you to see her
and ascertain whether she still retains affection for me. Tell her
from me, that I think only of her; and that if she will be mine, in
the flowery chains of mutual love, I will sacrifice honor, reputation,
everything to her! Before you see her, call on me at eight in the
evening when I will see you privately in my library.
Ever yours,
E. M.
Is it possible that he loves me thus? she repeated with tears
in her eyes. Oh, I will fly to him!
Yes, he adores you still. I went to see him, we talked over the
whole affair; he said that he intended to-day to let his wife go to
New York on a visit, but with the intention of never seeing her
again! That he should then be alone, and would be the happiest
of men if you would come disguised to his house. He will then
make known to you his plans for your future happiness!
Oh, joy, joy? Now let me read his letter to me, sir.
He placed it in her hand. She pressed her lips to the seal, and
with trembling fingers broke it.
My dear and not forgotten Caroline
,
This will be handed to you by my confident, the
bearer, only in case he discovers that you still remember me with
affection. Therefore, if your eyes fall upon these words I shall
know that I am writing to one who still loves. I have much to
lament; I have been deceived and given my hand where my heart
would not follow. How could I give that which was not mine to
give? I cannot in words upon paper tell you how much I love you.
You are dearer to me than any object on earth. If you love me
and can forgive the past, forgive me for preferring another to you,
I am ready to cast myself at your feet; do not deny me this
happiness
,
until at least, I have seen you and spoken with you and plead
for myself. If you will see me, write to me by the bearer. Write
and tell me when I may have the bliss of seeing you. I shall wait
with impatience till I know my fate! Fear no rival! My hand
and heart are free! nay, they are free only to be your slaves.
Farewell till we meet,
Yours faithfully,
Edward
.
7
The deep, heartfelt joy of love was apparent in every lineament
of Caroline Kent's face, as she perused this letter. She kissed
again and again the signature, and then looking in Satchell's
immovable
face, said,
I am ready to go with you.
But not now. You must write him that he may be prepared.
I will take the note to him; and if he will see you to-night, I will
return for you. His wife will leave tomorrow; but perhaps he will
see you secretly in his library. Write at once your answer.
Caroline sat down with a joy-beating heart, that made even her
fingers throb with its pulsations as she proceeded to write:
Dear Edward
,
The past is forgotten. Your note has made me the
happiest of beings; you ask me if I have forgotten you? Oh, no!
you have daily been dearer and dearer to me! I can scarcely
write for trembling with joy; I will come to you, I will be yours
forever! I have no heart, no thought, no will but for you! Do
not delay the bearer, let me see you at once that my happiness may
have its sweet confirmation in your presence.
Your grateful and faithful,
Caroline Kent
.
That will do, said Satchell, who had read what she wrote
over her shoulder. I will at once take it to him.
Do, she said, folding and sealing and directing it; do, and I
will await your return. It is not eight o'clock yet; go, and if you
return with good tidings I shall forever bless you.
Did I not say you would bless the day you ever saw me,
hateful
as I am, my pretty one? said Satchell, as he took the note,
and with an air of peculiar and significant satisfaction placed it in
his pocket-book. He then unlocked the door and bowing, was
going out, when her hand arrested him:
My uncle's papers!
True, I had forgotten them! he said, laying the package upon
the table.
She caught it up and throwing it into the inner room, turned the
key and placed it in her bosom.
You mean they shall be safe, he said, smiling. But they
are of no further use to me; I have your note and it is price
enough!
He then went out, bowing and bidding her good evening.
Has my note and it is
price
enough, she repeated to herself as
she unlocked the door of the inner room; what can he mean?
She took the bundle of papers and began to open and read them.
She then tore her uncle's name and seal from each, and burned
them in the grate.
I will keep these to show to my uncle, she said, folding them
in a piece of paper. There is no treason in these, and he can
then be satisfied that the originals are no more. Now to prepare
myself for the meeting, if it be to-night, with Edward. Oh, such
joy! How can I realize that he who has so long had my heart,
now loves me after all, and is ready to make me his; ready, for my
sake to divorce his wife! She who has been the object of my envy
and hatred, lovely as she is! But I must hate every woman who
loves where I love! He is mine! He sends for me! Oh, such
happiness is too much for me. I am to be Edward's at last! But,
she said, suddenly pausing and turning pale and then deeply
blushing
,
how
am I to be his? with what the world calls dishonor!
Yet how can I choose? It was either to consent to this or be the
legal mistress of this hateful lawyer; One is no more degrading
than the other; but I have a secret hope that I shall be his wife,
this I shall aspire to be. If he loves not his bride, I will take her
place; I too must be his bride. I go not to him, fondly as I love
him, voluntarily to sacrifice myself! I have consented to see him,
but with the hope that he will yet make me his honored wife. I
know that he will; I know that he is too good and virtuous to
think of me with guilty thoughts. He says nothing in his note to
alarm my fears. The inference was only drawn by this evil
Satchell
!
I know he intends to make me his wife; but, should he
refuse, I am his so that he loves me.
Such were the reflections of this young girl, who, it will be seen,
needed an element in her character to render her superior to the
temptation into which her strong and ardent feelings might lead
her. Without a mother's guiding hand, and left from childhood
pretty much to herself, and indulged by her father in every
whim, high-spirited, passionate and independent, without just
notices of feminine morals, it is not surprising that she should
prove a ready tool to the purposes which the wily lawyer had in
view. Her position, too, drawn as she was in the outset either to
accept Satchell, or bring dishonor on her father, and then the
alternative
offered where her heart already was given, present a strong plea
in her behalf. But in no case can wrong be effectually pleaded away.
In no case can departure from virtue be defended. It is better to
die, says Seneca, than to tell a lie! much more do a greater
wrong!
Edward Manning was seated in his study; he was writing a
sermon for the ensuing Sabbath. It was to be his first since he had
accepted the charge of his parish, and he was pouring into it all the
impulse of his genius, of his piety, of his eloquence. His study
was an elegant apartment, lined to the wall with polished
book-cases
,
with gothic fronts; the windows were heavily and richly
curtained. A sofa or rather lounge, was drawn near the fire-place,
and soft, luxurious chairs were about. Near the centre of the room
stood a large oval table piled with books; at this he was writing,
wrapped in a dark brown dressing robe, his feet in Indian slippers.
No sound could be heard but the scratching of his pen over the
paper; his calm, high brow was expressive of intellect; his clear
eye beamed with intelligence and genius. At length he completed
his task and threw himself back in his chair, folded his hands and
closed his eyes. His lips moved as if he were putting up a prayer
for a blessing upon what he had written.
An inner door was gently opened; he turned and beheld his
young and beautiful bride. She entered with a smile, and her eyes
turned from him inquiringly to the writing-desk.
Come in, dearest Gertrude, he said; smiling, and wish me
joy; I have written my first sermon!
Then I have come in just in time, Edward! I thought I would
not disturb you till you were through; though it was lonesome to
be away from you. Do you know that I am going to teach you to
write with your wife in your study?
I don't think I could, Gertrude, he answered, smiling, and
folding his arm about her lovely form. If I were a novelist and
writing a description of my heroine, then your presence would
inspire me; I should be sure to paint you to the life; and be assured
ne'er author had a fairer heroine than I should have! I should
make them all die of envy and despair!
You are a flatterer, Edward, she answered, yet looking
flattered
withal; now am I to read your sermon?
Yes, or I will read it to you.
No, we will read it together, she said, taking it and holding
upon one side while she gave him the other.
You read aloud, Gertrude, I will follow you, and I can then
judge best as to its style and subject. It has been my aim to write
to the heart more than to the head, as you will see.
She began to read in a low rich tone, and he to follow the words
with his eyes and to listen as she read.
She had turned but the first leaf, when a ringing was heard at
the door.
I hope it is no one to disturb us, we are so happy at this
moment
,
said Gertrude, looking up.
It was his father, Judge Manning, who said he had come in to
see if Edward had got through with his first sermon. He was
of course made an auditor. Gertrude had resumed and read but
three pages when a second ringing announced another visitor.
CHAPTER XX.
THE DISCOVERY.
The footman who answered the bell came to the study door
and said to the young divine,
It is a gentleman who wishes to see you in private, on particular
business, sir!
Oh, then, remarked Gertrude, rising and smiling, I suppose
we are likely to be intruders. Come, dear Judge, we will go into
the parlor, and I will then read the sermon aloud to you. Of
course Edward don't care to hear it read.
Yes, I would gladly Gertrude; but I must see who this is who
desires to see me. Admit him, Charles!
It is probably one of the wardens, said the Judge, smiling as
he followed the young wife out and closed the door.
The next moment, by the opposite door, came back Charles
ushering
in a tall man closely enveloped in a cloak. Edward eyed him
sharply, but without recognition.
Are we alone, Mr. Manning? asked the stranger without
removing his hat or cloak.
Yes, sir!
Shall we not be intruded upon? he asked, looking round.
No, sir! answered the young clergyman, surprised.
Satchell then dropped his cloak from before his face, and removed
his hat. But as his person was wholly unknown to Edward, of
course this movement explained nothing to him of the character of
his visitor, except that he had a face that struck him with instinctive
repugnance. Satchell took a seat, and then, bending over towards
the wondering young man, said, in a low tone, and with a
cautions
,
grave manner,
Though I have not the pleasure of your acquaintance, Mr.
Manning, I have felt it my duty to call upon you in relation to a
painful affair that deeply interests you!
Pray, sir, what is it? inquired Edward amazed, and not
without some misgiving of evil news.
It is a matter that deeply affects your honor, and as I knew
how dear a clergyman's good name is to him, which even the
lightest breath of slander can sully, I thought it would be doing
you a favor to call on you first before proceeding to extremities.
Sir, your language is inexplicable! What is it that you would
communicate! Speak freely, sir? Conscious of not having done
an action in my life that I am ashamed of, I fear nothing, dark as
your words are! Pray speak freely, sir!
What a good thing it is for a man to have a clear conscience,
thought Satchell to himself. It makes him as bold as a lion.
Well, sir, I
will
speak freely. When you have heard all you can
judge best what course is fitting to pursue. You once were
acquainted
with a young girl, the niece of Colonel Harwood!
Miss Kent, certainly! I have known her very well from
boyhood
!
You were once particular in your attentions to her!
Indeed, sir, this is rather presuming on your part?
It is necessary; but if you object to answering I will take my
leave. I called on you merely to save your honor!
My honor!
Yes. Hear me, sir! Whether you are guilty or not is not for
me to say! As her lawyer I am to suppose you are! Still as your
friend, and a friend to the Church, I have thought it best to give
you an opportunity of compromising the matter!
Sir, be explicit!
I am a lawyer. Yesterday came to me Miss Caroline Kent,
and applied to me to prosecute Edward Manning for a breach of
promise; making oath that, previous to his present marriage, he
had pledged himself to marry her; but, instead of redeeming his
pledge, he did, greatly to her injury and shame, take another
woman to wife! Wherefore she desires reparation for this great
wrong done her at the hand of the law of the land!
Sir, who are you? demanded Edward, springing to his feet.
Simmons Satchell, Esq.!
This is a vile fabrication all! I know your reputation, sir! It
is a plan to extort money from me! Miss Kent never made such
oath!
I can prove it, sir!
You are not in practice in the courts that she should make
appeal
to you!
I do a great deal of law business, sir, by playing into the hands
of one or two who are in practice!
The whole is false, sir! cried Edward indignantly. I never
made any promise to Miss Kent, nor can I believe she has said so!
I will bring her here to prove it!
Then she must have suddenly become a most abandoned
person!
Neither you or I have any thing to do with her character! She
comes forward and makes oath to a fact. You must either disprove
the charge or endure the penalty!
The penalty? Sir, I am no criminal! I defy both you and this
young woman! answered Edward with a flushed cheek, and his
eyes wet with the tears that forced their way at this charge against
him.
Very well, sir, I beg your pardon for my intrusion! I thought
I should do you a service. Some men would have gone on with
the matter, and the first thing you would have heard of it would
have been a summons from the court to attend and answer to the
charge!
Oh, God! What fearful cloud is this upon me!
Good evening, sir! and Satchell rose to go towards the door.
Hold, sir! This thing seems incredible! Can Miss Kent be so
lost!
She loved you, doubtless, and perhaps you made the promise in
a weaker moment, and now, seeing you are wedded to another, she
seeks revenge. A woman's vengeance is to be dreaded, sir!
What does she want? What can have driven her to this
attempt
to ruin me? he cried with anguish.
As I said, revenge! You say right in calling it ruining you,
sir! Though you may, if you stand the trial, prove yourself
innocent
,
yet it will always be a blot upon you! Half the world,
particularly
your enemies, will believe it. Suspicion against a man in
your profession is as bad in the world's eye as guilt!
Sir, I feel that it is so. What can I do? What can she
want?
I advise you to compromise the matter!
I am innocent! shall I act as if I were guilty! he cried with
distressing perplexity. I cannot do this!
Then she will prosecute! To-morrow it will be announced in
the papers that the Rev. Mr. Edward Manning lately appointed
Rector of  Church has been sued for a breach of promise! This
will forever destroy you, sir, if it goes no further!
What can I do? If I could see her, I would talk with her!
Perhaps I could induce her to change her mind! This is dreadful,
sir! What does she want?
She would, probably, quash the whole matter for ten thousand
dollars!
Ten thousand dollars!
A jury would give her half that amount in damages! for you
are able to pay it! I would advise you to see her and compromise
the affair with her before it goes further!
The shameful girl! How can she have been so lost! Where
is she?
At Madame Delano's. I will go and see her now, to-night, if
you wish. To show you my disinterestedness I refuse to take any
thing myself. So that I save you and through you the sacred
character of religion from suffering, I shall feel myself amply
rewarded. The world gives me an evil name, Mr. Manning, but
the devil is not quite so black as he is painted!
Sir, I appreciate your kindness and consideration for my
feelings
.
I should like to see this young woman!
To-night?
Will she see me?
Yes; but I will bring her
here!
You had best not go there,
lest it should be whispered about. Can't be too cautious, sir! Can
you not see her here in the course of half an hour! Is there no
secret way she could enter? Your wife must suspect nothing!
Wives, be they never so loving, are quick to believe!
Alas, what a situation for me! Yes, sir, I can see her alone!
She can come in by this way! I will show you!
But write her one line, if you please! She may not come with
me without it at this late hour! Satchell placed a pen, the pen
he had written his sermon with, in his shaking hand. He wrote
rapidly as follows:
I will see you
to-night
. The bearer will show you a private
way, for I wish no one to see you come hither! I will await you
in my study.
Edward Manning
.
To Caroline Kent
.
Edward then opened a door, and led him out by the
conservatory
,
and thence into the garden, and so to a private gate, of which
he gave him the key. He then let him forth bidding him haste!
When he re-entered his study he was as pale as a dead man.
He sunk upon his knees by his chair, and then fell over upon his
forehead, and prayed to God not to desert him in that hour of trial!
After many minutes he rose up calmer. He soon heard the
footsteps
of his father and young wife. He tried to compose himself,
and succeeded so well that when they entered they did not perceive
that any thing ailed him save that he was pale and sad.
You have heard some bad news, said the vigilant eyed loving
wife.
No, he answered smiling; nothing of any consequence.
How did you like the sermon?
Excellent, cried the Judge.
Admirable! answered Gertrude.
I am very glad. I must correct it, now! So if you please I
shall have to be alone soon!
Very well; as it is not yet nine, Gerty and I will have a game
at chess; said the Judge. Come, dear, let us go into the parlor
and leave him alone!
I should like to be alone until I go out to the parlor, so you
won't come near! A foot fall draws my attention!
Not a mouse shall come within two rooms of you, answered
Gertrude, laughing as she went out.
He looked after her, and sighed heavily.
For
her
sake I will make any sacrifice! A stain upon my good
name would break her heart! For
her
sake as well as my own,
and for the honor of the church, I will consent to compound this
conspiracy against me! Alas, for Caroline Kent! What evil has
taken possession of her heart! She seems depraved! Yet, I have
seen that in her character that should not so much surprise me to
find that she has fallen! But that
I
should be the victim of her
sin!
In less than half an hour, a half an hour passed by the young
clergyman in the most painful anxiety, Satchell entered the garden
gate accompanied by Caroline Kent. As he locked the gate, he
gave the key to her saying, Keep it, it will be of service. Now,
he added as they came to the entrance to the conservatory, you
will pass to the left, and come to a mahogany door at which you
will rap. He will open it to you. When you see him do not fly
into his arms, for he will think he has you too cheaply! Besides,
by being cold and reserved you may induce him to marriage! Now
delay five minutes before you knock!
I will obey you! she answered, leaving him and entering the
conservatory. How her heart bounded with joy! yet she suppressed
her rising emotions that she might assume a gravity that would
bring him to offer her his hand in marriage.
Satchell passed down the garden, threw himself over the fence
into the street, and hurried round to the front door. He rang the
bell, and when the servant came, he said to him,
Judge Manning is within, is he?
Yes!
Is he with Mrs. Edward Manning?
Yes, sir!
Take this to Mrs. Manning without delay! Place it in her
hands!
I will, sir!
I check your castle! said Judge Manning to Gertrude, as the
servant entered. He placed in her hand a note, very thick, as if
an envelope to others. It bore her address. She broke the seal
and read,
Dear Madam
:
Regard for your honor and happiness prompt me
to make known to you what intimately concerns your peace.
Your husband has been long false to you! You have proof of it in
the enclosed notes to Miss Kent! If you require further proof you
will find her now in his study, the usual place of their secret
meetings
!
A FRIEND.
It is false! she cried almost with a shriek. Read that, sir!
she exclaimed, as she glanced over the notes which Satchell had
read to Caroline as coming from Edward to himself and to her,
with
her reply
, and his
last few lines
scribbled to her within the last
half hour! All these notes Satchell had secured and enclosed in
the envelope. Her eyes comprehended the whole sense of each,
though she scarcely saw the words! The sentences seemed written
with a pen of fire. It burned her brain to read!
She stood by him, and gazed into his face as he read also, first
the note to her, and then those enclosed.
It is impossible! cried the Judge. But I will go and see!
If she is there all is confirmed! You must not go with me, my
child!
I will not obey! I will go with you, she cried, clinging to
him, and ready to fall. I must know the worst!
They approached the door! They listened! His voice was
heard! A female voice was heard! She had been admitted but a
moment before. He had offered her a chair without speaking; but
she declined it, and said, (just as the Judge and Gertrude were
approaching
the door,) I have come to see you, Mr. Manning, as you
request
I am sorry to meet you in this manner, Miss Kent! he said
reproachfully. I have sent for you to see if I can change your
purpose! I know not what has induced you to treat me thus!
Come, let me reason with you kindly, he said, taking her hand!
She could not understand his words. She thought they alluded in
some way to the past.
I forgive all, she exclaimed; and cast herself upon his bosom.
At this moment the door was opened, and the wife and father
beheld
them thus standing as if in inutual embrace.
Edward was appalled at seeing them, and she, knowing her
guilty position in the presence of the wife, broke from him as he
was making an embarrassed effort to cast her off, and fled! By the
aid of the key she escaped from the garden, and overwhelmed with
confusion and mortified pride at her discovery by his wife, she
sought to regain her apartments, to shut herself in, and give way in
tears to the bitterness of her disappointment! In her mind all was
uncertainty and terror. She had caught but a glimpse of the
injured
wife's indignant countenance as she discovered her, and of
Judge Manning's angry brow. She trembled for Edward, and
feared for herself! She blamed her conduct, and even censured
him for thus exposing her! But had she remained to have
witnessed
the scene that followed her departure, all her sympathies
would have been with Edward.
CHAPTER XXI.
THE VICTIMS.
The
young clergyman, after the entrance of his father and wife,
stood paralyzed. His first idea was that they could not have
entered
at the precise time they did without being aware of the
presence
of Miss Kent. He began, as soon as he could recover speech,
to vindicate himself.
My dear wife, my father, judge me not by appearances. I am
innocent.
Innocent! Oh, confirmed and finished hypocrite! cried Judge
Manning, his eyes sparkling with mingled indignation and contempt.
Do not make your guilt blacker by attempting to defend yourself.
I know all, and so does this injured, lovely creature, who is so
degraded
and unfortunate as to be your wife. But the law will soon
restore her to her honorable maiden name. Not a word. Do not
advance to speak to her. She is too sacred an object now, sir, for
your polluted touch.
Oh God! this is too much! Such language from you, my dear
father, is more than I can bear! I declare to you, and to you,
sweet Gertrude, my honored and loved wife, that I am perfectly
innocent, however strong may seem the circumstances of my guilt.
The mere fact that this young woman threw herself upon my arm
should not condemn me unheard.
We will not condemn you on this fact alone, young man,
answered
his father, with withering scorn. Look at these letters,
sir! These proofs are enough to show the world your total
depravity
.
Can youdare you, Edward, deny these letters? asked his
wife, calmly but firmly.
He grasped themlooked wildly at themsaw the note he had
written among them, and staggered backward, his brain swimming.
He saw at a glance the position in which he was placed.
This one is mine, he said faintly; but I solemnly declare the
rest to be forgeries.
Edward, do not add to your guilt by denying it in the face of
these proofs, said his father. Were the letters false, our eyes
are not. You will next say we did not find her clasped to your
heart. Silence, sir! You have dishonored yourself and your wife
and me. From this hour you are not my son! Come, Gertrude,
you must go home with me, he said, taking the unresisting hand
of the wretched wife, who from the first had not opened her pale
lips, nor ceased to weep in silence. She seemed turned all at once
into a beautiful statue of heart-broken grief.
Without another word to his son, Judge Manning almost
broken-hearted
himself, led his daughter-in-law from the study. Edward
stood horror-struck gazing upon their departure. He made no
effort to detain them; he felt that it was in vain to defend himself
then
.
The next morning the only witness of his innocence and who
would have testified to it, had she lived, and who, equally with
himself had been the victim of Satchell's vengeance,
had disappeared,
no one knew whither!
When Edward, who in his heart had trusted
to her to clear up the mystery, heard this at Madame Delano's
door, whither early in the morning and after passing a dreadful
night he went, to see her, he gave way almost to despair. He sat
down in his study the same day and wrote to his father and wife
the whole, so far as he knew, beginning from Satchell's visit to
him. This letter did not convince them; for already, no one knew
how, a rumor was in the town and reached
them
that Miss Kent
had been
murdered!
The person who told Judge Manning was a
stranger to him, who met him in the street and asked him if he had
heard of the rumor, and that it was said she had been murdered
by a young clergyman! This man was an agent of Satchell's.
What a blow was this to the father! His suspicions at once fell
upon his son. The rumor ran rife, and the name was openly
spoken. Before night poor Edward Manning was in prison, charged
with the murder of Caroline Kent. Four weeks afterwards he was
tried, and on the most extraordinary circumstantial evidence was
found guilty. A body had been discovered answering to hers, a
few days before the trial came on, and therefore there remained
longer no doubt in the mind of any one of his guilt. From the bar
he was remanded to his cell, there to remain until the day set for
his execution, which was the last Friday in the month, giving him
an interval of about fifteen days.
We will now, after so long a review of foregoing events, once
more return to Simmins Satchell and his office, and follow him into
the locked-up room in its rear, which, in the early part of our story,
we left him just in the act of entering.
He turned the key and softly entered the dark apartment, with
the light in his hand. In one corner of the room, to which she had
retreated upon his entrance, stood a female form.
[2]
[2]
The reader will bear in mind, that the events now to be related are all
subsequent
to the trial and imprisonment of Edward Manning. These, it will be understood,
occurred previous to the first introduction of the reader to Satchell in Chapter I.
She was young
and, though pale, her hair disheveled and her dress in disorder, and
her looks expressive of mingled alarm and detestation, she was
surpassingly
lovely. It was Caroline Kent!
Seven weeks, seven long weeks of solitary and terrible
imprisonment
had she suffered in that room, whose mysterious silence and
fastenesses had excited the curiosity both of the little bandy-legged
cobbler and the ebony shoe-black, who occupied the rooms below.
The African said he had heard strange noises there, and religiously
believed it was haunted; to which opinion the little cobbler
coincided
;
and neither had the courage to make such observations as
would confirm or remove their suspicions.
We have said that when Edward Manning went secretly early
on the morning after his distressing interview with his father and
Gertrude to see Caroline, he was informed that she had suddenly
left, no one knew whither. Thus were his hopes of acquitting
himself dashed to the ground; for he had trusted in her generosity
to explain to his father and his wife the whole of the circumstances,
which to him were as inexplicable as they were fatal to his good
name and domestic peace. The next day he was arrested on
suspicion
of having murdered her; and a few days afterwards a dead
body was found in the cemetery at the foot of the Common, which
her father acknowledged to be that of his niece. This body had
a deep wound in the bosom, and as it lay near the wall inside, it
was supposed to have been thrown over there by the murderer,
after the fatal blow was given. Edward was tried for the deed,
and, as we have seen, convicted and sentenced, though the evidence
was only circumstantial. But there were false witnesses raised up
by Satchell, who took oath to evidence that seemed conclusive of
his guilt.
We will now explain the agency of this wicked lawyer in her
disappearance. When he found that his fiendish scheme had so far
been successful that Edward had been surprised by his wife and
father, with Caroline clasped to his heart (as it seemed,) he waited
outside the garden to receive her, and learn more particularly what
occurred; for he had from the lower step of the piazza seen but not
heard what had so rapidly passed within the library.
You have mocked me! you have deceived me! He loves me
not! she cried impassionedly, as he addressed her and walked by
her side homeward.
Do not be excited. He acted so only because he was aware
that he was in danger of being overheard; he knew his jealous wife
was always on the watch; he suspected she was listening; he was
right, as you saw; and on this account he pretended not to love
you. What he said to you, child, came only from his lips, and
were intended for his wife's ears not yours; if his heart had had a
tongue he would have spoken very differently; and but for fear of
his wife he would have received you very differently. You are too
quick, therefore, as you must see, to censure me. I have told you
only the truth. Had you not his letters?
I wish I could believe you, she said, still rapidly going on
towards
her home. But his words did seem to come from his heart.
No, no! I cannot be deceived; he loves me not. I saw it in every
look and tone. He pitied, he despised me; he looked angrily upon
me. No, no, sir. You have for some purpose or other deceived me.
I have been a fool to trust you. I could almost believe you have
made me a tool to destroy Edward Manning; for as he is good and
you are evil, you must naturally hate and wish his overthrow. I
will tomorrow early write to his wife; I will tell her all; I will
show her that her husband is innocent, that I,
I alone
, am the
guilty one.
You will? he repeated, in a deep voice.
Yes, I will. Whether I am your tool or not I have nearly
ruined Edward, and I will make reparation; I will clear him of all
blame, for I know that he loved me notthat I have been under a
delusionthat I have been deceived and betrayed. Do not speak,
sir; you cannot make me think otherwise upon this subject than I
do. I have been a victim of duplicity. Leave me, sir.
They had now arrived at the gate of the mansion-house. She
attempted to enter.
Stay! he cried, taking her by the arm. Unless you swear
to me that you will not say any thing nor write any thing to
Edward
Manning's wife, you shall not enter the house.
Do you menace me, sir? Now do I know that I have been
most cruelly deceived! I will bind myself to no such guilty silence.
I will repair the injury I have done that noble young man by every
reparation in my power. I defy your threats! Release your hold
upon my arm, as she spoke she broke from him, and fled like a
hunted deer towards the dwelling. In a few long bounds he was
at her side, his huge hand over her mouth, his strong arm about her
waist.
Dare to shriek and I will throttle you, he cried savagely.
Come with me quietly and I will not harm you. As he spoke
he dragged her, or rather bore her swiftly out of the yard, for she
had nearly reached the steps of the door in her flight, and hastened
along the street. She could not articulate to say whether she would
be quiet or not. His huge hand grasped her under jaw and pressed
it with pain. She was nearly suffocated for want of air. She
struggled; she released his hand and gasped,
Do not choke me! I will be quiet.
Very well, then, he responded; see that you are. Not a
word. Come along and take my arm too, so that yonder watchman
may not remark us.
I will not, she answered firmly.
You won't? and he placed his gripe upon her throat.
Yes, yes! I will! Oh, do not kill me!
She placed her hand in his arm. They walked closely past the
watchman. She could hardly move along for trembling. She could
with difficulty repress the impulse to shriek for help. But she felt
pressing against her heart the point of a knife which Satchell took
from his pocket and opened, just before they came near the
watchman
.
She held her breath lest she should involuntarily cry out,
and the knife should be plunged into her throbbing bosom. The
watchman regarded them both closely; he stopped and looked after
them, and he then went on his round.
Where are you taking me? she asked hoarsely, after they
got by him, and she drew back.
Come on; don't hang back. If I could trust you I would let
you go; but I wouldn't let you free now for a thousand guineas.
You may trust me. I will do any thing you say.
Will you? No, I wouldn't believe you, he said with a sneer.
It is too late now. Besides you would inform against me. I
can't let you off. My safety is in your hands. If I let you go all
will come out; my revenge will be defeated. As it is, with you
safe, all is just as I would have it, if I were the Devil himself.
Nothing could have been finer than your throwing yourself into his
arms! Whatever little imp, favoring me, prompted you to this
crowning act, I know not, but I shall always be grateful to him.
At this moment he turned suddenly a corner into the alley where
his office was. The clock at the same moment struck eleven; it
seemed to her heart to sound a knell. She shrunk back from the
darkness and silence of the narrow passage.
I will go no further. Kill me, if you will, but I will not be
dragged by you. Whither do you take me? I may as well be
murdered here.
Resist at your peril! it is but a few steps farther. I take you
to my office. Come along. I am not going to injure you, if you
will be quiet and submissive.
I would rather you should strike me dead at once. Release
me! I will never betray you. I willno I will
not
say I will be
silent and let Edward Manning suffer; if I have life I must use it
to clear him from all guilt.
So I supposed. Your fate is sealed! he said fiercely; and
once more gagging her with his hand, he lifted her up from her
feet and darted swiftly down the dark alley with her. He reached
the door of the old tumble-down tenement in which he had his
office; it was open, for it served as common entrance to the rooms
on both floors. He groped his way over the broken planks of the
dark entry. He heard the cobbler snoring in his bed on one side,
and knew from the deep silence on the other that the boot-black
was fast asleep. Every thing favored him wonderfully. He reached
the top of the stairs. His grasp upon the throat of his victim had
become stronger as he approached the door, lest she should make
any noise. The grasp in his fears was too firm, and after a severe
convulsive struggle she became suddenly as a dead body in his
arms. He had suffocated her. He feared she was dead, and a
chill of horror came over him. He relaxed his hold, and finding
his way up the broken stairs reached his room and entered. He
laid her upon the floor, hurriedly struck a light, and with it bent
down to look at her. She was nearly purple in the face; but she
was faintly gasping. A hellish thought of pressing for a moment
longer upon the windpipe passed across his mind. But he trembled
so at the idea of being a murderer, that, with a cry of horror, he
hurriedly proceeded to make efforts to bring her back to
consciousness
.
CHAPTER XXII.
THE LOVER'S STRATAGEM.
After
ten minutes constant exertion, Satchell had the satisfaction
of seeing his victim come to her senses. His joy knew no bounds
when he beheld her open her eyes and look round, wildly and
bewilderingly
,
indeed, but yet with life and consciousness. He had
feared he had killed her, and the horror this fear caused him, no
doubt prevented his doing so afterward. He had for a few
moments
of horrible suspense felt, in anticipation, the dreadful
sensations
of the murderer, and he resolved, now that she had revived,
that he would never subject himself to feel so in
earnest
. He made
up his mind that she should live, and lest he should be tempted to
kill her he broke his knife blade and cast it into the fire-place.
After seeing her open her eyes, he stood back, a little ways out of
sight, to watch the expression of her face when discovering where
she was.
Her wondering wild gaze at length fell upon himself. She
uttered a piercing shriek, but the next moment shrunk from him,
and casting herself upon her knees before him, with clasped hands
and uplifted eyes, besought his mercy!
I have no mercy for one who would destroy me! he answered,
gazing immovably down upon her, his arms folded upon his chest,
and his brow contracted with settled revenge.
Where am I? what would you do with me? that you have
brought me to this place?
Keep you from doing mischief abroad! I am not to have my
deeply laid schemes detroyed by your babbling. Edward Manning
shall bear the infamy that I have caused to be heaped upon his
head through you!
Through me?
Yes, lady. I have only made you the instrument of my hatred
of that young man. He has fallen, and will never rise again! His
father will no more hold his proud head above men. I have
stricken his gray hairs to the ground. He sees his son dishonored!
He
Monster! she cried, her indignation getting the mastery of her
fears.
I do not heed names? Words are but air! So long as I have
my ends brought about I care not what you think of me, maiden!
Release me, I beg of you, Mr. Satchell! Oh, do not detain me
here! she cried with touching earnestness.
I will not trust you. No, no! My safety, the consummation
of my vengeance, depends on keeping you in security. So, come
with me!
Whither? she asked, rising to her feet, and eyeing him with a
look of fearless defiance.
To the next room, only. I shall keep you there for the present.
Your treatment, and your ultimate release, will depend on your
conduct and submission!
I will not go! I refuse to submit to this tyranny! she
answered
with spirit.
Very well, we will see who is master here, he answered; and
going to his desk he took from it an old pistol, and presented it
against her heart. Young woman, there is no necessity for
compelling
me to commit a murder. You had best yield quietly, and obey
me. You know me well enough to know that I will stop at nothing!
Do not kill me!
Then obey me! Go into this room! The door is open. Do not
compel me to take you in!
The hope of being able to escape from his hands ere long, nerved
her to meet this crisis, and influenced her to assume the passiveness
she was far from feeling. She walked past him into the room, the
same we have already seen closely nailed up on the side towards
the stair-way. He followed her with a light which he set upon a
table. She shuddered as she looked around upon the desolate
apartment. The walls were bare; the floor carpetless, and covered
with rubbish; the furniture consisting only of a pine table, a chair,
and an old sofa, once covered with hair, but now ragged with the
stuffing protruding in a score of rents.
Here, miss, you will remain till I feel that I can let you out in
safety! he said sternly.
You dare notyou
cannot
keep me here! I shall be missed!
The world will find me out!
I shall take care of that! Sit down, and now hear me while I
lay down a few brief regulations for your conduct!
I will stand! she answered, trembling between terror and
indignation.
Have your own way! he answered with a sneer. Now
listen. My object in keeping you here is to prevent you from
informing
against me, and establishing the innocence of Edward
Manning, which a word from you can do. It is my pleasure to
have him believed to be guilty!
But, I have promised I will be silent!
I will not trust you! Once out you would not consider a
promise drawn from you by compulsion binding. You would also
betray me! I have gone too far to go back.
My
safety depends on
your safe-keeping. My
revenge
will never be complete if you are
suffered to go free!
How long do you intend to keep me here?
A week; perhaps longer! But hear my laws by which you
will regulate your conduct. In the first place I premise by assuring
you that escape is impossible. This is a strong room, I have used
it as a prison before. Now listen to my commands. I forbid you
to scream, or speak above your voice, on pain of death! I forbid
you to make any attempt to escape, for if I discover it I will
assuredly punish you. Your safety and good treatment depends
wholly on your conduct. If you behave well, I will treat you well.
Early in the morning I will place a cot in here, more furniture, and
make you comfortable. You shall have books also; and I shall
place with you and old negro woman to keep you company, and
keep watch over you. She will sleep on the sofa, and never leave
you. You need not attempt to bribe her, for she is my agent, and
will never betray her trust. She will have orders to gag you if you
are noisy! Now I have laid down the law, I hope you will be wise
enough to obey it; else it will be the worse for you in the end! I
now leave you to your reflections. If you wish to sleep there is the
sofa for to-night! Now beware any screaming! I will assuredly
take your life as I hear your voice in the next room!
With these menaces the lawyer turned on his heel and left the
room, double-locking the door after him. Poor Caroline stood
where he had left her, as motionless as a statue. Her face was as
pale as marble. Tears were in her eyes, but they did not flow.
8
Fear, indignation, wonder, filled her soul. She could hardly
realize
the truth! She seemed to be in a dreadful dream.
Am I really awake! Is all this so? Am I a prisoner to this
hateful being? Let me look around me! Let me put my hand
upon this sofa! It is real! Let me lay my fingers upon my pulse!
They beat! I am conscious! I am
awake
. It is no vision! Oh,
God protect me! If I have, through my great love for
him
, done
evil, and sinned against thee, forgive me, and bring me not into
judgment greater than I can bear!
Hist, there! sounded the stern tones of Satchell's voice from
the outer room.
She shuddered, and laid her hand over her mouth with fear. She
tottered to the sofa, and sunk upon it! She began to weep bitterly.
By and by, her head sank upon her shoulder, and she fell into a
deep sleep. He softly opened the door, and stood gazing upon her
beautiful, pale features.
Poor child! he said with some feeling of pity in his bosom;
poor child! I pity her; but it is her own fault. She should not
have alarmed me by saying that she would go and undo all that I
have done. Well, it shall be but for a few days. This young
clergyman will be accused of her death, for that I shall manage as
deeply as I have done the rest. When he is thrown into prison!
Then will my revenge against Judge Manning begin! When he is
convicted by a jury of her murder then will my revenge be
ripening
;
but it will only be mature when, with these eyes, I can see
him swinging upon the gallows. Then that man's heart will break,
and my vengeance be crowned with the fullest fruition that earth
can give to revenge! Sleep on, child! You will need rest to go
through with patience what is before you!
With these words he left her, and locking the door reentered his
own apartment. The next morning he performed his promise. He
placed furniture in the room to make her situation, as he sneeringly
said, more comfortable, gave her books to enable her to while away
the time, and also introduced to her a negro woman with a
countenance
revolting from its lines of vice and insensibility to every
gentle human feeling.
Under her care, and in this close imprisonment, Caroline remained
several weeks, till at length she began, as if from despair of ever
being rescued, to be reconciled to her lot, and to bear it with as
much submission as was in her power. She knew nothing that was
going on. Of the arrest of Edward for her murder she had not
heard a word. She was in a state of suspense and uncertainity in
relation not only to herself but others in whom she was deeply
interested. She wondered, indeed, that her tyrant should be able
so long to detain her undiscovered. But she was ignorant of the
means he had resorted to to prevent curiosity from being exercised
upon her disappearance, in having placed the mutilated body of a
young female taken up from a grave with her own clothes put upon
it, where it could be found and be taken for hers. This horrible
fact she was wholly ignorant of.
In the meanwhile Edward went to prison, and from the prison to
the bar of his country to be tried for his life, for
her
murder. He
was convicted, sentenced, and remanded to his cell, to await his
execution.
Of all these proceedings the poor girl was ignorant, enduring with
a sort of submissive despair her own captivity. She was not
wholly passive. She had hopes of effecting her escape, and more
than one plan had been conceived by her for freeing herself from
the power of the evil man who held her in bondage.
The day preceding Edward's execution at length arrived. It was
that after the night on which the swindling conspirators had met in
Satchell's room, as we described at the beginning of our story. The
reader will also remember the Poet whose verses had so often
interrupted
their conversation. This Poet was acting a part. He
was a young man of talent, and handsome personal appearance,
who had long been attached to Caroline Kent; but, on account of
the previous possession of her heart by Edward Manning, she could
return him only gratitude for his preference. He, however,
continued
to love her, and to visit her as a friend from time to time.
When he heard of her sudden disappearance from the
boarding-school
he at first suspected her of eloping; and his grief at the utter
overthrow of all his hopes was very great. But when the body
was found habited in her dress, and pronounced to be hers by her
own father, his grief gave place to wretchedness and despair. At
length he resolved to enter the tomb where she was deposited, and
take from her head a lock of the bright hair he had so loved to
gaze upon as it shaded her fair brow. He gained admittance to the
vault. He saw the body, and to his surprise and joy found, by the
color of the hair, that it was not Caroline Kent. There was not a
great deal of difference, but enough to convince a lover. This
discovery
confirmed a previous suspicion that the body found was not
that of the maiden he so fondly loved. He had not seen the body
before its burial. But he was now convinced that it was not the
one supposed to be. He left the vault happy, but in a state of the
most painful uncertainty. He resolved at first to make public his
discovery. Then it occurred to him there might be crime at the bottom
of it, and secrecy would be the only way by which he could
ascertain
Caroline's fate. At length circumstances, which we have not
room to follow in their detail, led him to suspect that Simmins
Satchell knew more about the fate of Caroline than any other
person
.
He had heard from the proprietress of the school that Mr.
Satchell had been to pay her a visit the day before she was
missed. The lover also went to call on her uncle, as he was called,
and, from words he let drop, his suspicions of Satchell were
strengthened: and he made known to the Colonel what he believed
was the truth; viz: that Satchell had a hand in her abduction; for
that she was dead both now equally doubted.
The result was that the two gentlemen conversed confidentially
together. Edgar Harwood made known his strong attachment to
Caroline, while the Colonel confessed the power which Satchell
held over him. It was finally planned between them that the
subtle lawyer should be watched. But how to effect this was a
difficulty that presented many obstacles. At length it occurred to
Edgar, inasmuch as he was wholly unknown to Satchell, to hire a
room of him as a penny-a-liner, and under this guise they hoped to
find out through his movements what had become of the missing
maiden, provided he had had any thing to do with her
disappearance
.
It was resolved at once to proceed to work, and to watch
him closely as he went out and came in; and if possible learn her
fate; for that it was in some way associated with him, both had
began firmly to believe.
The same day, dressed in a second-handed thread bare, patched
suit, with a bushy uncombed wig, and pen, ink, and paper, Edgar
applied to Satchell for a room; and was shortly invested with the
sole occupancy of the apartment in which we found him at the
outset
of our tale.
CHAPTER XXIII.
CONCLUSION.
This
movement on the part of the lover to watch Satchell, and
endeavor to discover whether he was guilty, took place but two or
three days prior to the day on which Edward Manning was to be
executed. Edgar was anxious to have his suspicions touching
Satchell, confirmed or destroyed, before that fatal day; for in the
one case the young clergyman would be acquitted by the
confirmation
,
and in the other he would be reprieved; for Edgar intended to
proclaim to the world that the body was not that of Caroline Kent.
Having succeeded in deceiving Satchell as to his character, he felt
that he could pursue his investigations without obstacles. But the
first and second day he could discover nothing. He had cautiously
followed Satchell out by day, and covertly tracked his steps by
night; but he could not find that he visited any place where he
was likely to have a captive.
Nevertheless, the youthful lover was more and more convinced
that the evil lawyer was in some way connected with her
disappearance
.
At length on the afternoon after the meeting of the
swindlers, as Edgar was in his room waiting for Satchell to go out,
resolved to take this opportunity to search the old rookery from
garret to cellar, he heard him unlock a door and go into what
seemed to him an inner room. This awakened his attention, for he
had several times heard him turn back a bolt of an inner door in the
same manner. He listened attentively; he thought he heard
whispering
.
He heard suddenly Satchell's voice raised or rather
muttering
in a subdued growl. He then heard a stifled cry! he was
sure he heard a stifled cry! His blood leaped from his heart to
his brain, from his brain to his hand, which he clinched in his
excitement
.
He laid his grasp upon the door of his room to rush out
and enter that of the lawyer, when he heard him lock the inner
door again, and re-enter his office.
The young man paused to collect himself; he let go the latch
and for a few moments sat down. He was now sure that the
maiden he loved, and for whom he was assuming this disguise, was
in Satchell's power, doubtless an inmate of that barred-up room, he
had so ofter looked upon with suspicion, and which he had resolved
to enter as soon as Satchell should have left his office.
He waited for ten minutes in the utmost anxiety and impatience
for Satchell to leave his room, which he usually did do about this
hour. At the expiration of this time he heard him rise, open his
door and go out. Through the key-hole of his own, he could see
him descending the stairs; he then hurried to the window of the
room to watch him go out of the alley. When he saw him turn
into the street at the extremity of it and disappear, he felt the
greatest
delight and relief. He now resolved to penetrate that chamber
and see who the inmate was. If it were not Caroline, he knew
that it was some person whom humanity called upon him to
befriend
;
but that it was her he sought he had no manner of doubt.
He crossed his room with a light and cautious step as if Satchell
could even overhear where he was, and passing out into the entry,
applied to the latch of the lawyer's door for admittance. It was
locked as he anticipated; but he did not hesitate. In a corner of
the dark entry was a parcel of lumber, among which he found a
heavy piece of wood. This he caught up and with two well
directed blows dashed in one of the lower pannels.
Through this breach he succeeded in making his way and
entering
the office. It was now a critical moment. If Satchell should
return he would either be arrested as a burglar, or have to knock
the lawyer down to effect his escape. There was no time for delay.
He made his way across the lumbered-up room to the door which
led into the apartment where Caroline was confined as a prisoner.
He rapped upon the door and then called out,
Who is in there?
There was no reply. Caroline had heard the heavy noise made
by the breaking in of the door; and not knowing what to make of
it, and fearing she knew not what new evil, she remained standing
in the floor alarmed and listening. When the voice addressed her
at the door, she knew it was not that of her captor; still she did
not recognise it as that of her lover. She did not reply; yet there
arose in her heart a faint ray of hope that it might be the voice of a
friend, rather than that of a foe. But she had been so long a
captive, had suffered so much in mind, that her nerves were entirely
unstrung; and the least unusual sound caused her to tremble like
an aspen.
Who is there? Speak, for I am your friend! again called the
voice without the door of her prison.
At the sound of the voice, which was kindly in tone as well as in
its words, her heart bounded with hope. She sprang towards it
and bending her ear close to it, listened to hear it again. She
thought she recognised it; but the idea was too happy for her to
cherish. She feared that it might be Satchell feigning the voice to
entrap her into some net. She waited trembling, hoping, fearing.
Caroline, if you are there, speak! It is Edgar.
Edgar! Then I am safe! she shrieked with wild joy. It
is Caroline! Save me, Edgar! Oh, save me.
I will! I have come to save you, thank God! answered the
lover. Can you open the door from the inner-side?
No. Break it open if you can!
She had hardly uttered the words before heavy blows were
forcing the door from its fastenings, and half a dozen good strokes
with one of Satchell's iron fire-dogs sent it tumbling into the room,
so that Caroline had to step out of the way to escape its fall.
The same moment they were clasped in one another's arms.
Ah, what all dat? cried the negro woman who had slept
through all, and was now at last aroused to look after her escaping
prisoner.
Who is this, dearest Caroline? he asked, seeing by the faint
light of a taper, the negro woman approach from the obscurity of
the room, her eyes glaring and armed with a short cudgel.
It is my horrible goaler; save me from her; answered
Caroline
,
shrieking and clinging to Edgar.
She shall not harm you; answered Edgar. Come with me
this way, there is not a moment to lose! When I get you into a
place of safety I will learn all about this outrage. I am so
overjoyed
at finding you alive that I can hardly realise that I am not in
a dream.
You don't car' te gal orf, not you! cried the negress,
springing
upon Caroline with an open clasp-knife in her hand.
Edgar caught her arm, wrested the knife from her, and taking a
cord, which had once bound Caroline's tender wrists, he bound her
to the sofa by the arms, and there left her howling with rage. He
then half carried, half conducted Caroline out of the room, through
the office of the attorney, and shoving back the bolt on the inside,
threw open wide the door and escaped with her into the entry. He
bore her in his arms down the stairs and hastened a few steps up
the alley to a police office, where he felt that she was safe. One of
the officers at his request went for a hackney-coach, and in five
minutes more Caroline was placed in it, and Edgar by her side.
To the officers he made no explanations, but paid them for their
trouble.
Which way shall I drive, sir? asked the coachman as he
closed the door of the carriage.
To the residence of Colonel Harwood.
To my
uncle's!
Oh, joy, joy! Am I once more free? cried
Caroline almost overcome with the consciousness of happiness.
Shall I see him again? Do I owe this happiness to you, sir?
Edgar briefly related to her how that he had suspected Satchell,
and the plan he had adopted to confirm his suspicions now crowned
with such triumphant success. He did not speak to her of his deep
love for her which had prompted him to do so much. But she felt
that it was to his love that she owed her deliverance; and her
heart overflowed with gratitude.
The carriage at length stopped before the house of Colonel
Harwood
.
Edgar hastened in to inform him of his success. The next
moment Caroline was weeping for joy in her father's arms. His
happiness who can picture? He received her as alive from the
dead.
After she became sufficiently composed to converse, Caroline
related to them both all of the circumstances, with which the reader
is already acquainted. Her testimony was a triumphant acquittal
of Edward Manning of the crimes he was charged with; and when
she learned from them that the morrow was set for his execution,
she could hardly be restrained, weak as she was, from at once
flying
to his release.
There is full time yet, thank heaven, my dear child, answered
Colonel Harwood; full time to save him and crush his oppressor.
You must take some refreshment and then we will go in the
carriage
at once to the Governor's mansion, if you are strong enough.
Oh, sir, I have strength! I can undergo any thing to save him;
for I have wickedly been the cause of his disgrace and suffering.
Oh, if I had known this about him when I was a prisoner, how
much more wretched I should have been! I could not have
survived
!
I cannot take any thing; do not delay a moment! Let us
at once see the Governor, that I may tell him all.
Finding that her anxiety on Edward's account was too great to
suffer her to eat any thing, her father resolved to drive with her at
once to the house of the Governor. There in an interview of an
hour, she unfolded to his excellency all the circumstances which
bore upon the supposed guilt of Edward Manning, as fully
acquitting
him of unfaithfulness to his wife by her frank testimony, as
her
presence
acquitted him of her murder.
It would be impossible to describe the effect which Caroline's
developments had upon those who heard it. The Governor at once
ordered his carriage, saying he would go to the prison in person,
and bring Edward Manning away to be a guest in his own house,
till he could send for his father and wife who had left a few days
before for New York, to escape from the scene of his disgraceful
death. By the Governor's advice, Colonel Harwood at once rode
down to the Police Court and got a writ issued for the arrest of
Satchell; and so prompt was it executed, that as Edward
Manning
was leaving the jail leaning upon the arm of the Governor,
Simmins Satchell entered it locked by the two arms by two
officers.
The lawyer's face was as pale as death. His eyes met those of
his late victim, and as at a glance he saw that he was free, and
would be restored to his honor and good name again, he gnashed
his teeth with rage. The jailor to whom had been given by the
Governor, the outline of the facts touching Satchell's fiendish
agency in Edward's imprisonment, upon receiving the lawyer
into his custody conducted him to the cell which the innocent man
had just quitted, and there locked him in, saying,
I never turned a key upon a prisoner with more pleasure than
I now turn it upon you, Mr. Satchell. If all is true they say about
you, I shall only have a greater pleasure vouchsafed to me when I
unlock your door to turn you over to the hangman.
We are now at the conclusion of our story. The same day
Edward's pardon or rather
innocence
, was proclaimed publicly.
The joy of Judge Manning, the happiness of the lovely wife of
our hero, upon receiving a letter from the Governor,
communicating
the fact of Edward's innocence of every charge against him,
must be left to the imagination of the reader. Edward remained a
guest of the Governor until their arrival, when he was once more
clasped to the heart of his father while he folded his tearful wife to
his own. Caroline wrote and sent to Edward's wife a full history
of the whole, concealing nothing. Satchell refused to make any
confession. A day was set apart for his trial, but he had not the
courage to face those whom he had injured. He strangled himself
with his neckcloth, and thus rushed to a bar where suitable
judgment
for crimes like his could alone be dispensed.
The devotion and services of Edgar won the grateful heart of
Caroline, and she rewarded his noble attachment with her hand.
Nothing now remained to mar the happiness of either party; and
if possible, Edward and his beautiful wife were happier than before
the affictions which had so severely visited them.
THE END.My dear sir
,
I have at length decided, since my last interview with
you, to give up all hopes of being happy with a wife I cannot love.
My heart, as I told you is with the beautiful Caroline Kent. I dare
not see her until I know she still loves me; for I fear that her love
may have turned to hatred! But if you can, I wish you to see her
and ascertain whether she still retains affection for me. Tell her
from me, that I think only of her; and that if she will be mine, in
the flowery chains of mutual love, I will sacrifice honor, reputation,
everything to her! Before you see her, call on me at eight in the
evening when I will see you privately in my library.
Ever yours,
E. M.My dear and not forgotten Caroline
,
This will be handed to you by my confident, the
bearer, only in case he discovers that you still remember me with
affection. Therefore, if your eyes fall upon these words I shall
know that I am writing to one who still loves. I have much to
lament; I have been deceived and given my hand where my heart
would not follow. How could I give that which was not mine to
give? I cannot in words upon paper tell you how much I love you.
You are dearer to me than any object on earth. If you love me
and can forgive the past, forgive me for preferring another to you,
I am ready to cast myself at your feet; do not deny me this
happiness
,
until at least, I have seen you and spoken with you and plead
for myself. If you will see me, write to me by the bearer. Write
and tell me when I may have the bliss of seeing you. I shall wait
with impatience till I know my fate! Fear no rival! My hand
and heart are free! nay, they are free only to be your slaves.
Farewell till we meet,
Yours faithfully,
Edward
.Dear Edward
,
The past is forgotten. Your note has made me the
happiest of beings; you ask me if I have forgotten you? Oh, no!
you have daily been dearer and dearer to me! I can scarcely
write for trembling with joy; I will come to you, I will be yours
forever! I have no heart, no thought, no will but for you! Do
not delay the bearer, let me see you at once that my happiness may
have its sweet confirmation in your presence.
Your grateful and faithful,
Caroline Kent
.I will see you
to-night
. The bearer will show you a private
way, for I wish no one to see you come hither! I will await you
in my study.
Edward Manning
.
To Caroline Kent
.Dear Madam
:
Regard for your honor and happiness prompt me
to make known to you what intimately concerns your peace.
Your husband has been long false to you! You have proof of it in
the enclosed notes to Miss Kent! If you require further proof you
will find her now in his study, the usual place of their secret
meetings
!
A FRIEND.